Dali Tert Society 


NIDDESA 


I 
Mahaniddesa 


VOL. 1. 


EDITED EY 


L. DE LA VALLÉE POUSSIN 
AND 


E. J. THOMAS 


London 
PUBLISHED FOR THE PALI TEXT SOCIETY 
BY 
HUMPHREY MILFORD 
OXFORD UNIVERSITY PRESS WAREHOUSE, AMEN CORNER, E.C. 
1916 


CORRIGENDA 


Page I8, last l. Read avieisantatisahitain. 

Page 31. І. 15. Read хедапаха. 

Page 85,1. 19. Read Nànena. 

Page 10%, 1. 5. Read micchanàne. 

Page 125, 1. 15. Read. singi. Probably misprint in Si; cf. 
p. 283. 

Page 159,1. 5. Read ха. 

Page 179, ll. 21, 25. Read sabrahmako. 

Page 185, 1. 23. Read addasan. 

Page 186, 1. 4. Read ^ dhammá. 

Page 188,1. 10. Read asllata. 

Page 193, 1. 23. Read Катапа-. 

Page 196, 1. 17. Read nibbedhehi. 

Page 205, 1. 4. Read panivautappatto. 

Page 226, 1.15. Read ^ssavanam, kundikai. 


Page 247, l. 5. Read khin?. 


CONTENTS 


PREFACE - - 2 


RAMASUTTANIDDESA = 
GVUHATTIIAKASUTTANIDDESA 
DUTTHATTHAKASUTTANIDDESA 
SUDDHATTHAKASUTTANIDDESA 
PanAMATTHAKASUTTANIDDESA 
JARASUTTANIDDESA I 
TISSAMETTEYYASUTTANIDDESA 
PASCRASUTTANIDDESA - 
MAGANDIYASUTTANIDDESA - 


PunABpHEDASUTTANIDDESA - 


PREFACE 


Tug present edition of the ManiNippEss, of which the 
first volume is now issued, is based upon the following 
authorities : 

Si- The printed text in the King of Sium's edition of 
the Tipitaka, from а transcript made by Miss G. Noakes 
for Professor C. R. Lanman, and lent by him to the 
Pali Text Society to be copied. 

В° = The Phayre MS. in the British Museum, collated 
by Miss C. J. and Miss А. M. Dibben, with readings from 
the Mandalay MS., В". 

S-A Singhalese MS. lent by Professor Hhys Davids, 
collated by the same collaborators. 

Owing to the comparative lack of material, no attempt 
has been made to construct a text. The Siamese edition 
has been taken as the basis, and modified, where imperfect 
or corrupt, according to the readings of D? and 8. 

S seems to be frequently in a corrupt state, and 
variants that are evidently mere corruptions have not 
been recorded, except when they appear to rest upon 
independent readings. 

Oceasional peculiarities of spelling—e.4., Rh = у in Si, 
п for s, i for т in S—and several well-known Burmese 
spellings in B" have been ignored. 

The interesting form раса or раса (Sn. 782, 789) is 


vii 


viii Preface. 


shown by the Singhalese reading parada to be an imperfect 
of paradati, corresponding to Skt. pracadat, СТ. VV. 76, 
so mündro tassu рагай. It is not clear, however, that 
the commentary understands it in this way, as рагатай 
(parada ti) is evidently taken as a present in passages 
like p. 68, 1. 2, from below, and perhaps also p. 69, 1. 18; 
p. 86, 1. 5. 

Our thanks are due to Miss C. J. and Miss A. M. Dibben 
for the laborious work of collating the MSS. and copying 
the text, to Professor Lanman for the loan of the same, 
and to Mrs. Rhys Davids for help in identifying passages 
quoted, and for much other assistance during the printing 


of the work. 
L. DE LA VALLÉE POUSSIN. 
E. J. THOMAS. 


NAMO TASSA BHAGAVATO ARAHATO SAMMASAMDUDDIIASAA. 


Mahaniddeso. 


ATTHAKRAVAGGIKRO.? 
Pathamo  Kaànusuttaniddeso. 
Кашат káàmayamiánassa tassa ce tam 
samijjhati1, 
addhà pitimano? hoti laddhà тассо 
yad iechati. 1. 


Катат kümeayamanassa* ti. Каша ti uddánato? dve 
Каша, vatthukama ea kilesakamá ea. 

Katame vatthukàma? Manapika rupa, тапара saddā, 
manápikà слпаһа, апаріка rasa, manapika photthabba: 
attharanà papuranà : dasidasa ajelaka kukkutasükará * hat- 
thigavassavalava t khettam vatthu? айдар suvannam 
gamanigamaràjadhaniyo rattham ea janapado са koso ea 
kotthàgàran са, yam kinei rajaniyam vatthu*, vatthukamà. 
Арі ca аша Каша, anágatà kama, paceuppanna Каша; 
ajhattà kama, bahiddha Каша, ajjhattabahiddhà Каша: 
hina kama, majjhimā Каша, panità kama; арауіка kama, 
màánusikà 19° kama, dibbà Ката; paecupatthità kama, nim- 
mita Ката, paranimmità kama; pariggahità kama, apa- 


l Si ad. title : Suttantapitake Kkhuddakanikà yo. 


? Br S om. 3 В” pitimano. 

+ 5 kamayamanasga. ° p? Si udanato. 

$ В” 5 ?sukarà. T B^ ?gavassavalava. 
8 Š vatthum. 9 Si rajaniyavattliu. 
10 


Br manussaka. 


2 Atthakavaggo. [5.№. 766 


riggahita Каша; mamayità! Каша, amamáaylta ” Каша: 
sabbe pi kàmávacarà dhammà, sabbe рі гарауасага аһара, 
sabbe pi агпрауасага dhammà; tanhávatthuka tanháram- 
wana kámanlyatthena  rajaniyatthena | madaniyatthena 
Каша; ime vuecanti vatthukàma. 

Katame kilesakama ? Chando kàmo, ràgo като, chanda- 
гасо kümo, samkappo Кашо, гаво Като, samkapparnigo 
Като: уо kümesu kàmachando? kàmaràgo kàmanandi* 
kàmatanhà kamasneho kamaparilàho kàmamuechàü kamaj- 
jhosànun  kàmogho  kàmayogo  kamupàdànam kania- 
chandanivaranam— 


*Addasam Ката te inülam, samkappà kama јауцві; 
na tam samkappayissàmi, evam kama na hohisi? ti ; 
ime vuceanti kilesakama. 


Kámam* Kámayamánassaá ti Катап ё kàmayamanaesa 
icehamánassa? sádiyamünassa patthayamánassa pihaya- 
mánassa abhijappamanassa? ti, Кашат kámayamanassa. 

Tassa ce tam samijjhati ti. Tassa ce ti tassa khattiyassa 
và brahimanassa và vessassa và suddassa và gahatthassa va 
pabbajitassa và devassa và manussassa và. Tan ti vatthu- 
kama vueeanti manápikà гара, manàpikà sadda, manapika 
gandhà, manapika rasa, manāpikā photthabba. Samijhati? 
ti ijbati ? samijjhati labhati patilabhati adhigaechati vin- 
dati ti, tassa ce tam samijjhati. 

dha pitiiauo hoti ti. Addhá ti ekamsavaeanam nis- 
samsayavacanam U nikkamkhavacanam 22 advejjhavaeanam 
advelhakavüeanam — niyogavaeanam — apannakavaeanam 28 


* Јав. 1i, 450.  Maliavastu iii, 190. 


! S mináyika. ? 5 amamayika. 

3 S kāmacchando, throughout. 4 pr naudi. 

^ p? hotisi. 9 BPS on. 

T S ісепауашапавѕа. ? S abhijappalininanassa. 
9 Š samiechati. 19 S jcchanti. 

N JP nisamsaya?. ‘2 Be nikkakha?. 

13 


У apannala 


S.N. 761] Kámasuttauiddeso. З 


avatthapanavacanam etam, addhà ti ГИТ ti ya paden- 
kümagunapatisamyuttà! piti, pimujjam ?. amodaná, ра 
modanā, háso, paháso, vitti, tutthi, odagywn, attamanata? 
eittassa 4, abhipüranata* cittassa. Мано ti yam cittun 
mano mánasam hadayam pandaram mano manayatanian 
mauindriyam vilhanam viññanakkhandho. tajji? mano 
viññanadhatu : ayam vuceati mano. Ayam mano imáya 
pityà sahagato hoti, sahajato  samsuttho sampayutto 
ekuppàdo ekanirodho ekavatthuko ekáàrammauo. Puinano 
hot ti pitimano hoti? tutthamano hatthamano paliattha- 
mano attamano udaggamano  muditzunano ? pamodita- 
manot hoti ti, addhà pitimano hoti. 

Гаа macco yad icchat? tì. Laddha ti даһа labhitva 
patilabhitvà adhigantvā” vinditvā. —.Macco ?? ti satto naro 
in&navo ll poso puggalo jivo jagū?? jantu indagü !? manujo. 
Yad iechati ti yam icebati yam sadiyati vam pattheti yam 
pilieti * yam abhijappati тират vi saddam và gandham và 
rasam và photthabbam và ti, laddhà maceo!9 yad iechati 
Tew аһа Dhagava : 


Kamam kamayamanassa tassa се tum samijjhati, 
addhà pitimano hoti laddha inacco yad iechati ti. 


Tassa се kamayanassalé ehandajza- 
tassa jantuno 
te kama parihayanti, sallaviddho va 


ruppati. э, 
! Si °ваййиа, alcans. ? 5 pamojjam. 
3 5 attamana. 4 Bion. 
° Brabhipharata; S abhiparanatā. 
5 S tajjamano°. 7 $i samuditns. 
8 Si om. 9 S abhigantva. 
10 S расей. U S шапамо thronghout. 
12 Br S jagu; Si јава throughout. 
13 Si r4. hindagü. 14 Şi pihati. 
15 5 maccho. 
16 


Si Катауапапаѕѕа /hronghont, 


1 Atthakavagnqo. [5.N. T67 


Tassa ее kamajgünassü ti. Tassa ce ti tassa khattiyassu 
va bràáhmanassa vā vessassa và suddassa và gahatthassa 
và pabbajitassa va devassa và manussassa và. — Aumaya- 
uassü ti khamayamánassa! iechamünassa sadiyamanassa 
patthaviunanassa? — pihayamànassa? — abhijappamànassa. 
Athavaà kàmatanhàya yayati niyyati* vuyhati? samhari- 
vati“. Yatha hatthiyanena và "assayünen:s và? goyünena 
va ajavánena và mendakayánena? vā otthayanena và 
khirayànena уа yāyati niyyati’ vuyhati  samharlyati", 
evam eva P? kamatanhaya yayati niyyati* vuyhati samhari- 
yati! ti, tassa ce kàmayànassi. 

Chaudajàtassa jautnuo ti. Chando ti yo kàmesu. kàma- 
echando kàmaràgo kàmanandi kámatanhà kamasneho ? 
Катарашаћо kàmimueehà káàmajjhosinam kàmogho kā- 
mavogo kamupadanam kamachandanivaranam. Tassa so 
kàmachando jāto hoti, sanjàto mibbatto abhinibbatto ?? 
pátubhuto. Jantuno ti sattassa narassa münáavassa posassa 
puggalassa jrvassa jagussa! jantussa indagussa manu- 
jassa ti, chandajáatassa! jantuno. 

Te kamaq parihäđyantı ti te va 16 kama parihàyanti, so và 
kaümehl parihayati. 

hatham te Каша parihiyanti? Tassa titthantass' eva, 
te bhoge тајапо va haranti, cora và haranti, aggl và dahati, 
udalkam và vahati, *арруа và dàyadà baranti,nihitatthana 7 
và vigiechati,? duppayutta 29 và kammanta bhanjanti,?? kule 


* Cf. Khp. viii, 5. 


t В” kamena. 2 8 patthayamanassa, 
3 S pihbaminassi. 4 S niyyati. 
5 Б vusihati. 6 S samsädiyati. 
577 S ош. 5 Br 5 menda’. ? 8 samdiyyáti. 
10 Si evam оен in this contect. п S sādiyati. 
7 S kāmasiho. 13 S abhinippatto. 
14 Şi jātussa. 15 $ °ўйфавва ti. 
16 5 от. W B'nihitathana ; Si nihitam. 


P" Sinádlügaechati Э pl gacchati. 
19 S dubbayayutto. 20 5 bhafijati: 8i bhijjanti. 


S.N. 767] ANamasultauidd: во. à 


và Кшајјһарако ! uppajjati yo te bhoge vikirati vidhameti 
vidhamseti, aniecatay' eva atthami?; evam te kama hāyanti 
parihayanti paridhumsenti paripatanti?  antaradhüyanti 
vippalujjanti. 

Katham so kàmehi parihàyati? "litthant! eva те? bhogà 5, 
SO cavati marati antaradhayati vippalujjati; evam so 
kàmehi hàyati parihàyati paridhamseti paripatati antara- 
dhàyati vippalujjati. 


“Сога haranti тајапо, aggi dahati, nassati, 
atho antena jahati sarirani sapariggaliam. 
Etad aünàya medhavi bhuñjetha са dadetha ca, 
datvà са bhutvà? ca yathanubhávam 
anindito saggam upeti tbànan ti, 


te kama? parihàyanti. 

^allaviddho ra ruppati ti yathà ayomayena và sallena 
viddho, atthimayena và sallena, dantumayena và sallena, 
visàpamayena và sallena, katthamayena va sallena viddho, 
ruppati kuppati ghattiyati? piliyati, byadhito domanassito 
hoti; evam eva vatthukamanam viparinàmaniathàbhàávà 
uppajjanti sokaparidevadukkhadomanassupáyasá?, so kā- 
masallena !?ea sokasallena са 0 viddho ruppati kuppati 
ghattiyati? piliyati, byadhito domanassito hoti ti, salla- 
vildho va ruppati. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà: 


Tassa се kamüyanassa chandajàtassa jantuno 
te Каша pariháyanti, sallaviddho va ruppati ti. 


*OST1:2332; 


| В" kulaügaro; S kulumkaro. 
ВР athami. 
! 8 paripatanti: Si parieeajanti. 
Š ad. ca. ° pr S bhoge. 
7 5 kaman. 


4 
$ S sutva. 
5 5 ghatiyyati; Si ghatiyati. ° S °прауй. 
10—10 Si om. 


6 Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 768 


Yo kàme parivajjeti sappass! eva padà 


siro, 
so mam visattikam loke sato samati- 
vattati. 3. 


Yo Кате parirajjet? ti. Yo ti yo yādiso yathàyutto 
vathāvihito yathāpakāro yanthānapatto yamdhammasa- 
mannāgato khattiyo уа brahmano vā vesso vā suddo và 
gahattho vā pabbajito và devo và manusso vā. Kāme 
parivajjeti ti Лата ti uddanato* dve kama, vatthukāmā ea 
kilesakàmà cà . . . pe . . . ime vueeanti vatthukàmà . .. 
pe... ime vuccanti kilesakama. Кате parivajjeti ti 
dvihi kàranehi Кате parivajjeti, vikkhambhanato và sa- 
inueehedato và. 

Katham vikkhambhanato káme parivajjeti? | Atthikam- 
kalüipama? kama appassádatthenà ti passanto vikkhamı- 
bhanato kame parivajjeti. Mamsapesüpamàa 4 kama bahu- 
sadharanatthenà ti passanto vikkhambhanato Кате pari- 
vajjeti. Tinukküpamà? kama anudahanatthenà ti passanto 
vikkhambhanato  kàme  parivajjeti. | Aüngárakasüpamaà © 
kama maháparilàhatthena ti passanto vikkhambhanato 
Кате parivajjeti. Supinaküpamà Каша ittarapaceupat- 
thànatthena? ti passanto vikkhambhanato Кате pari- 
vajjeti. Yaeitakupama kama távakalikatthena ti passanto 
vikkhambhanato kàme  parivajjeti. — Rukkhaphalüpamà 
kama sambhanjanaparibhanjanatthenaà 5 ti passanto, vik- 
khambhanato Кате parivajjeti. Asisünüpamà Каша adhi- 
kuttanatthena" ti passanto vikkhambhanato Кате pari 
vajjeti. Sattisulüpamà 10 Ката vinivijjanatthena ti passanto 
vikkhambhanato kame parivajjeti. | Sappasirüpamaà Каша 


Si sapasseva, and below варо, ѕараѕіго: BF sabbasseva. 
Codd. udánuto. 

3? atthikankalupamaà ; S athikamkophapaima. 

4 D? арата. | Cf. M. i, 130; 364 /. 


5 5 tintakkupamā. 6 S unkaharakasupama. 
7? 8 dhuttara?. 8 8 ?paribhunjum?. 


э B? adhikuttena?: S adhikutthana? : Si adhikantana?. 
10 S satthi?. 


S.N. 768 Kaāmasultaniddeso. i 


sappatibhayatthena ti равваріо vikkhambhanato.— kāme 
parivajPti. Asgikhandhüpama! Каша mahàábhitapanat- 
thená? ti passanto vikkhambhanato Капе purivajjeti. 

Buddhànussatim? bhàvento pi* vikkhambhanato liue 
parivajjeti, dhammaánussatim bhàvento pi . . . pe. 
sanghànussatim bhàvento рі, silànussatim bhāvento рі, 
cagánussatim bhàvento pi, devatànussatim bhavento pi, 
ànápànassatim 5 bhàvento рі, maranassatnn? bhàvento pi, 
kàyagatàsatim bhavento pi "vikkhaimbhanato Кате pari- 
vajjeti?, upasamanussatim bhavento pi vikkhambhanato 
кате parivajjeti, pathamam Jhànam bhàvento pi vikkham- 
bhanato Кате parivajjeti, dutiyan 8 jhànum bhávento pi. 
tatlyam jháünam bhávento pi, catuttham jhànam bhàvento 
pi. àákàsànancayatanasamapattim" bhàvento рі, vinnan- 
aBeàyatanasamapattim bhàvento pi, akineannáyatanasamá- 
pattim bhavento pi, nevasannanásannàáyatanasamapattim 
bhavento pi vikkhambhhanato káme parivajjeti. хат 
vikkhambhanato Кате parivajjeti. 

Каат samuechedato line parivajjeti 2 Sotapatti- 
maggam bhàvento pi apàyagamanive Кате samuechedato 
parivajjeti, sakadágamimaggam !? bhavento рі olarike Каше 
sumuechedato parivajjeti, anagümimaggam bhavento ji 
anusahagate káme samuechedato parivajjeti, arahatta- 
maggam bhávento pi sabbena sabbam sabbathà sabbam 
asesam nissesam samuccehedato Кате parivajjett. Evam 
saimuechedato кате parivajjeti 11, vo Кате parivajjeti. 

Sappass Y era pada siro ti. Nappo vuccati ahi. keu' 
atthena sappo?  Sumnsappanto sacehati ti sappo. Bhu- 


t S aggikkhandu?. 2 Si mahaggitápana?. 
3 У зза (йош Cr А. i, 30, 42. 
4 Som. 5 S anápánánussati ; Si ànàpàunssatin 


* S marananussati; Si maranánussatim. 
© Br S om. 
S dutivajjhànau, tatiyajjhànam, ete. 
Š “samapatti throughout. 9 Br sakaq°. 
Si hus sapass’ eva, sappo, samsapanto: Š sabba, sada, 
ѕарро. 


11 


5 Afthakavaggo. [8.N. 768 


janto gacchati ti bhujago; urena gacchati ti urago ; pan- 
nasiro gacehati ti pannago ; sirena! supati? ti sirimsapo?: 
vile^ sayati ti vilasayo*; guhāyam seti? ti guhàsayo; 
dàth& tassa àvudho ti dāthāvudho 8; visam tassa ghoran 
ti ghoraviso; jivhà tassa duvidhà? ti dujivho?; dvihi 
jivhàhi rasam sāyatī ti dvirasannü?.  Yathà puriso jivitu- 
като amaritakamo sukhakāmo dukkhapatikkülo!? pàdena 
sappasiram vajjeyya!' vivajjeyya parivajjeyya abhinivaj- 
jeyya, evam eva sukhakàmo dukkhapatikkulo 20 Кате 
vajjeyya vivajjeyya parivajjevva abhinivajjeyya ti, sap- 
pass' eva pada siro. 

So те visattikai loke sato samuatirattatt ti. So ti yo 
Кате parivajjeti. Visattika масса tanhà, yo rago sárago 
anunayo anurodho nandi!* nandirágo??, cittassa вагадо, 
ісспа muechā !? ajjhosinam gedho!* paligedho !? sango !9 
panko ejā тауа janika saBjanani sibbini! jálini sarità 
visattika suttam visatà ayühani!5 dutiyà panidhi bhava- 
netti vanam vanatho santhavo sneho apekkhà patibandh: 
asà àsimsana!? asimsitattam??, гправа saddāsā gandhasa 
rasásà?  photthabbásà làbhasà dhanàsà puttasa jivitasà, 
јарра рајарра abhijappà јаррапа ? рајаррапа jappitatiam, 
loluppa 23 Јоіаррауапа loluppáyitattam, muechancikatà ?*, 
sadhukamyatá, adhammaràgo, visamalobho, nikanti nika- 
шапа patthanà ріһапа sampatthanà, kàmatanhà bhava- 


1 S sarena; Si sirena. * Be sappati [supati - srpati]. 
з В’ sarisappo ; 5 sirimsappo : Si sirisapo. 

* B» 8 bil, ^ D" sayati. 

$ Si 8 dáàdha, dáadha". т Š dvividha. 

8 BP dujjivo; S dujjivho; Si dujivha. 

" Si dirasannu. 10 Codd. ?patikkulo. 

11 


B vajjeyya throughout. 
12 D" nandi, nandirágo. (7. Dhs. 3 1059. 


15 K on. 14 S rodho. 2 $ palirodho. 
96 Si c.l. вао. 17 8 saphini 18 Dr ayühini. 
19 5 asisanà. 20 5 ügigitattam. 21 Si om. 
7 S јаррпа; Si јарра. = Br S loluppam. 


24 Br mueehanjikatà ; S suvaneikatà. 


S.N. 768] Kāmusuttaniddeso. T 


tanhà vibhavatanháà rüpatanha arüpatauha niodhatauha 
rüpatanha!, saddatauha gandhatanha rasatanhà photthab- 
batanhi dhaummatanhà; ogho yogo gantho? upadanam 
áàvaranam nivarauam chadanam bandhanam? apakkileso 
anusayo рагпуп апаш lata, veviecham  dukkhamülam 
dukkhanidànam 4 dukkhappabhavo, márapáso marabalisam 
máravisayo, tanhanadi tanhàjálam tuihagaddulin ° tanha- 
samuddo, abhijjlià, lobho ukusalamuülam. 

Visattiká ti. Кеп atthena visattika ? Visatà " ti visattikà, 
visälā ti visattika, visati 7 ti visattika 8, visakkati? ti 
visattikà, visamharati ti visattika, visamvadika !? ti visat- 
tika, visumülà ti visattika, visaphalà ti visatüilà, visa- 
paribhogà ti visattikà; visalà và pana sā "rüpe tanhaH, 
sadde gandhe rase photthabbe kule gane avase labhe vase 
pasamsáya sukhe civare pindapüte senásane gilànapac- 
eayabhesajjaparikkhare kamadhátuya rüpadhatuya aru- 
padhátuyà kàmabbave rüpabhave arüpabhave saññabhave 
asaünübhave nevasaññanasaññabhave ekavokarabhave catu- 
vokàrabhave pancavokarabhave atite anàgate. paceuppanne 
ditthasutamutavinnàtabbesu dhammesu visatà vitthatà ti, 
visattikà. 

Loke ti apáyaloke manussaloke devaloke khandhaloke 
dhátuloke àyatanaloke. 

Sato ti eatühi karanehi sato, kaye hàyünupassanásati- 
patthànam bhàvento sato, vedanasu сіе 12 dhammesu 
dhammánupassanásatipatthànam bhávento sato. Aparehi 
рі eatühi Кагапећі sato, asatiparivajjanaya sato, satikaraui- 
yànaü ea dhammaànam katattà sato, satipatipakkhànam P? 
dhaminànam  hatattà sato, satinimittànum dhammanan 
51 ош. ? B" S gandho. 

š Š bandanam ; Si phandanain. 
1 Bi rd. ?nidhanain. 


5 В» 8 ?gadulam ; Si gaddalain. 5 S visabha. 

* Š visahna. ` S ad. visahá ti visatttika. 
э S visattati. 1" S охааа. 

и-и Вэ S tanhà rüpe. "U S cittesu. 


1 В" 9patibandhánam : S paripattànain. 


10 Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 768 


appamutthattà! sato. Aparehi pi eatühi kàranehi sato, 
satiyà samannagatattà 2 sato, satiya vasitattà sato, satiya 
pàguniatüya? sato, satiyà apaeeorohanataya sato. Aparehi 
pi catühi káranehi sato, satattà? sato, santattà sato, sami- 
tattā вафо, santadhammasamannagatattà sato.  Buddhà- 
nussatiyà? sato, dhammanussatiyá sato, sanighánussativa 
sato, silànussatiyà sato, сасапазвайуа sato, devatánussatiyà 
sato, ànàpanasatiyà вафо, maranasatiyà © sato, küyagatà- 
satiyà sato, upasamānussatiyā sato. Yà sati anussati 
patissati sati? saranatà dharanatá apilāpanatā asammussa- 
nata? sati satindriyam satibalam sammasati°? satisam- 
bojjhango ekàyanamaggo, ayam vuceati sati. Imaya satiyā 
пребо hoti, samupeto!? upàgato ! samupagato12 upapanno 
samupapanno?? samannagato !*, so vuceati sato. 

So "main. visattikan loke sato seinativattati tì уа) loket 
visattikā, imam 15 loke  visattikum sato tarati uttarati 
patarati samatikkamati vitivattati ti, so "mam visattikam 
loke sato samativattati ti. Теп’ aha Bhagavā: 


Yo Кате parivajjeti sappass' eva pada siro, 
Зо эташ visattikam loke sato samativattati ti. 


khettam vatthum hiraünam và gavàs- 
samP dàsaporisam 

thiyo? bandhü puthü? каше yo naro 
anugijjhati. 4. 


3" asaammutthànam : 5 asadutthattà. 
BD" sampannàgatattà, often. 


t 


3 8 paraññataya. ^ p" 8 sattattà. 

5 S ad. muddha. 9 Si maranánussaltiya. 

7 S an. 8 Si assammnussanatà: S asammuyhasanta. 
9 S samasali. 10 S ad. hoti. 

1 Sr upagato. 12 Si samupagato. 

13 pr S sampanno. ^ pr sampannãgato. 

15 D^ S om. 16 BP S ad. và ва. 

U D? ad. vu iam : S ed. vă. 

18 DP gavassam. о p" tivo. 


^ p.T.S. puthu. 


S.N. 769] Kàmasuttaniddeso, 11 


Khettam гани hiraññam vt ti. Khettan ti salikhettani 
vihikhettam  muggakhettam  inàsakhettam — yavakhettain 
godhümakhettam' tilakhettam. Ганин ti gharavatthu = 
kotthavatthu?  purevatthu — paeehàvatthu aramavatthu 
viharavatthu. Miraññan ti hiratüumn * vueeati. kahapano? 
ti, khettam vatthum hirannam уй. 

Gavāssam dásaporisan. ti. Garan ti gavo? vuceanti. 
Азвй ti pasukadayo 7 vuccanti. Гахе ti eattaro Паѕа, anto- 
Jatako даво, dhanakkitako 8 даво, samam vā dasavisayam ? 
upeti, akamako19 và Паѕахіѕдуат? upeti. 


*Amaya ! dasa pi bhavanti 7 eke. 
dhanena kitā pi bhavanti dasa. 
вашай са еке upayanti Даѕаш. 
bhaya 2 panunnà рі bhavantt дава. 


Porisan? ti tayo purisà, bhataka !* kammakarā upajivino 
ti, gavássam dásaporisum. 

Thiyo bandhaü puthü Бане ti. Thiyo tí itthipariggaho 
vueeali.  Bandhü ti cattàro bandhu, Bàtibandhava pi 
bandhu, gottabandhavà pi bandhu, mantabandhava pi 
bandhu, sippabandhavü pi bandhu.  Puthü Кате ti bahu 
каше, ete puthū Ката manápikà гира... pe . . . mand- 
ріка photthabba ti, thiyo bandhu puthà kāme. 

Yo naro anugijhuti ti. Yo ti yo yüdiso yatháyutto 
yathávihito уааракаго  yanthánapatto | yamdhamina- 
Samaunágatolé khattiyo và brühmauo và vesso và suddo và 


* Jàt. vi, 285. 


1 Codd. godhuma?. 2 BPN ?vatthium throughout. 
3 B? kotthagavatthum : Š onm. + Siom. 

5 S Каһарапако. 9 D" gava. 

7 B" Š passukàyo. 8 S dhantako. 


? Si дазауіуми ; Š даѕарат, dasavisayain. 


19 S ad. mà. H Sahaya, 
? Š bhayüparunná. 7 В" punsá : 5 purisan 
14 


S bhatika; Si bhajakà. 15 pr ?sanipannügato. 


15 Atthakavaggo. [8.N. 770 
gahattho và pabbajito và devo và manusso và. Naro ti 
satto naro manavo poso puggalo jivo јава jantu indagu 
manujo. Динде! tì kilesakàmena vatthukàmesu gij- 
jbati anugijhati paligijhati palibajjhat: ti, yo! naro 
anugijbati. Ten'àha Bhagavà: 


Khettiun vatthum гайбат và gavàssam dásapori- 
sam 
thiyo bandhü puthü Кате yo naro anugijjhati. 


Abala nam baliyanti maddante nam 
parissayà&, 
into nam dukkham anveti, nàvam bhin- 


nam ivodakam. 5. 


dbal паз baliyauti ti. Abalā ti аһа КПеѕа dubbala 
аррар appathāmakā hina nihinà parihina? omakā lāmakā 
jatukkà? рага. Te ЕЦева tam puggalam sahanti pari- 
salanti abhibhavanti ajjhottharanti puriyadiyanti mad- 
danti ti, evam pl араа nam baliyanti. 

4 Athavà abalam? puggalam dubbalam appabalam appa- 
thamakam hinin nibinam parihinam? omakam làimakain 
jatukkam — parittam, yassa п’ аһ saddhàbalam viri- 
yabalam satibalam  samádhibalam pannabalam) hiribalam 
ottappabalam, te kilesā tam puggalam sahanti parisahanti 
abhibhavanti ajjhottharanti? pariyádiyanti maddantī ti, 
evam pi араја nam baliyanti. 

Jladdante nam рагіххауа ti, 9DParissayá 1 9 dve parissaya, 
рака pavissayà са райсераппариіввцуа са. 

Katae pàkataparissaya 2 Ма byagghà dipt-accha?- 
taracchà Кока 8 gomahisa" Һат" ahi-viechikà. satapadi 


! p" bhiyo. ? D" om. 
CO Bh ehatnkka Giroijhodt. 
аз S atha balam. 
5 8 ajjhottaranti fhronghout. 6-6 S Si ош, 
7 p" aceha°. 
` B nakomahiya, 
» B" analisa. 10 p? Һай. 


S.N. 110] Катахабн ехо, 13 


сога và assu, màuavà vài! katakumma уй akatakammā 
а, eakkhurogo sotarogo ghānarogo jivhárogo kāvarogo 
sisarogo kaunarogo mukharogo dantarogo káso saso pináso 
dàho? jaro kucehirogo muechà pakkhandikà sülà ^ visücika? 
kuttham gaudo kiliso soso аратаго daddu kandu kacchu 
rakhasà vitaeehika lohitapittam? madhumeho amsa pilaka 
bhagandalà, pittasamutthana арааһа, semhasamutthànà 
üábadhà, vàtasamutthana abàdha, sannipátikà арааһа, utu- 
pariuàmajà арааһа, visiunaparihárajà abadha, opakkamika 
арааһа, kammavipákajà abadba, situm. пишип jighaechá 
ріраѕа ueeüro passivo damsamakasavátátapasirimsapa- 
samphassa? iti và?, ime vuceanti pakataparissayà. 

Katame patieehannaparissayà ? Kayaducearitum vaci- 
ducearitam manoduecaritam, kamachandanivaranain Dvapa- 
danivaranam thinamiddhantvarauaun uddhaecakukkuccani- 
"агарат  vielkicehanrvaranam, гаро doso moho kodho 
upanáho makkho paláso 1884 maeehariyam maya satheyyam 
thambho sarambho mano atimáno mado pamado, sabbe 
kilesa, ѕарре dueearità, sabbe darathà, sabbe parilaha, 
sabbe вапбара, sabbákusalibhisamkhara?; ime vuccunti 
patiechannapuarissayiü. 

Parissuyd ti ken' atthena parissaya? — Parisahanti'" ti 
parissuyá, parihànaya sumvattanti ti рагіѕѕауа, tat аѕаха 
ti, рагіѕѕауа. 

Katham parisahanti" ti parissaya 2 Te parissayà tum 
puggalam sahanti parisahanti abhibhavanti ajjhottharanti 
pariyadiyanti maddanti; evam parisahanti ti, parissayi. 

Каат parihaniya samvattanti ti рагіѕвауа? "Te 
parissayà ! kusalinam dhammánam ралһапауа 2° antarā- 
yaya samvattanti. Katamesam kusalànum dhammanam ? 
Sunmiápatipadàya  anulomapatipadays apaccanikapatipn- 


1 Si om, 2 Som. 
3 Codd. daho. 
S visuci. Б” St lohitam pittam. 
B" pasávo. D" ?sarisapa?. 

Si sabbe К. 10 5 parissahbanti H-H Sim. 
B" S ant&ráàyaya paribanaya (ireughont. 


Codd. sulà. 


а ow 
o Oo + 


o 


- 
t 


14 Atthakacaquo. [S.N. 770 


dàya anvatthapatipadáya dhammaànudhammapatipadáya. 
silesu. paripürikaritaya !, indriyesu guttadvárataya, bhojane 
mattannutaya, jágariyanuyogassa, satisampajannassa, ca- 
tunnam  satipatthanànam  bhavanánuyogassa, eatunnam 
sammappadhananam bhàvanáànuyogassa, eatunnam iddhip- 
padanam bhávanánuyogassa, paneannam indriyinam bhà- 
vanánuyogasss, paBcannam balinam bhávanánuyogassa, 
satíannum — bojjhangànam — bháàvananuyogassa, ariyassa 
atthaüngikassa maggassa bhüvanánuyogassa. Imesam kusa- 
linn dhammanam ралһапауа antarày&ya samvattanti; 
evam parihanàya samvattanti ti, parissayá. 

Каат tatr аѕауа ti parissaya ? — Tatth' ete рарака 
akusalà dhammà uppajjanti attabhavasannissaya ; yathà 
bile bilàsayà? pana sayanti, dake дакаѕауа З рапа sayanti. 
vane vanasaya рапа sayanti, rukkhe rukkhásayà pana 
suyanti, evam eva tatth' ete pāpaka ukusalà dhamma 
uppajjanti attabhàvasannissayá?, evam pi фай” авауа ti. 
parissaya. 

Vuttam h’ etam Dhagavatà: * Santevasiko5 bhikkhave 
bhikkhu sáeariyako ê dukkham na phàsu viharati. Kathan 
ea bhikkhave bhikkhu sántevasiko? sáeariyako 8 dukkham 
па рраѕа viharati?  Idha bhikkhave bhiklhuno cakkhuna 
гарат disvà uppajjanti? рарака akusalà dhamma sarasam- 
карра 9 samyojauiys. ty assa anto vasanti anvavasanti 11 
papaka akusalà dhamma ti, tasmà santevasiko ti vuceati: 
te nam samudaearanti 12samudaearanti nam!? !3pàápaka 
akusalà dhaminá ti, tasmā sācariyako 14 ti vuceati. Puna 

* S. iv, 136. 


! BI paripura?, * B bhilalayàya. 
* 5 dakavasuya. ? Siad. ti. 
5 B" sinte?: 5 sa ante”. ° B ва àncariyako. 
7 У untevasiko. ` BS acariyako. 
CO Bad. ye. 10 D? вагавиџарра; 5 parasamkappa. 
" BP unvasavanii; Si anvassavanti, here and below. 
12 12 BI om. 135 S ad. và. 


15 S aeartyako. 


S.N. 770] Kamasuttaniddeso. 15 


с’ aparam bhikkhave bhikkhuno sotena saddam sutva, 
ghànena gandham ghàyitvà, jivhàya rasam sāyitvā, Кауела 
photthabbam phusitvà!, manasa dhaminam viññaya uppaj- 
janti ?pàpakà akusalà dhammà sarasamkappà? samyo- 
janiya, ty assa anto vasanti anvavasantt рарака akusala 
dhammà ti, tasmà santevàsiko* ti vuecati; te nam samu- 
dàearanti *samudaearanti nam 5 рарака akusala dhammnáà 
ti, tasmá sáearlyako? ti vuecati. Evam kho bhikkhave 
bhikkhu sántevàsiko saeariyako dukkham na phasu ? viha- 
rati ti, evam ' pl ќаш” àsayà ti, parissayà. 

Vuttam h’ etam Bhagavatà: “Tayo me bhikkhave 
aniaràámalà  antarà-amittaà antarásapattà antarüvadhaka 
antaràpaecatthiká?. | Katame tayo? Lobho bhikkhave 
antaràmalam? antarà-amitto antarasapatto antar&vadhako 
antaràpaceatthiko. 20 Doso bhikkhave antarāmalam ° 
autari-amitto antarásapatto antarāvadhako antarāpaccat- 
thiko?%. Moho bhikkhave antaràmalam?  antarü-umitto 
antarāsapatto antarāvaądhako antarápaceatthiko. Ime kho 
bhikkhave tayo antarāmalā antará-amittà antarásapattàü 
autaràvadhaka antarápaccatthikà ti. 


Anatthajanano lobho, lobho eittappalopano, 

bhayam antarato jàtam tam jano navabujjhati. 

Luddho attham na }апай, laddho (һатта na passati : 
andham l tamam tada hoti, yam lobho sahate nara. 
Anatthajanano doso, doso eittappakopano, 

bhayam antarato jàtam tam jano nàvabujjhati. 

Kuddho attham na jànáti, kuddho dhammam na passati; 
andham tamam tadà hoti, yam kodho sahate латат. 


* Ite, š 88. 


1 B? phussitva. ? B" S ad. уе. 

3 $ para?. * S ante? 979 Ni om. 
9 8 sacarlyassako. 17 Si viharati evam. 

8 S ad. ti. 9 Si malo. 


0-10 рь 5 Дово ... ре... 
"В" Si andhatamanm  Ürroughiodut, 


16 Afthakavaggo. (S.N. 770 


Anatthajanano moho, moho cittappakopano, 

bhayam antarato jàtam tam jano nàvabujjhati. 

Мао attham na jànàti, mulho dhammam na passati ; 
andham tamam tadà hoti, yam moho sahate naram, 


evam pl tat’ ásayá ti parissaya 11}. 

Vuttam ?h' etam Bhagavatà: *Tayo kho таһагаја 
purisassa dhammā ajjhattam uppajjamána uppajjanti 
ahitàya dukkhàya aphàsuvibaràya. Katame tayo? | Lobho 
kho? maharaja purisassa dhammo ajjhattam uppajjamaáno 
uppajjati ahitàya dukkháya apháüsuviharaya. Doso kho 
maharaja * purisassa dhammo  ajjhaitam  uppajjamáno 
uppajjati ahitaya dukkhàya aphàsuviharaya?*. Moho kho 
maharaja purisassa dhammo  ajjhattam | uppajjamàno 
uppajjati ahitaya dukkhaya aphasnviharaya. Ime kho 
шаһагаўа tayo purisassa dhamma ajjhattam uppajjamánà 
uppajjanti ahitaya dukkhaya aphásuviháráya ti ?. 

Lobho doso са moho ca purisam pápaeetasam 
bimsanti attasambhüta tacasiüram va samphalan ° ti. 
evam рі tatr’ авауа ti parissaya. 

Vuttam pi ¢ etam ? Bhagavatà : 

+Касо ea doso ca itonidanà 
arati rati lomahamso ito jàto" 
ito samutthaya manovitakkaá 
kumarakà dhamkam? iv’ ossajjanti? ti, 
evam pi tatr asaya tà, parissayá. 

Maddaute nam parissayā ii te parissayà tam puggalaimn 
sahanti parisahanti abhibhavanti ajjhottharanti pariyadi- 
yanti maddanti ti, maddante nam рагіввауа. 


* S.i, 70; c 98 and Itv. Š 50. T Su. 971. 


POS ow. ? S ad. pi. 

5 Br S on. 4-4 B" pe. 

^ S sibalan. 6 Si vuitam b’ etam. 
? Dr ito jalà ; 5 1tojà. 8 8 munkam. 


9 p" osajanti. 


S.N. 770] Kümasuttanidieso, 17 


Tato nam dukkham anveti ti. lato ti! tato tato paris- 
sayato tam puggalam dukkha anvet! anugacchati апуаут- 
kam hoti; jàtidukkham архей anugacchati anvayrkan 
hoti, jarádukkham  anveti anugaechati anvayikam hoti, 
byüdhidukkham anveti anugacchati anvayikum hoti, 
maranadukkham апуеы anugaechati anvayikam hoti, 
sokaparidevadukkhadoianassupay asadulklimn anveti anu- 
gaechati anvayikaur hoti, neraylkam 2 dukkhiin, tirac- 
chànayonikum dukkham, petavisaylkam ° dukkham anveti 
&nugaechati anvayikam hoti, manusakam dukkham, 
gabbhe okkantimulakam 4 dukkham, баре thitinuulakim 
dukkham, gabbha? vuatthiņamūlıkun dukkhiun, jātass’ 
upanibaudhikum 9? — dukkham, — jatassa — paràdheyyakam 
duklkham, attapalikamadukkhan, parupakkamaduaklham 7 
anveti anugaechati anvayikum hoti; dukkhadukkham an- 
veti anugaechati anvayikam hoti, samkharadukkham 
viparinàümaduhkhan,  cakkhurozo  sotarogo — ghánarogo 
jivhárogo káyarogo sisarogo haunnarogo mukharogo dan- 
tarogo kaso sáso pináso düho? jaro kuechirogo mucchi 
pakkhandika sūlā visücikà kuitham gando kilàso soso 
apamaro daddu kandu kaechu rakhasā vitaechikà lohita- 
pittam madhumeho amsa pilaka bhagaudala, pittasamut- 
ара abadha, semhasamutthána арааһа, vàtasamutthana 
арааһа, sannipatika | abadha,  utuparinàmajà араара, 
visamaparihàrajà ābādđhā. opakkamikà ābādhā. kammavi- 
ракаја абаййа, stam ugham jighaechā pipasa uccaro pas- 
sivo — damsamakasavatatapasirimsapasam phassadulkkham, 

. mátumaranadukkhain? pitumaranadukkham bhlatumarana- 
dukkham  bhaginimaranadukkham — puttamaranaduakkhan: 


1-1 Si om. 
2 Si nerayikadukkham, ?yonikadulkkliiun, ete. 
3 Si petavisayaduklkhiun. 5 Si gabbhokkanti?. 
° Bi gabbhav . $ p" S ?bandhakam. 
7 


Si parapakkama? ; B? parüpakkamam d °: 5 paru- 
ратат dukkhan. 

8 Codd. daho. 

9 Br S °maranam dukkham Шоно. 


18 Atthakavaqguqo. (S.N. 110 


dhitumaranadukkhim naátibvasanadukkham bhogabyasana- 
dukkham rogabyasanadukkham silabyasanadukkham dit- 
thibvasanadukkham anveti anugaechati anvayikanm hoti ti, 
tato nam dukkham anveti. 

Хаган bhiunay ivodakan tà yathà bhinnam navam! tato 
tato адакат anveti anugacehati anvayikam hoti, purato pi 
udakam anveti anugaechati anvàylkam hoti, paechato pi, 
hetthato pi, passato pi udakam anveti anugaechati anvàyi- 
kam hoti; evam eva tato tato parissayato tam puggalam 
dukkham anveti anugaechati anvayikam hoti, jatiduk- 
kham“ anveti anugaechati anvayikam hoti... pe... 
ditthibyasanadukkham  anveti anugacchati  anvayikam 
hoti ti, паташ bhinnam ivodakam. — 'l'en' аһа Bhagavà : 


Араа nam baliyanti, maddante nam рагіввауа, 
tato nam dukkham anveti, navam bhinnam ivodakan 
ti 


Tasmā jantu sadà sato Кашапі pari- 
vajjaye, 

te pahāya tare ogham, nàvam sitvā 
và paragu. 


©» 


Тахта jantu хаба suto ti. Tasmā tìi tasma tamkàrana 
tamhetu tappaecayü tamnidana? etam ádinavam sampas- 
samaáno kàmesü ti, tasma.  Jantü bi satto naro mànavo 
poso puggalo jivo jagü jantu indagü manujo. Sada tà 
sadā sabbadà sabbakalum піссакајат dhuvakàlam satatam 
samitam abboechinnam * poükhánuponkham?, udakummi- 
kājātam ê aviei suntatisahitam ^ phusitam? purebhattam 


В” Si ad. ndakam аптауікаш : S ad. dakam ehito. 
8 jatikam dukkham. 
Si c.l. tamnidānam. 
13” abbokinnati ; 8 abbokinnam. 
S pokhanumpokham ; Si рокрапирокһаш. 
з” udakumikajatam ; 5 / udakumikajàtam: i uda- 
каниш ајдан, 
T S suntasayitam. 8 B" phassitan. 


w 


I 


S.N. 771] Kämasuttaniddeso. 19 


pacchābhattam  purimayámam  majjhimayaàmam pacchi- 
mayāmam kāle junhe vasse hemante gimhe, purime vayo- 
khandhe, majjhime vayokhandhe, pacchime vayokhandhe. 
Sato ti catühi kāranehi sato, kaye kāyāņnupassanāsati- 
patthanam Бһауепбо sato, vedanasu citte dhainmesu 
dhammānupassanāsatipatthīnam bhàvento sato; aparehi! 
рї eatühi kàranehi sato .. . ре... so vuccati sato ti, 
tasma jantu sada sato. 

Катан. pariva]jaye ti. Kámáni? ti uddanato dve kama, 
vatthukama ca kilesukuma ca . . . pe... ime vuecanti 
vatthukümàü . .. pe... ime vuceanti kilesakama. 

Kamani parivajjaye ti dvihi karanehi káme pariva]- 
Jeyya, vikkhambhanato và samuechedato và. 

Каат vikkhambhanato kame parivajjeyya? — Atthi- 
kamkalüpamá kama appassadatthenà ti passanto vik- 
khambhanato käme parivajjeyya; mamsapesüpamaà Каша 
bahusadhárauatthenà ti passanto vikkhambhanato küme 
parivajjleyya ; tinukkupama Каша anudahanatthena ti 
passanto vikkhambhanato Кате parivajjeyya . . . pe... 
nevasahnanasaniüayatanasamapattim  bhàvento pi^ vik- 
khambhanato küme parivajjeyya. Evam vikklhambhanato 
кате parivajjeyya. . . pe . . . evam samucchedato Каше 
parivajjeyya ti, kamani parivajjaye. 

Te pahüya tare oghan tìi. Te ti vatthukàme parijanitvu, 
kilesakame раһауа  pajahitvü — vinoditvà  byantikaritvà 
anabhávam gamitvi?, kamaehandanivaranam pahaya paja- 
һуа vinoditvà byantikaritvà anabháàvam gamitva, Буара- 
dauivarunam?  thinamiddhanivaranam — uddhaecakukkuc- 
canivaranam viclkiechànivaranam paháya pajahitvà vino- 
ditvà byantikaritvà anabhavam  gamitvà, kamogbham 
bhavogham ditthogham avijogham  tareyya  uttareyya 
patareyya samatikkameyya vitivatteyyà ti, te pahaya ° taro 
ogham. 


r BP S от. = p» $ Каша. 
3 BPom. 

* B? gumetvà throughout. 

? pP S ad. pe. $ S pahà. 


20 Atthakavaggo. FS.N. 771 


Хаган sural ca paragü ti yathà ё garukam лбе 
bharikam  udakam  sitrá osiheitvà chaddetvà lahukhaya 
náàvàya khippam lahum appalasiren! eva param gaechevya: 
evam eva vatthukáme parijānitvā, kilesakame раһауа 
pajahitvà vinoditvaà byantikaritvaà anabhaávam gamitvā, 
kamachandanivaranam — byápáàdanivaranam — thinamid. 
dhanivaranam  uddhaecakukkuccanivaragan — vieiliechàni- 
varanam pahàya pajahitvà vinoditvà byantikaritvà ana- 
bhāvam gamitvà, khippiun lahum appakasiren' eva param 
gacebevya.  P'aram vuceati amatam nibbàinam; yo so sab- 
basamkhàrasamatho sabbüpadhipatinissaggo tanhakkhayo 
virágo nirodho nibbanam; param gaecheyya, param adhi- 
сасеһехуа, param phuseyya. pàram saeclikareyya páragà 
ti; yo рі param gantukàmo so pi pàragü, yo pi param 
gacchati so pi paragu. yo pl paran gato so pi pàragu. 

Vuttam? L’ etam Dhagavatà:* "Tino páragato* thale 
titthati bráhmano ti. ?Bráàhmano ti” kho bhikkhave ara- 
hato etam adhivacanani; so abhinnaparagü pariññaparasu 
pahànapáragü Dhavanaparaen sacchikiriyaparaen sama- 
pattiparaen: abhinñaparaeü sabbadhammanam, pariñna- 
piragt sabbadukkhānam, pahanapáragü sabbakilesanan, 
bhávanüparagü catunnam nariyamaggànam, saceehikiriya- 
pAragü nirodhassa, samápattiparagü sabbasamapattinam ; 
ьо vuasippaito püramippatio ariyasmim silasmim, vasip- 
patto pàramippatto ariyusmim samádhismim, vasippatto 
pàrümippatto ariyaya раййауп, vasippatto paramippatto 
ariyaya  vimuttiyà ; so  pàragato 4 pàrappatto, antn- 
subo antappaétto, kotigato kotippatto, pariyantagato pari- 
vantappatto, vosanagato vosanappatto, tinagato tānap- 
patto, lenagato lenappatto, saranagato saranappatto, abha- 
vagato  abhayappatto, aceutagato aceutappatto, amata- 
gato —aumatappatto,  nibbànagato — uibbànappatto ; — so 
vutthavüso  cinnacarano  gataddho gatadiso gatakotiko 
pülitabrahimaearivo — nttamaditthuppatto — bhàvitamaggo 


S. mos 


!1 S Һа бесеу Sl sibvà . + . кета. 


=" NL om. 5 B ad. pl. а Br S pāramgato. 


S.N. 771] Künmasuttaniddeso. 2l 


palinakileso  patividdhákuppo  sacchikutanirodho ; duk- 
kham tassa pariihàtam, samudayo pahino, maggo bhavito, 
nirodho sacehikato, abhinneyyam ардап, parinnevy- 
vam parinüátam, pahātabbam — pahinam, bhavetabbam 
bhávitim, sacehikatabbam sacehikatam : во ukkhittapa- 
ligho siunkinnaparikho? abbülhesiko niraggalo uriyo pan- 
naddhajo — pannabhàáro — visamyutto — paücangavippahino 
chalangasamannágato ekürakkho eaturápasseno panuuna- 
рассеКаѕиссо? sumavayasatthesano? inivilasamkappo pa~- 
saddhakayasamkhàaro suviniuttacitto * suvimuttapaníio ke- 
vali vusitava uttamapuriso paramapuriso paramapattip- 
patto. So п’ eva депа, na apaeinati, apacinitva (hito; 
п’ eva pajahati, na upàádiyati, pajahitvà thito; ?n' eva 
visineti?, na ussineti, visinetva ê thito ; n eva vidhupeti. na 
siundhupeti?, vidhupetva 160 ; asekkhena? silakkhandhena 
samannagatatti  thito, asekkhena  samadhikkhandhbena, 
asekkhena pannakkhandheua, asekkhena  vimuttikkhan- 
dhena, asekkhena vimuttininadassanakkhandhena saman- 
паса thito: saccam —patipidayitva 9 thito, ejam 10 
saumtikkamitva thito, kilesageim pariyadayitva ! thito, 
aparigamanatüya thito, katam 12 samádáya thito, mutti- 
patisevanatüya thito, mettaya parisuddhisa thito, karu- 
паха muditaya upekkhaya pnrisuddhiva thito, aecaunta- 
pivisuddhiva 13 thito, akammannatàya P párisuddhivà thito. 
vunuitatta thito, santussitattà hito. khandhaparivaute 
thito, dhàtupariyante thito, ivatanaparivante thito, gati- 
pariyante thito, upapattiparivaute шо, patisandhipari- 
yante  thito, bhavapariyante  thito, samsaárapariyante 


1 Ве Si ?parikkho. 
2 S panunna?. š S sumpambavaya?. 
+ Š vimutta?. 


?-5 B" n' eva samsibbato : Š n' eva samsippati. 


5 B? visinitvà. т Si 9 sandhapeti. 
8 Bp? asekhena throughout. э S sampati . 

10 D? Si evam. u p? pariyadiyitva. 
12 B» $1 katan. 1з DP anaceanta?. 


11 D?akammasataya: S akammaàsasatàya. 


23 Atthakaraggo. (S.N. 771 


thito, vattapariyante thito, antimabhave! thito, anti- 
masamussaye? thito, antimadehadharo araha. 


*Tassiyam? pacchimako bhavo, carimo 'yam samussayo, 
jàtimaranasamsáro n’ atthi tassa punabbhavo 1“, 


návam sitvà va pàragü?. Теп’ aha Bhagava : 


Tasma jantu sada sato kamani pariva]jaye, 
te раһауа tare ogham, nàvam sitvà va paragu tif. 


ParHaxo 7 KAMASUTTANIDDESO NITTHITO. 


* Thag. 202. 


1 BP $ апше bh?. ? Dr S antime s?. 
* BP Si assayam. 1 ВР өт. 
5 BP Š ad. ti. 9 Si от. 


7 B" S Kàmasuttaniddeso pathamo samatto. 


П. 
Dt TIYO! GUHATTHANASUTTANIDDESO ?, 


Satto guhàyam bahunabhichanno 
tittham naro mohanasmim? pagalhev', 
dure viveka hi tathaávidho so, 

кама hi loke na hi suppahaya. l. 


Satto quhduyaimi bahundbhichauno? ti. ано ti hi kho 
vuttam. Арі ea gaha tava уай аһа. Сара vueeati kayo: 
kayo ti và оопа ti và deho ti và sandeho ti và паха ti và 
ratho ti và dhajo ti vā vammiko ti và niddan9 ti và 
nagaran ti và kuti ti và gaudo ti va kummo* ti và ё паво 
ti va? kayass' etim adhivaeanam. байо йадан ll 
guhāyam satto visatto asatto ° laggo laggito !? palibuddho : 
yatha bhittikhile và nagadante уа bhandam? sattam 
visattam asattam laggam laggitam palibuddham; evam eva 
guhayam satto visatto àsatto laggo laggito palibuddho. 

Vuttam h'? etam Bhuvagata: * Каре kho Radha? yo 
chando, yo rago. уй nandi, ya tanhá, ye upàyupadana 


3. 1, 158-190. 


! Bh S atha. 2 S guhakasuttaniddesium. cakkhati. 
B" mohanasmi here aud below. 

S sagaülho Aere and bela. 

S ?chando here and below, 

B? nagaran £i và before niddan ti và. 

7 В” S kumbho. 8—8 Sj ош. 9 D" om. 

10 Š lagito. п ph ап аш: S hhaganandan. 
12 S om. 13 Si om. 


6 


24 Afhakavaquo. (S.N. 772 


cetaso adhitthanabhinivesanusaya, !tatra satto!, аба 
visatto?, tasma? satto ti vuceati. 

3 байо ti lagganadhivacanan ti, вао guháyain. 

Bahnnābhichunuo” ti bahukehi kilesehi ehanno?, rasena 
channo, dosena ehanno, mohena channo, kodhena* ehanno, 
upanahena ehanno, makkhena elhanno, palasena channo, 
issáya channo, muechariyena сһаппо, máyáya channo, 
satheyvena ° ehanno, thambhena  channo, sárambhena 
ehunno, mianena  ehanno, aotinanena  ehanno, madena 
chauno, pamádena ehanno. sabbulolesehi sabbadueearitehi 
sabbadarathehi sabbaparilāhehi sabbasantápehi sabbaku- 
salaàbhisamlharehi ° спало / ucehanno? avuto шушо 
ovuto? pihito patiechanno putikujjito ti, sutto guhüyam 
bahunabhichanno. 

"T'itthai naro mohauasmini pagalho ti. V Tilthan naro iY 
titthanto naro ratto raāgavaseņa titthati, duttho dosa- 
vasena titthati, mülho mohavasena titthati, vinibaudho 
mānavasena titthati, parāmattho ditthivasena titthati, 
vikkhepagato uddhaccavasena titthati, anitthañgato vici- 
kiceehavasena titthati, thāmagato anusavavasena titthati 
11, evan pi tittham naro. 

Vottan h' etam Bhavagatu: * Santi bhikkhave cakkhn- 
viüüeyya гара ittha kanta manapà plyarupaü Кашйра- 
samhità rajaniya ; {ай ce bhikkhu aübhiuandati abhivadati 
ajhosaya titthati. Santi bhikkhave sotaviňňeyyā sadda, 


* Ñ, iv. 30. 


1-1 Si om. 22 Si tatrásatto 
3 Sad. ti vuceati..— Vedanāya kho Radha ... pe... 


saññaya kho Ràdha, sainkháresu samkharesu kho Radba, 
vinüàue kho Radha vo chando, уо rāgo, [уй] tanha, уе 
upayupadana себаѕа adhitthanabhinivesanusaya tatra satto 
tatra visatto. 


В" ad. vedanaya kho. 5 8 Sehando, 
6 S ehando Шондон. T Š Корени. 
8 p" вааһеууепа. 7 S ehando viclhando ucchaudo. 


19 Si ophuto; S? LESER Sp snaps 


S.N. 772] Guhatthakasuttauuldeso. 25 


иһапауїййөууй чапда, jivhāviňħeyyā rasa, kàyavinneyya 
photthabbá!, manoviññevya dhamma itthā kanta manapas 
ріулгара kàmüpasamhità rajanīyā: tan ce bhikkhu abli- 
nandati abhivadati ajjhosaya titihati ti, evan рі titthiun 
naro. 

Vuttam h' etam Bhavagati: 
viññanam titthħhamāmım titthati rüparammanam: rüpappa- 
tittham nandūpasevanam — vaddhim ^ virülhim vepullanı 
āpajjatið. Vedanupayam va bhikkhave, saünupayam "va 
bhikkhave‘, samkhārupayam ха? bhikbhave  vininuam 
titthiumanam titthati, samkhārārammaņam samkhárappa- 
tittham nandüpasevanam  vuddhin — virülhim  vepulam 
àpujjat! ti, evam pt titthain naro. 

Vuttam pi h' etam Bhagavata:t  Kuwvalinkare?/ ce 
bhikkhave аһаге atthi гадо, atthi nandi, atthi tanha, 
рай ишип tattha уїййапаш virülham : yattha patitthitam 
vibDànam virülham, atthi tattha namarüpassavakkanti ; 
yattha а и namarüpassavakkanti, atthi tattha samkhára- 
nam vuddhi; yattha atthi samkhàrànam vuddhi аб 
{аба ayatim punabbhavabhinibbatti: vattha atthi ayatim 19 
punabbhavábhinibhattüi, atthi tattha äyatim јабјататага- 
uam; yattha абі ахай jatijaràmarananm, sasokan tam 
bhikkhave sarajam sa-upáyüsan ti хајаті !. Phasse ce 
bhikkhave ahàre, manosancetanüya ce bhikkhave ahare, 
vinnane ee bhikkhave аһаге ай rāgo. atthi nandi. atii 


*Rupupayam 2 và bhikkhave 


SOS DOS T 9.1, 101-103. 


l S photthabbam. 

? Si rupupaya: B" S rüpupávam (Si vas gen rally 
Supaya; D" S ?upiyann. 

3 B? nandupasecanam : S nandyapisenavanam. 

+ br S buddhim. 

5 S ad. evam pi tittham паго. Vuttam pi h еш. 


uu * B? od. viinanüpasam. 
8 Sion, 9 B? kabalikàare се: S kabalinkara эпе. 


10 S àvati tiroughont : B® sometimes. 
u RB? S ad, ti evam pi tittham naro. 


2 A/thakavagqo. [S.N. 772 


йиш, patitthitam tattha уїййашып virülham; yattha 
patitthitam vinnànam virülham, atthi tattha namarüpassá- 
vakkanti: vattha atthi nàmarüpassávakkanti, atthi tattha 
sauikhirinam vuddhi; yattha абі samkháránam vuddhi, 
atthi Ба àyatin punabbhavabhinibbatti; yattha atthi 
ayat punabbhavabhinibbatti, atthi tattha &yatim jati- 
jaramaranam l; уара а и ayatin — jatijaramaranam 1, 
susokan 2 tam bhikkhave sarajam ^ sa-upayasan + ti vadami 
ti, evam рі titth:n naro. 

Mohanasuiin pagalho à. Монанд хосса panca kàma- 
guna, eakkhuvinneyyà rupa itthā kanta тапара piyarupá 
kimüupasamhita rajanlyà, sotavihheyyà saddà, ghünavin- 
пеууа gandha, jivhavinneyya таза, kiyavihneyya phot- 
thabba itthà kanta manapa piyarüpi kámüpasamhità 
rajaniyà. Nimkarana mohanà vuecanti pañea kamagunà ? 
Yebhuyyena devamanussa pancasu kamaguuesu muyhauti 
sammuyhanti sampamuyhanti, mülhà sammulha sampa- 
таа, avijàya andhikatà āvutā nivutà ovutaà? pihità 
patiechanna patikujjità: бал катара mohanà vuecanti pañea 
kámagunà. Mohanasmin pagalho ti mohanasmim pagalho 
ogalho ajjhogülho nimuggo ti, tittham naro mohanasmim 
pagalho. 

Dure viceka hi tathürilho so tì. Vicek& її бахо viveka, 
kayaviveko eittaviveko npadhiviveko. 

Katamo kayaviveko? Idha bhikkhu vivittam senasanam 
bhajati araññam rukkhanmülam pabbatam? kandaram giri- 
guham susanam vanapattham abbhokásum palàlapunjgam?, 
kiyena ea? vivitio vibarati: so? еко gacchati, eko titthati, 
еко nisidati, еко seyyam kappeti, еко gàmam? pindàya 
pavisati, еко patikkamati, еко raho nisidati, еко eanlkamam 
adhitthati, еко carati viharati iriyati vattati pàleti vapeti 
yapeti. Ayam kayaviveko. 


! Son. Jati. 2 б pajahakan tam. 
3 В” sarajamsa. + 5 supayasanam. 
5 Si орта. 5 S om. 

* D? palalapuneaur: S palàlapunnajam. 


` BP S от. 9? Sl onm.; S sara. 


S.N. 779] CGuliafthakasattaniddeso. 21 


Katamo eitíavivoko ? — Pathamam  jhanam samapan- 
nassa піуагапеһі cittam vivittam hoti; dutivam Jhanan 
samapannassa  vitakkaviearehi cittam — vivittam hoti: 
tatiyam jhànam samapannassa pitiyà cittum vivitfam hoti, 
сп ш ат јһапат samapannassa sukhaduklhehi citta 
vivittam hoti; akásünancáyatanum samapannassa rüpa- 
saññaya patighasanfays nanattasaññaya citum vivittam 
hoti: viünáualeüyatanam  samápannassa акаѕапапсауа- 
tanasaññaya eittam vivittam hoti; àkincabnáyatanam 
Samápannassa vinnánaneüyatanasanüaya cibtam vivittam 
hoti: nevasaññanasaññayatananm samapannassa alkincan- 
nayatanasaññaya cittam — vivittam hoti; sotapannassa 
sakkayaditthiya vieikiechàya srlabbataparümasa 1 ditthanu- 
suyà vieikiechánusaya tadehatthehi ca  kilesehi etum 
vivittam hoti; sakadágamissa olàrikà kamaragasamyojana 
patighasamyojanà olārikā kámaráganusaya  patighánu- 
вауп fadekatthehi са  kilesehi cittam  vivittam hoti ; 
anágamissa nnusahagata kàmaragasamyojana — patigha- 
samyojanà, anusahagata kamarüganusayá patighànusayà 
tadekatthehi ca kilesehi cittam vivittàm hoti; arahato 
? üparagà arüparaga? mana uddhaccá avijjàya? manánu- 
saya bhavaràganusayà avijanusaya tadekatthehl ca kile- 
sehi bahiddhaà са sabbanimittelhi cittam vivittam hoti. 
Ayam cittavivelo. 

Katamo upadhiviveko ? — UÜpadhi vuecanti kilesa са 
khandhaà ea abhisamkhaáara ea. — Upadhiviveko  vuceati 
amatam nibbànam; уо во“ sabbasamkhàrasamatho sab- 
büpadhipatinissaggo  tanhakkhayo virāgo nirodho nib- 
bànam. Ayam upadhiviveko. 

Kayaviveko са vupakatthakayanam? nekkliammabhira- 
tànam; eittaviveko ca parisuddhaeittànam. paramavodaà- 
nappattànam : upadhiviveko ea nirüpadhinam puggzalanam 
visamkhàragataànam. 

1 81 silabbatta?. 

? ? BP S rüparüparága; B? «liso ad. avijjaya. 
* Sravijà; S ајјауа. + pP от. 
5 BP? у vivekatthakayünam. 


28 Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 779. 


Dare vivekà hī ti yo so evam guhāyam satto evam 
bahukehi kilesehi ehanno, evam mohanasmin pagàlho, 
so kayaviveka pi dure, cittavivekà pi dūre, upadhivivekà pi 
dure vidüre suvidüre na santike na sāmantā anásanne 
упрака Пе і. Tathaāridho ti kathavidho? tadiso tissanthito? 
tappakàro tappatibhago yo so mohanasmim pagàálho ti, 
dure vivekà hi tathávidho so. 

Капи hi loke na hi suppahaya t. Ката ti uddanato 
dve Каша, vatthukámà ea kilesakamá ca. 

Katame vatthukima? Manapika гара, inanápika saddà, 
manaplka gandhá, тапара rasa, manāpikā photthabba ; 
Патапа papuranà dasidása ajelaka kukkutasükara hat- 
thigavàssavalava Кемип — vatthu  hiranham snvannam 
zmanigamarajadhaniyo ratthañ са janapado ea koso са 
kotthāgārañ ca, yam kinci rajaniyavatthu vatthukàimà. 
Арі са atita kama, anàgatà Ката paeeupapanna Баша, 
ajjhattà Каша, bahiddha Ката, ajjhattabahiddhà Каша, 
hina kama, majjhima Каша, panita kama, apayika kama, 
manusika kama, ара kama, paeeuppatthita Каша, nini- 
mita kama, paranimmità Калпа, pariggahita kama, aparl;- 
кайа kama, mamiaüyiti Каша, ашатауња kama, sabbe 
pi kamavaeara dhamma, sabbe pi rūpāvacarā dhamma, 
sahbe pi атаратасага dhammá, tanhavatthuka tanharaii- 
uana  kümaniyatthena  rajaniyatthena | madaniyatthena 
Каша : imme vuecanti vatthukama. 

Natame kilesakāmā? Chando kamo, гасо Като, chan- 
darāgo Като. samkappo Като, rago Като, samkapparago 
limo; yo kāmesu kāmachando kamaraeo kāmanandi 
kamatanha kamasneho kamaparilaho kāmamucchā kinaj- 
jhosánam kàmogho kāmayogo kāmupādānam kamachanda- 
nivaranan. 

*Addasam kama te mulam, samkappă kama jàyast ; 
ua tam smukappaylssiiml, evam luna na hohisi: 


ипе vuceanti kilesakã ma. 
* Jat. ii, 150. 


1 B? S vivekatthe. ? Dr S om. 


3 S tussasnahilhito. 


S.N. 118] Guhatthakasuttaniddeso. zu 


Loke ti арауаіоке manussaloke devaloke khandhuloke 
dhàátuloke àyatanaloke. Ката hi loke na hi suppahaga ti 
kama hi loke duppahàya dueeajja ! duppariceajja dunnivi- 
madayà 2 dunnivedhaya ? daübbinivedhaya? duttarā duppa- 
tara dussamatikkamà dubbitivattai ti, kama hi loke na hi 
варраһауа. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà : 


Satto gahàyam bahunabhiehanno 
tittham naro mohanasmim pagilho, 
dūre vivekà hi tathavidho so, 

каша hi loke na hi suppahaya ti. 


Ieehanidana bhavas&átabaddha? 
te duppamuncáà, па hi annamokkhia, 
pacehà pure và pi apekkhamàna 
іше уа Кате purime va јарраш. 


i 


Icchánidána bharasatabaddha ti. Тесна ti vuceati tanha, 
yo rago sárágo anunayo anurodho nandi nandirágo cit- 
tassa sáràgo iechà mucchà ajjhosãnam gedho paligedho ? 
sañeo panko eja maya janikā ê sanjanika? sanjanani sib- 
bini jalini sarità visattikà suttam visatà àyühani dutiyà 
panidhi bhavanetti vanam  vanatho  santhavo  sneho 
ареккћа patibandho 9. ава asimsana àsinsitattam rūpāsa 
saddas& gandhása rasāsā photthabbàsa Јарһаѕа dhanásá 
puttásà jivitasá, Jappà рајарра abhijappà Jappà ! јаррапа 
jappitatt:m, loluppaá loluppáyaná loluppáyitattam, muc- 
сһаћсікаба 12, sadhukammannatà ?. adhaunnarágo visama- 


! S “саја throughout. - B» 8 dunimmadayá. 
3 D? dunnivetthayà ;: Sl om. 
3 В» dubbinivetthayà. 5 Si c.l. ?bandha. 


9 p» 5 rodho. 
? p? S palirodho. 


8 DP ом. " Sion. ах above. 
0 Si patibandha; BP S patibaudhu. 

4 2 . 
"nS ош. 


? В” paechanchikatà ; S suvancitakà. 
13 pr S sadhukamyata. 


30 Afthakacaggo. [S.N. 773 


lobho nikanti nikàmanà patthana ! pihanà вашра апа °, 
kamatanhà bhavatanha vibhavatanhà, rüpatanha arüpa- 
бапа, nirodhatanhà, rüpatanha 3 saddatanhà gandha- 
tanhá rasatanhà photthabbatanha dhammatanha, ogho 
vogo запо *, upadànam àvaranam nivaranam chadanam 
bandhanam  wupakkileso  anusayo  pariyutthanam lata 
veviecham | dukkhainulam | dukkhanidànam | dukkhappa- 
bhavo? mārapäso тагараһваш  máravisayo taunháünadi 
tanhajàlam — tanhàgaddulam ê  tanhásamuddo  abhijjhà, 
lobho akusalamulam. 

Iechānidānā ti icchanidana ? iecháhetuka ісеһарассауа 
icchākāranā iechüpabhava ti, iechanidanà. 

Bhavasàtabeddhà ti. ЕКаш bhavasatam, sukhà vedana. 
Dve bhavasatani, sukhà ea vedanà itthañ са vatthu$?. 
Tini bhavasátàn, yobbaBnam arogyam jivitam. — Cattàri 
bhavasátani,labho yaso pasamsa sukham. Райса bhava- 
sitani, manápikà гпра, manapika saddà. manapikà тапаһа, 
manapiki rasa, manāpikā photthabbà. Cha bhavasàátàni, 
cakkhusampadà  sotasampada — ghanasampadà  jivhàsam- 
paqa káyasampadà manosampadà. 

DBharasatabaddha tì sukhaya vedanaya? baddha 9, 1ttha- 
smim vatthusmim baddha, yobbanüe baddha, àrogye!! 
baddhà, jivite baddhà, làbhe baddhà, yase baddhà, pasam- 
кауп 12 baddhā, sukhe baddhà, manàpikesu rüpesu baddha, 
saddesu  gandhesu  rasesu  manáàpikesu  photthabbesu 
baddhā, | cakhhusampadaya  baddha, 18 sotasampadáya 
ghànasampadaàya jivhásampadaya kayasampadàya, mano- 
sanipadava!?, baddhà vinibaddha 4 abaddhà lagga laggità 
palibuddha ti, iechanidánà bhavasatabaddha, 


V S patthana. > S sappatthaua. 

` Bl өш. + Dr 8 gandho. 

* 13Р ?pabhavo. $ 51 5 ?gaddalam ; B" °gadulam. 
7 Be S nidanaka. 8 S vatthum «s usual. 

" pr ad. gatabaddha. 10 S sasabaddham. 
п p» arogya?. 12 p? S pasamsayum. 


1з 0 pe S sotaghanajivhákiyaminosampadáya. 


Ho Be S vibaddha. 


S.N. 773] Guhatthakesuttanidd: so. 31 


Te Чирратийсй na hi «niamokkha ti te va hhavasa- 
tavatthü? duppamuneá, ?sattà và etto dummocayi 2. 

Kathan te bhavasátavatthü ! duppamuncáà? Sukha 
vedani dummuBen?. ittbam  vatthu duuimuncam, vobban- 
ñam dummuneam, àrogyuni dummuncanm, jivitun. dum- 
muü&ceam, libho duminunco, yaso dunmiuneo, рабва1н&й 
dunmuieá, sukham dummuncaun, manápikà гара dum- 
шойса, manápikà saddà сапда гаѕа photthabbà dum- 
muüei, cakkhusampadā diummmunea, !sotasainpada gliana- 
зарада jJivhasampada — kayasampada — manosampada 3, 
dummufeà — dappamunea — dunumnocaya — duppamocayá 
dunninmadaya 5 dubbinivedhayà dutiarà duppatarà dus- 
samatikkamà dubbitivattà 9; evan te' bhavasitavatthü? 
duppamuüei. 

Katham sattà ешо” dummocaya?  Sukháya vedanaya 
sattà dummoeayá. itthasma vatthusmā dummoeaya, yob- 
banná dummocaya, àrogyà dummocaya, jivita dummoeayà, 
labhà dummoeayà, yasa dummocayü. pasamsáya dunmo- 
сауа, sukhà dummoeayá, manaápikehi rüpehi dummnocayà, 
manàpikehi eaddehi gandhehi rasehi photthabbebi dum- 
mocayà, eakkhusampadáya dummocaya, ?sotasampadaya 
ghànasampadàya jivhasampadáya kayasanpadaya mano- 
sampadàya!? dummoeayá duppamocaya!! duddharà dus- 
samuddharà апр арапа! dussamutthapanà 12: P evan 
sattà etto? dummocaya ti, te duppamuncá. 


! S bhavissathavattlin. 
2—2 Š satto và etto dumocayá (Si eto). 
3 S duppam kere and below. 
i pr S sotaghanajivhakáyaminosampada. 
B? 5 dunuivedhaya (5 vedayi). 
5 duppativattà. 7 BP ош, 
8 S assádavatthu. 9 Ni eto. 
10—10 |5» S sotaghanajivhàkayiinanosaimpadaya. 
п Вэ Sun. 12 ре S dubbutthapayas. 
3 Br S dussamutthápaya. 
NM pr S ad. dunnivedhayà dubbinivedhaya . . . dubbiti- 
vattà (see abore, L 123. 


a 


6 


32 Afthakavagqgo. [S.N. 773 


Na là aññamokkha ti te attanà palipapalipanna! na 
sukkonti param palipapalipannam? uddharitum. 

Vuttam h' etam Dhavagatà: * бо vata Cunda attaná 
palipapalipanno * param  palipapalipannam *  uddharis- 
sati ii n’ etam апаш vijjati. So vata Cunda attanà 
adauto avimito aparinibbuto param damessati vinessati 
parinibbapessati ti п’ etam thànam vijjati ti evam 5, na hi 
aññamokkha. 

Athavà n’ atth' anno koci тосеіа 6; te yadi muccey- 
yum?, sakena апера, sakena balena, sakena viriyena, 
sakena рагаккатепа sakena purisathümena, sakena puri- 
sabalena, sukena purisavirlyena, sakena purisaparakkamena 
attana sammápatipadam anulomapatipadam apaceanikapa- 
йрафицп®  anvatíhapatipadam | dhammánudhammapatipa- 
dam patipajjamaná? mueeeyyun ti, evam? pi na hi anüa- 
mohkhà.  Vuttam р1!° h' etam Bhagavatà: 

Т араш gamissáàmi рашосапауа 
kathamkathim 1 Dhotaka Кайе 22 loke, 
dhannaan ea settham P abhijánamano 
evam tuvam ™ ogham iman tarest ti, 
evam рі na hiannamokkhà. — Vuttam pi!? h' etam Bhaga- 
vata : 
i Attanā pakatain 5 рараш, attanā samkilissati, 
абала akatam papan, attanā ‘уа visujjhati, 
suddhi asuddhi paccattam, пайдо anBam visodhaye ti, 


evam pi na hi aññamokkha. 
* M.as 45. T Sn. 1064. i Вір. 165. 


S palighapalipanna. > B palighapalipannam. 

5 8 palisapalipannam. 

t! D” palipalipannam ; 5 palilapalipannam. 

^ p» S ad. pi. 9 Bi mocetum. 

; p? S munbceyyum /Iroughout. 8 S avaceanikla?. 
° 9 Be munceyyam evam; 5 muhceyyan ti evam. 

° Bl om. п 5 kathamkath: jotaka. 

= p» $ кпе. 13 BP Бе ишп; S sattham. 

C Ni уш. 15 S va katam. 


S.N. 113] Guhaffhakasuttanüuldeso. 33 


Vuttàm pi? h' etam DBhagavatà:* Jvam eva kho brăh- 
mana titthat' eva nibbàuam, titthati nibbànagàmimaggo #, 
tittham' aham samàádapetà; аһа са pana mama savaka 
maya evam ovadiyamànà evam anusásiyamanà арр” ekacce 
aecantanitthaum nibbànam àrádhenti, екассе п’ àradhenti. 
Ettha kyüham brahmana karomi? maggakkhàyi bráh- 
mana fathàgato, maggam buddho àcikkhati, attanà pati- 
рајјашапа mueceyyun ti. Evam рі па hi annamokklaà ti, 
{е duppamurica na hi alinamolkha. 

Pacchá pure và pi apekkhamánàá ti. Расса vuccati 
anàgatam, pure vuceati atitam ; арі ea айаш upadaya 
anágatan са расепрраппай са расса, anügatam upadaya 
айбай са paceuppannan са pure. 

Katham pure apekkham karoti? Evamrūpo ahosim? 
айат addhànan ti tattha nandim samanvàgameti! ; evam- 
vedano ahosim, 5evamsaüiüo ahosin?, evamsamkharo 
ahosim, evamviinàno ahosim atitam addhàünan ti tattha 
nandim samanvàgameti?; evam pi pure apekkham karoti. 

Athava, iti me cakkhu аһоѕі atitam addhanam, iti 
тара ti tattha echandaragapatibaddham hoti vinhanam, 
chandaràgapatibaddhattà — vinnánassa, tad  abhinandati, 
tad abhinandanto evam pi pure apekkham karoti; iti 
me softam ahosi afitam addhànam, iti saddà ti; iti me 
ghànam ahosi atitam addhànam, iti ?gandha 18; iti me 
jivhà ahosi aütam addhànam, iti rasa ti; iti me kayo 
ahosi atitàm addhanam, iti photthabba ti; iti me mano 
ahosi atitam addbànam, iti ° dhamma ti? tattha chandarà- 
gapatibaddham hoti vinnanam; chandarágapatibaddhattà 
vinüanassa, tad abhinandati; tad abhinandanto evam pi 
pure apekkham karoti. 


* М.ш, 6. 


= 


Si om. 2 5 nibbānamgāmi’. 
Sahosi. . . nandi throughout. 

В" 5 samannaneti. 5—5 S om. 

B? sumannüneti ; 5 samannüganeti. 

В” 8 ad. athavà. 8—8 5 gandhànum. 

S dhammanam. 


QA © 


9—9 


34 Att hakavaggo. [S.N. 778 


Аата, уап’! assu? tani pubbe mátugàmena saddhim 
hasitalapitakilitàni, tad assádeti, tam nikámeti, tena ca 
vittim àpajjati; evam pi pure apekltham karoti. 

Каат paechà apekkham karoti?  Evamrüpo siyam? 
anàgatam addhànan ti taitha nandim samanvügameti*; 
evamvedano siyam, evamsañño siyam, evamsamkhàro 
siyam, evamviññano siyam anagatam addhànan ti tattha 
nandim samanvigameti; evam рі рассһа apekkham 
karoti. 

Athavà, iti me cakkhu? siyà anagatam addhànam, iti 
гара ii appatiladdhassa patilabhàya? citíam panidahati, 
cetaso 7 panidhànapaccayá, tad abhinandati, tad abhinan- 
danto evam pi paecha apekkham karoti; 811 me so- 
iam siya anágatam addhànam, iti saddà ti; iti me 
ghanam siya anagatam addhànam, iti gandhàá ti; iti 
me jivhà siya anàgatam addhünam, iti rasá ti; iti me 
kayo siya anágatam addhànam, iti photthabbà ti; iti me 
mano siyà anágatam addhànam, iti dhammā ti appatilad- 
dhassa patilàbhàya cittam panidahati; eetaso panidbhàna- 
рассауа ?, tad abhinandati, tad abhinandanto evam pi 
paechà apekkham karoti. 

Athava, iminàham silena và vattena!? và tapena và 
brahmaeariyena và devo và bhavissami!! деуаййаќаго và 
ti appatiladdhassa '? patilabhàya cittam panidahati; cetaso 
panidhànapaecaya??, tad abhinandati, tad abhinandanto 
evam pi paechà apekkham karoti H, paechà pure và pi 
apekkhamaànà. 

Ime га Кате purime va jappan ii. Ime va käme ti 


m 


В" уйп ’ssa; Š уам 'ssa và уап 'ssa. 

S ad. hasitalapitakilitàni. 

з S pi sam throughout. 

4 В” samanàáneti; S samannāneti throughout. 


to 


° S eaklkhum as usud. в 8 ?labhassa. 
7 5 etam so. 8 B" S «d. athavà. 
9 $ panidhàya p°. 10 pr 8 vatena «s usual. 


9 


? S appatiladdha. 


m 


п S bhavissatimi. 
3 8 panidhayanaj?. 


m 


S.N. 774] Guhatthakesuttanildeso. 35 


paeeuppanne pahea kàmagune iechantaà sádiyantà pattha- 
yanta! pihayantà abhijappanta. Purime va jappau ti atite 
рапса kümagune jappantà pajappantà abhijappantà ti, iino 
va kàme purime va jappam. Теп’ аһа Bhagavá : 


Iechanidaànà bhavasatabaddhà 

te duppamunüeà, na hi aññamokkha, 

paechà pure và pi apekkhamana 

ime va kāme purime va jappan ti. 

Kàmesu giddhà pasutà pamuülha? 
avadàniyà te visame nivitthà 
dukkhüpanità paridevayanti?: 

kim su bhavissáma ito cutàset*? 3. 


Kámesu giddhà pasut& рита? ti. Ката ti uddānato 5 


dve Катай, vatthuk&àmà ea kilesakàmà са... pe... ime 
уцссапї vatthukàmà . . . pe... ime vuceanti kilesa- 
kama; gedho vuceati tanhá; уо гасо sārāgo . . . pe... 


&bhijhà lobho akusalamülam.  Kilesakàmena vatthukà- 
mesu тайа giddhà gadhità muechita ? ajjhopannà" laggà 
laggità palibuddhā ti, kàmesu giddha. 

Pasută ti ye pi kàme esanti gavesanti pariyesanti, 
taccarità tabbahula taggarukà tanninnà tapponà? tappab- 
рһага ?tadadhimuttà tadadhipateyyà?, te pi kamapasutà. 
0 Ye pi tanhavasena гире esanti gavesanti pariyesanti, 
sadde, gandhe, rase, photthabbe !'esanti gavesanti !! pari- 
yesanti, taecarità tabbahulà taggarukà tanninnà tapponà^ 
tappabbhárà tadadhimutta tadádhipateyyà, te pi kàma- 
pasutà. Ye рі tanhàvasena rüpe patilabhanti, sadde 


1 S patthüyantà. 2 S samqlla. 

3 Š paridevassanti. 3 S eutose. 

5 B" Si udānato; S uddanato. See p. 1. 

9 B" muñeita; S on. 7 p" ajjhosanna. 

8 В» 5 tappona. 99 S taddhimuttáppatey ya. 


10 S ad. ye pi tanhávasena rupe patilabhanti sadde 
gandhe rase photthabbe tadadhipateyya te ni kàmupasuta. 
nonc pr S. pe: 


36 Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 774 


gandhe rase photthabbe !patilabhanti, taecarità tabba- 
hulà taggaruk& tanninnà tapponà tappabbhara tadadhi- 
mutta! tadüdhipateyyà, te рі kàmappasutà. Ye pi 
їарһауаѕепа rüpe paribhunjanti, sadde gandhe rase 
photthabbe paribhuüjanti?, taccarità tabbahulà taggarukà 
tanninnà фарропа tappabbhàára tadadhimuttà tadádhipa- 
teyyä, te pi kamappasutà. Yathā kalahakarako kalahap- 
pasuto?, kammakàrako kammappasuto, goeare earanto 
gocarappasuto?, jhayi jhánappasuto; evam eva ?ye pi 
Кате esanti gavesanti pariyesanti, iacearità tabbahulà 
taggarukà tanninnà tapponà tappabbhàrà tadadhimuttà 5 
tadadhipateyyáà, te pi kamappasutà. Үе рі tanhávasena 
rüpe esanti gavesanti pariyesanti, sadde gandhe rase 
photthabbe © esanti gavesanti? pariyesanti, taecarità tabba- 
hulà taggarukà tanninnà tapponà tappabbhārā tadadhi- 
mutta tadádhipateyya, іе pi Кашарраѕша. Үе pi tanhà- 
vasena тире patilabhanti, sadde gandhe rase photthabbe 
patilabhanti, taecarità tabbahula taggaruká tanninnà 
ќарропа tappabbhārā tadadhimuttà tadadhipateyyàá, te pi 
kàmappasutà. Үе pi tanhávasena rüpe paribhunjanti, 
sadde gandhe rase photthabbe paribhunjanti, taccarità 
tabbahulà taggarukà tanninna tapponáà tappabbhārā tad- 
adhimuttà tadadhipateyya, te pi kamappasuta. 

Pamülha ti yebhuyyena devamanussà pañeasu kàma- 
gunesu muyhanti sammuyhanti sampamuyhanti, mulha z 
sammülhà? sampamuülhà, avijjaya andhikata? àvutà nivutà 
ovutà pihità patieehannà patikujjitá ti, kàmesu giddhà 
pasutaà pamulha. 

Avadàániyà te visame nivitthà'? t. Avadāniyā ti avam 
gaeehanti ti pi avadániyà ^ Maeccharino pi vuccauti 
avadaniyà.  Buddhànam  buddhasavakanam ! үасапат 


1! $ pe. ? 8 bhuüjanti here and below. 
з Dr S ?pasuto here and below. < В» ?pasuto. 
2—5 S om. 979 D? pe; S om. 
? B" om. 8 D" ad. pamülha. 
ө 51 cJ. andhigata., 10 S nivitthàya. 


п Br 8 savakanam. 


S.N. 774] Guhatthakasuttauniddeso. 37 


byappatham desanam anusitthim п’ àdiyanti til, ava- 
dàniyà 2. 

Каат avam gaechanti ti avadaniyà ? ?Avam gacchanti 
ti? nirayam gacchanti, tiraechànayonim gacchanti, pitti- 
visayam gaecchanti* ti? evam avam gacchanti ti, ava- 
dàniya. 

Katham maecharino vuecanti avadaniya? Panca mac- 
charlyàni, āvāsamacchariyam — kulamacchariyam labha- 
maechariyam vannamaechariyam dhanunamacchariyam ; 
yam evarüpam macechariyam maceharayana maccharāyi- 
tattam veviceham kadariyam katukañeakatá aggahitattam ° 
eittassa, idam vuceati maechariyam. Арі са khandhamac- 
сһапуат pi maechariyam, dhátumaechariyvam pi mac- 
ehariyam?, ayatanamacchariyam pi macchariyam gāho, 
idam vueeati maechariyam. Iminà maechariyena avadañ- 
üutüya samannagatà? jana pamattà; evam maccharino 
vuccanii avadàniyà. 

Katham buddhànam buddhasávakánam? vacanam Буар. 
раат desanam anusitthim 20 п’ adiyanti ti avadàniya? 
Buddhánam  buddhasávakánam vacanam — byappatham 
desanam anusitthim п’ àdiyanti, na sussusanti, па sotam 
odahanü, na aññacittam upatthapent), anassavà avacana- 
kara patilomavuttino anüen' eva mukham karonti, evam 
buddhànam  buddhasávakánam vacanam — byappatham 
desanam anusitthim п’ àdiyanti ti, avadaniya.! 

Aradüniya 2 te visame штита ti. Visame P ti visame 13 
káyakamme nivittháà, visame vacikamme nivitthá, visame 
manokamme nivitthà, visame pānātipāte nivitthà, visame 
adinnadane nivitthà, visame kámesu micehacare nivitthà, 
visame musávüde пуа, visamāya pisupnaya vàciya 


! S ad. pi. ? S avadaniyam. 
37 Be болт, + В” gacchanti. 
5 BP om. $ S paggahitatta. T Som. 


š В» sampannágatà «s often. 

? p» Š sàvakànam here and below. 

10 S anusisitthi, below anusitthi. 

пр’ б ad. ti. 12 Siom. 13713 Si от. 


38 Afthakavagqo. (S.N. 774 


nivittha!, visamáya pharusàya уйсауа nivittha!, visame 
samphappalápe nivitthà!, уіѕатауа abhijjhàya nivitthà, 
visame  byápade nivitthà!, visamàya  miecháditthiyà 
nivitthà, visamesu samkhàresu nivitthà, visamesu pañ- 
casu 2 kamagunesu nivitthà, visamesu pancasu nivaranesu 
nivitthà, ° visamáya cetanàya, visamáya patthanāya, visa- 
maya panidhiyà? uiviffha* patitthità allina upagataà ajjho- 
sita adhimuttà lagga laggità palibuddhà ti, ауайашуйа te 
visame nivittha. 

Dukkhüpanità paridevayantt ti. Dukkhüpauita ti duk- 
khüpanità! dukkhappattà dukkhasampattà dukkhupagatà 
marappattà  márasampattà  marupagata  maranappattà 
maranasampattà?  maranupagatà tit, 9 dukkhüpanità. 
Paridevayanti ti lapanti làlapanti socanti kilamanti pari- 
devant, urattàlim kandanti, sammoham  àpajjanti ti, 
dukkhüpanità paridevayanti. 

Kim su bhavissāma ito cutásc*? ti ito сша kim su? 
bhavissüàma ?  nerayikà  bhavissàma,  tiracchánayonika 
bhavissáma, pittivisayikā bhavissàma, 9manussà bhavis- 
sàma?, devà kim! bhavissàma? гарт bhavissàma, arüpi 
bhavissáàma, saüühi bhavissáma, asaññi bhavissáma, neva- 
sanümàasanini bhavissama? bhavissiuna nu kho mayam 
anagatam addhanam? ?nanu kho bhavissüàma anàgatam 
&ddhanam? kim nu kho bhavissàima  anagatam ad- 
dhánam 29 katham nu kho bhavissama anagatam ad. 
dhánam? кіш hutvà bhavissama?? nu kho? mayam anágatam 
addhànan? ti samsayapakkhanna vimatipakkhannà 1° 
dvelhakajátà lapanti làlapanti socanti kilamanti paride- 
vanti, urattàlim kandanti, sammoham àpajjanti ti, kim su 
bhavissàma ito cutāse? Ten’ аһа Dhagavi: 


! pr S om. ? 8 pancak?. 

5-3 B» S o, 3 p» § vinivittha. 
5 Son. 5 D" om. ; S repeats maranupagata. 
7 S спіове as before, 8-8 Si ош. 

979 Si om. 10-10 8 om. 


п Ве ?pakkhandhà; 5 ?pakkhandhaànda. 
1? pr 8 Spakkhandha, 


S.N. 775] Guhafihakasuttauiddeso. 39 


Kümesu giddhà pasutà pamülha 
avadániya te visame nivitthà 
dukkhüpanità  paridevayanti : 

kim su bhavissima ito cutáse? ti. 


Tasmà hi sikkhetha idh' eva jantu; 
yam kiñei }аййа visaman ti loke, 

па tassa hetu visamam careyya, 
аррат h’ idam jivitam àhu dhirà'. L 


Tasmā hi sikkhetha idl’ eva јата ti. Tasmā ti tasmà 
tamkaraná tamhetu ќаррассауа tannidānā etam adinavam 
sampassamano kámesü ti, tasmà. Sikkhethā ti. Тїззо 
sikkhà, adhisilasikkha adhieittasikkha adhipannasikkhàa. 

Кайаша adhislasikkha ? Idha bhikkhu sīlavā hoti, 
patimokkhasamvarasamvuto viharati — àearagocarasam- 
panno; anumattesu vajjesu bhayadassāvī, samādāya sik- 
khati sikkhāpadesu. Khuđdako? siüakkhandho, mahanto 
silakkhandho, silam patitthà ādicaranam samyamo sam- 
varo, mukham? pamukham?* kusalānam dhammanan 
samàpattiya. Ayam adhisilasikkhà. 

Кайаша adhieittasikkhaà? Idha bhikkhu viviec' eva 
kà.nehi, vivieea akusalehi dhbammehi, savitaklaim saviearam 
vivekajam pitisukham pathamam jhānam upasampajjà 
viharati. Vitakkavicárànam vüpasamaà ajjhattam sampa- 
sàdanam, eetaso ekodibhávam, avitakkam avicáram ваша- 
dhijam pitisukham dutiyam" jhanam upasampajja viharati. 
Pitiyà са virágà upekkhako са viharati sato? sampajánu, 
sukhaii са kayena patisunvedeti, yan tam ariyá àcikkhanti 
upekkhako satimà sukhavihàri ti tatiyam jhanam upa- 
ѕашрајја viharati. Sukhassa са раһапа, dukkhassa са 
раһапа, pubb’ eva somanassadomanassanam atthaügama, 
adukkha-m-asulham  upekkhàsatiparisuddhin | eatuttham 
]hànam upasampajja viharati. Ayam adhieittasikkha. 


1 Si ad. ti. ? S dl. ea. 
3 В» 5 токкат. + В" S pamoklham. 
5 S om. Š S вайапаш. 


7 5 dutiya? und below tatiya°, catattha?. 


40 Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 776 


Katamà  adhipannasikkha ? Idha bhikkhu  pabnnava 
hoti, udayatthagüminiyà pannaya samannügato! ariyaya 
nibbedhikàya sammádukkhakhayagaminiyà. So idam duk- 
khan ti yathábhütam pajānāti, ayam dukkhasamudayo ti 
yathabhütam pajānāti, ayam dukkhanirodho ti yathà- 
bhütam рајапаёї, ayam dukkhanirodhagàmini patipada ti 
yathàbhütam pajanati; ime àsavà ti yath&bhütam paj&- 
пай, ayam àsavasamudayo ti yathabhütam pajànàti, ayam 
asavanirodho ti yathábhütam рајапай, ayam авауапіго- 
dhagàinini patipadà ti yathàbhütam pajánáti. Ayam adhi- 
paünasikkha. 

Ima? tisso sikkha &àvajjento sikkheyya, jànanto sik- 
kheyya, passanto sikkheyya, paecavekkhanto sikkheyya, 
cittam adhitthahanto sikkheyya, saddhàya adhimuccanto ° 
sikkheyya, viripam pagganhanto sikkheyya, satim4 upat- 
thahanto? sikkheyya, cittam  samadahanto sikkheyya, 
pannaya pajànanto sikkheyya, abhibneyyam ablhijànanto 
sikkheyya, pariññeyyam  parijànanto sikkheyya, раһа- 
tabbam  pajahanto sikkheyya, bhavetabbam  bhaàvento 
sikkheyya, sacehikatabbam sacchikaronto sikkheyya аса- 
геууа ° samaeareyya samadaya vatteyya. 

Idhă ti imissà ditthiyà, imissá khantiya, Imissá ruclyà, 
imasmim адауе, imasmin dhamme, imasmim? vinaye, 
imasmim dhammavinaye, imasmim ратасапе, imasmim 
brahmacariye, imasmin satthusásane, imasmim attabhàve, 
imasmim manussaloke. 8Tena vuecati idha 1.5 Jantā ti 
satto naro . .. pe.. . manujo ti, tasmā hi sikkhetha? 
idh' eva jantu. 

Yaim hiña Janna visaman to loke ti. Yam kiüct ot 
sabbena sabbam sabbathà sabbam  asesam  nissesam !? 


m 


D" samipannagato as often. 

DB" S imāyo tisso sikkháyo. ? S adhimunicanto. 
У siti. ° S upatthapanto. 

В” ad. eareyya. 

B Imasmi three Dnes. 

Siou; Slevuceatl . . . 

5 sikkheyya. 0 S om. 


о © - C © R 


S.N. 715] Guhatthakasuttaniddeso., 41 


pariyádáyavacanam! etam уаш kinei ti. *Jañña risaman ti 
ti?, visamam kàyakammam visaman ti jàneyya, visamam 
vacikammam visaman ti јапеууа?, visamam manokammanm 
visaman ti janeyya, visamam panatipatam visamo ti 
jàneyya, visamam adinnadanam visaman? ti јапеууа, 
visamam kámesu micchácaram visamo ti јапеууа, visamam 
musüvadam visamo ti јапеууа, visamam pisunam vàcam 
visamá ti јапеууа, visamum pharusun? vācam visamü ti 
jàneyya, visamam samphappalapam visamo ti ]апеуха, 
visamam abhijjham visamà ti Jàneyya, visamam byapadam 
visamo ti jüneyya, visamam mieeháditthim? visamà ti 
јапеууа, visame samkhàre visamā ti јапеууа, visame раћса 
kàmagune visama ti јапеууа, visame panca nlvaraue 
visamà ti јапеууа, 7 visamam сеќапат visama ti јапеууа, 
visamam patthanam visamà ti jàneyya, visamam panidhim 
visamà ti jàneyya' ајапеууа° vijaneyya patijaneyya? 
pativijheyya. Loke ti apāyaloke .. . pe . . . &yatana- 
loke ti, yam kinei jannà visaman ti loke. 

Na tassa hetu visamayw сагеууа ti visamassa kayakam- 
massa hetu visamam na сагеууа,!0 visamassa vacikammassa 
hetu visamam па сагеууа 9, visamassa manokammassa 
hetu visamam na careyya, visamassa panatipatassa hetu 
visamaim па сагеууа, visamassa adinnādānassa hetu 
узашат na eareyya, visamassa kāmesu miechácárassa 
hetu visamam na careyya, visamassa musivadassa hetu 
visamam па сагеууа!!‚ visamüya pisunaya vácáya hetu 
visamam па сагеууа, visamáya pharusàya vàcáya hetu 
visamam na careyya, visamassa samphappalàpassa hetu 
visamam na сагеууа, visamaya abhijjhàya hetu!? visamam 
na careyya, visamassa Dyapadassa hetu visamam па 
careyya, visamaya micchaditthiyà hetu visamam na caiey- 
ya, visamānam samkhārānam hetu visame ? na eareyyal!, 


1 S pariyaádiya°. 2—2 J} S visaman ti јайда ti. 

3 5 јапеууа throughout. + 8 visamā. 

5 5 pharusa?. 6 буе. 
1-7 BP S om. 5 5 ајапеууа . . . patijàáneyya. 

? B" pativijaneyya. 10 $ eareyyi. 
Met Siom 12 $i от. 18 Be visamam. 


49 Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 775 


visamánam pañceannam kàmagunanam hetu visame? na 
сагеууа, visamanam pancannam nivaranànaun hetu visame! 
па careyya, visamáya cetanáya hetu?, visamáya pattha- 
naya hetu ?, visamáya panidhiyà hetu visamam na careyya, 
па üeareyya, na ѕашасатеууа, na samádaya vaiteyya ti, па 
tassa hetu visamam careyya. 

рро lè idam jivitam ahu dhirü V. Jivitan ti ayu 
thiti yapana уарапа iriyanà vattanà pālłanā jivitam jivi- 
tindriyam. 

Api са dvihi kàranehi appakam jivitain?: thitiparittatàya 
và appakam jivitam, sarasaparittatàya 4 và appakam jivitam. 

Katham thitiparittatàya appakam jivitam? Atīte cit- 
takkhane jivittha, na jivati, na jivissati. Anágate cittak- 
khane jivissati, na jivati, na jivittha. ^ Paccuppanne 
cittakkhane jivati, na jivittha, na jivissati. 


*Jivitam attabhàvo ca sukhadukkhà ca kevalà 
ekacittasamayutta, lahuso vattati kkhano 5. 
Cullàsiti? sahassani kappa titthanti ye maru, 
na tv eva te pi jivanti dvihi cittehi* samàhità. 
Ye niruddhà marantassa titthamánassa và idha. 
sabb’ eva sadisà khandhà, gata appatisandhika$. 
Апапіага са ye bhanga? ye са bhangà? anagata, 
tadantare niruddhánam ° vesammamn ЇЇ n° atthi lak- 

khane. 

Anibbattena na játo, paeeuppannena jati, 
cittabhabgamato!? loko, paünhatti paramatthiyà. 
Yathà ninnà pavattanti, chandena parinàmità 
acchinnavara!? vattanti salàyatanapaceayà. 


* See below ou c. 804, p. 117. 


1 Br Š visamam. 

* B" S «d. visamam na careyya. 5 S jivitan t. 
+ 5 sarapattitàya, see p. 18, note 6. 

5 S vattate khane. 6 Si eülasiti. 

? p" S cittasamohitā. 8 D" 8 appatisandhiya. 

э S аса. 10 8 Ye 

Ч S vesama. 1* S bhańgā’. 13 Be 8 ?dhàrà. 


S.N. 775] Guhatthakasuttaniddeso. 18 


Anidhánagata bhanga!, punjo п’ atthi anàgate, 

nibbattà yeva titthanti àragge sàsapupamà. 

Nibbattànan ea dhummanam bbhango? nesam purek- 

khato?, 

palokadhammà?* titthanti purànehni amiseità. 

Adassanato àyauti айда, gacchanti dassanam, 

vijuppàádo va àkáse uppajjanti vayanti? са ti. 
Evam thitiparittatàya appakam Jivitam. 

Каат sarasaparittatiya? appakam  jivitam ? Asså- 
supanibaddham jivitam, "passásupanibaddham  jivitam ? 
assásappassásupanibaddham 8 jivitam, mahàübhuütupanibad- 
dham jivitam, ?usmüpanibaddham jivitam °, 1 kavalinkaràá- 
hàrupanibaddham jivitam 19, vinbánupanibaddham jivitam. 
Маат рі imesam!! dubbalam; pubbahetü pi imesam 
dubbala!?; уе рі! paceayá te pi dubbalaà; ye!? pi pabha- 
vikà!? te pi dubbalà; sahabhu!* pi imesam dubbalà; 
sampayogà pi imesam dubbalà; sahaja pi imesaim dubbalà; 
уй pi payojnka?" sā р dubbalà. Annamanüam nicca- 
dubbalà!? ime. Annamaüüam anavatthita 20 іше. Айћа- 
maniam paripátayanti 2! ime. Annamannassa hi n' айн 
iàyità. Na са pi thapenti aññamaññ' ime. Yo pi nib- 
battako so па vij&ti. Na ca kena ci koci hayati. 
Bhangabya 22 са imehi sabbaso. Purimebhi pabhavità ime, 
ye pi pabhávita?? te pure matā. Purimà pi са pacehima 


і 5 шарпа ( = абра). ? 8 bhakkhe. 
3 B” and Si c.l. parakkhato. 3 5 saloka?. 
5 8 Si vyanti. 6 5 вагар. 
1—7 бот. 3 S assisap". 
979 After 19719 in B»? S (В” kabali’; S kabalinkàáhàr? and 
usupa). 
П $ imesà. 1? S dubbalo. 13 Br ош. 
H S te. 15 pr pabhàvità. 
16 Š sahabhumi. 17 p" S payojità. 
18 After! in B". 20 S anapatthità. 
21 S parivit&yanti. 7 Dr 5 gandhabbà. 


to 


3 5 pabhávitàvo (?) — Pabhāvitā = pabhavikā of 
Si note 15. 


14 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 775 


рі са annamannam ра lkadaei addasamsü! ti. Evam 
sarasaparittatàva appakam jivitam. 

Арі ea cãtummahārājikänam devānam jivitam upádàya 
manussüinam appakam jivitam, parittakam ]jivitam, tlio- 
kam? jivitam, khanikam jivitam, lahukam jivitam, ittaram? 
jivitam, anaddhaniyam 4 jivitam, na ciratthitikam jivitam ; 
iavatimsánam devànam, уйталат devanam, tusitànam 
devánam, nimmánaratinam devanam, parinimmitavasavat- 
tinam devànam, brahmakayikànam devánanm jivitam ?upà- 
daya manussánam appakam jivitam, parittakam jivitam, tho- 
kam" jivitam, khanikam jīvitun, lahukam jīvitam, ittaram 
jivitam, anaddhaniyam jivitam, па ciratthitikam jivitam. 

Vuttam h’ etam Bhagavatáà: *Appam idam bhikkhave 
manussánam йуп, gamaniyo ѕашрагауо, mantàya? phot- 
thabbam, kattabbam kusalam, earitabbam brahmacariyam. 
№ atthi jàátassa amaranam. Yo hi? bhikkhave eiram 
jivati so vassasatam appam уа bhiyyo. 

Appam ¿yu manussánam, hileyya? nam suporiso; 
careyy'!? àdittasiso va, п’ atthi maceussa п’ àgamo. 
Aecayanti ahorattà, jivitam. uparujjhati, 

ayu jryati maecánam kunnadinam va üdakan!' ti. 

Appii 10 idam jivitam аи dhirá ti. Dira? ti dhitimà 
ti dhirà ; dhitisampanna ti dbirà ; 1 dhikkatapapa ti dhīrā. 
Dhi vueeati 19 рабба ; уа paüna pajinanà vieayo pavieayo 


* S. i, 108. 


1—1 В” ?eim addasaim ; S ?eim addasamsu. 
? В” thokakam, below thokakam as S below. 
3 S ittharam here and below. 
* В” anaddhanikam here and below; Š anandànikam, 
below anuddbàánikam. 
5 p? repeats from lahukam jivitam, 4. 5 abore. 


€ p" S thokakam. * S samantàya. 
8 Bron. ? 5 hiloyya. 10 S eareyya ritta?. 
п В» odakan. 12 S dhirana dhira. 


13—13 Dr dhikata?; Si dhikkiti? (dhik-krta); S vigati- 
vāpāti dhirà. — Dhittati. 


S.N. 116] Gulatthakasuttaniddeso, 45 


dhammavieayo! sallakkhana upalakkhanà  paccuppalak- 
khana pandieeam kosallam nepuüüam vebhabyá? cintà 
upaparikkhà bhüri medhà parinàyika vipassanà sampa- 
jaüüam — patodo раййа panüindriyam — paünábalhuun 
pannasattham —pannapásado pauna-aloko  paüna-oblháso 
pannapajjoto pannáratanam?  amoho  dhammavieayo, 
sammàditthi; taya panháya samannpagatattà * dhirà. Арі 
en khandhadhira dhàátudhirà àyatanadhirà patiecasamup- 
pádadhirà satipatthànadhirà sammappadhanadhira iddhi- 
pádadhirá? indriyadhirà baladhirà bojjhaügadhirà mag- 
g&dhira phaladhirà nibbánadhira. Те dhirà evam алатки 
manussánam appakam jivitam, parittakam jivitam, thokam 
jivitam, khanikam  jivitam, lahukam jivitam, ittaram 
jivitam, anaddhaniyam jivitam, па ciratthitüikam jivitan 
ti, evam àhamsu, evam kathenti, evam bhananti, evam 
dipayanti, evam voharanti ti, appam? h’ idam jivitam аһа 
арта. Ten аһа Bhagavà: 


Tasmà hi sikkhetha idh' eva janíu; 
yam kiüei jannà visaman ti loke, 
na tassa hetü visamam сагеууа, 
appam b’ idam jivitam àhu dhirà ti. 


Равваті loke pariphandamànam 
рајат imam tanhagatam bhavesu, 
hinà пага macecumukhe lapanti 
avitatanhàse bhavabhavesu. 5. 


Passümi loke pariphandamünan ti.  Passümi ti mam- 
sacakkhuná pi passümi, dibbaeakkhuna pi passámi, pañ- 
üácakkhuná рі passàmi, buddhaeakkhunà pi passámi, 
samantacakkhunà pi равваті, dakkhàmi olokemi nijjhàyami 
upaparikkhàmi. Loke ti apáyaloke manussaloke devaloke 


В» om. 

S corrupt, points to а reading vebhabyan, see below. 
S panhásatíam pafinà. 

В» süumpannagatattà as usual. 

S iddhippáda? as usual. 5 S appam idam. 


= + G ы 7 


46 Atthakaraggo. [S.N. 776 


khandhaloke dhátuloke &yatanaloke. | Pariphandamànan ti 
tanhàphandanáya phandamànam, ditthiphandanàáya phan- 
damanam,  kilesaphandanàya  phandamànam,  payoga- 
рһапдапауа phandamànam, vipákaphandanaya pbhanda- 
manam, ducearitaphandanaya phandamànam,  raitam! 
rágena phandamànam, duttham dosena phandamànam, 
mülham mohena phandamàánam, vinibandham màánena 
phandamàánam, parámattham & шуа pbhandamàánam, 
vikkhepagatam uddhaecena phandamánam, anitthaügatam 
vieikiechàya phandamànam, thàmagatam anusayehi phan- 
damánam, làbhena phandamàánam, alabhena рһапдаша- 
nam, yasena phandamánam, ayasena phandamaànam, 
pasamsáya phandamáünam, nindáàya phandamàánam, su- 
khena phandamanam, dukkhena рһапдатапат, jàtiya 
phandamànam, jaràya рһардашапат, byàdhinà? phan- 
damánam, maranena phandamànam, sokaparidevadukkha- 
domanassupiyüsehi phandamaànam, nerayikena dukkhena 
phandamàánam, iraechanayonikena dukkhena  phanda- 
manam, pittivisayikena? dukkhena phandamánam, mānu- 
sikena * dukkhena phandamànam, gabbhokkantimülakena 
dukkhena phandamànam, gabbhe*? thitimülakena duk- 
khena phandamànam, gabbhavuttháànamülakena dukkhena 
phandamanam, jàtass' upanibandhikena dukkhena phan- 
damünam, jàtassa paràdheyyakena dukkhena phanda- 
manam, attupakkamena dukkhena phandamàánam, paru- 
pakkamena dukkhena phandamànam, dukkhadukkhena 
pbandamánam, samkháradukkhena phandamanam, vipa- 
rinamadukkhena phandamànam, eakkhurogena dukkhena 
phandamàánam,  sotarogena  dukkhena phandamānam, 


1 Şi has rattaràgena . . . dutthadosena down to thàma- 
gata-anusayehi; B? has sive times the reading here adopted 
таат, parimattam, vikkhepagatam, anitthagatam, tha- 
magatam ; «nd S Jive times rattam, mulliam, vinibandham, 
anitthagatam, thamagatam. 

2 8 byadhiyà. 3 8 petti? throughout. 

а B" mánussikena. 

5 5 раро thitam mulakena. 


S.N. 716] Сила! hakasuttaniddeso. 47 


ghanarogena dukkhena, јіуһагосепа dukkhena!, kàyaro- 
gena? dukkhena!, sisarogena dukkhena!, kannarogena?, 
mukharogena, dantarogena, Каѕепа, sàsena, pinàsena, 
dahena?, jarena, kuechirogena, mucceháya, pakkhandikáva, 
sulàya5, visueilkáya, kutthena, gandena, kilásena, soseua, 
apamárena, dadduyà, kanduyà, kaechuyü, rakhasava5, 
vitaechikàya, lohitena, pittena", madhumehena, amsáva 
рПакауа, bhagandalena, pittasamutthànena арадһепа, 
semhasamutthaànena ābādhena, vàtasumutthaànena ābā- 
dhena, sannipàtikena abadhena, utuparinàmajena афа. 
dhena, visamaparibárajenga àbàdhena, opakkamikena àbà- 
dhena, kammavipákajena ibàdhena, sitena, unhena, jigha- 
echàya, ріраѕауа, uccárena, passavena?, damsamakasavà- 
látapasirimsapasamphassena?  dukkhena, mátumaranena 
dukkhena,  pitumaranena  dukkhena, —bhátumaranena 
dukkhena, bhaginimaranena dukkhena, puttamaranena 
dukkhena, dhitumaranena  dukkhena,  nátibyasanena!, 
bhogabyasanena!!, rogabyasanena, silabyasanena, ditthi- 
byasanena, dukkhena phandamànam sampbandamàünam 
vipphandamánam vedhamàánam  pavedhamánam sampa- 
vedhamànam  passáàmi dakkhami olokemi  nijjhiyámi 
upaparikkhámi ti, passāmi loke pariphandamànam. 
Pajam imam? tanhagatanv?? bhaves ti. Раја ti sattà- 
dhivaeanam. Гана ti гпраќаџћа saddatanha gandhatanha 
rasatanhà photthabbatanhà dhammatauhà. Tanhagatan 
ti tanhàgatam tanhànugatam tanhàanusatam!* Ptanháya 
раппат ! tanhàya pátitam !? abhibhütam pariyádinnacit- 


! B> Š om. ? Š om. š S kanm °. 

а S dàhena. 5 В” sülena : S sulena. 

° B" rakkhasáya. 7 S ad. semehana ( =semhena). 
3 В” pasavena ; S passavena. 9 S ?makassa?. 

10 5 ad. dukkhena. 11 S ?cyasanena tÜUiroughout. 
12 $ дашат. 13 pr 8 tanhágatam (S бап). 


S tanhàyànusatam. 
15—15 B" S tanbáyàsannam (5 tanháya?). 
16 Si v.l. ратїр°. 


48 Afthakavaggo. (S.N. 776 


tam.  Dharesi ti kaàmabhave rüpabhave arüpabhave ti, 
pajam imam fanhagatam bhavesu. 

Hiná! пата maccumukhe lapanti ti. Ha пата ti hinena 2 
kàyakammena samannágata 3ti hina?; hinena vacikam- 
mena samannágatà t hinà?; hinena manokammena 
samannágatà ii hinà*; hinena panatipatena samanna- 
сма ti hinà?; hinena айіппадапепа, hinena kàmesu 
miechácàrena, hinena  musàávàdena, hinàya  pisunàya 
vácáya, hinaya pharusaya уасауа, hinena samphappala- 
pena, hinaya abhijjhàya, hinena byápádena, hináya mic- 
cháditthiya, hinehi samkhárehi, hinehi pañeahi kàma- 
gunehi, hinehi paneahi nivaranehi, hinaya cetanàya, 
hinàya patthanàaya?, hinàya panidhiyà samannagata? ti 
шпа ?nihtnà *omakà làmakà jatukka? parittà ti, hinà пага. 
Maccumukhe lapanti t maccumukhe máramukhe marana- 
mukhe maceuppatta 1 maecusampattà maceupágatà шагар- 
раа marasampatta marupagatà maranappattà marana- 
sampattà maranupagatà lapanti làlapanti socanti kila- 
manti paridevanti urattàlim kandanti sammoham арај- 
janti ti, hīnā пага maceumukhe lapanti. 

Avitatanhàáse bhavabhavesü ti 1 бадра ti! rüpatanhà . . . 
pe...dhammatanhà. DBhavabhavesü ti bhavabhave kamma- 
bhave, punabbhave, kàmabhave kammabhave, kamabhave 
punabbhave", rüpabhave kammabhave, rüpabhave punab- 
bhave, arüpabbave kammabhave, arüpabhave punabbhave, 
13 punappunam bhave, punappunam gatiyà!?, punappunam 4 


1 8 hina пага here and below. 
2 B? 5 ad. hinà пага (S hina пага). 


373 BP S om. 4 B? 8 ad. пага. 
5 5 patthanáya. в p? S ?gatatta. 
т B? 8 ad. пага hina. š B? S ad. ohinà. 


э S jatunna; В" 2. 

10 Š тассираппа (= pattà ?). 
1-1 $i om. 12 Š ad. kàmabhave. 
13—13 B? punappunabhave punappunagatiya; S punab- 
lhave punabbhave gatiyà. 

14 5 punappuna; B? too probably. 


S.N. 711) Guhatthakasuttantilileso. 49 


upapattiyi, punappunam! patisandhiyà, punappunain? 
attabhavabhinibbattiya. 

Аена ti? avigatatanha  acattatanhà  avantatanha 
amuttatanhà  appahinatanhá —appatinissatthatunha ti, 
avitatanhàse bhavabhavesu. Теп’ аһа Blagavi: 


Passami loke pariphandamánam 
pajam imam tanhagatam bhavesu, 
hīnā narā maccumukhe lapanti 
avitatanhase bhavàbhavesu ti. 


Mamaàayite passatha phandamiüne 
macche уа appodake?* khinasote, 
etam рі disvà amamo сагеууа 
bhavesu asattim akubbamano. 6. 


Mamáyite  passatha — phaidam ine. ti. Mamattà ti dve 
namatta: tanhamamattan са ditthumamattan са. 
Katamam tanhámamattam? — Yavatà tanhasamkháteni 
eimakatam mariyadikatam? odhikatun  pariyantikatam ° 
pariggahitam mamáàyitam: idam mamam, etam шатар. 
ettakam mamam, ettivatà mamam, mama rüpa вайда 
сапаһа таза photthabba, attharanà, papurana, dasidasa 
ajelakà — kukkutasükara — hatthigavássavalavà — khettan 
vatthu — hiranham  suvannam  giümanigamarajadhàniyo" 
ratthan са janapado ea koso са kotthügüran ca: kevalam 
pi mahápathavim tanhávasena mamayati, yàvata* attha- 
satatanhávicaritam 8; idam tanhámamattam. 

Katamam ditthimamattam 2 Visativatthuka | sakkaya- 
ditthi, dasavatthuka  miecháditthi, dasavatthDukà antag- 
пашка? ditthi; уа evarüpa аі, а сабил  ditthi- 


1 B? 5 punappuna. 
S punappuna ; BP too probably. 3 Pr S on. 
Si appodaka throughout. 
B" pariyantakataum ; S pariyantam katam. 
B"? r&jatthaniyo. 7 Sion. 
В” atthasatam tanha?; 5 atthavasatatanha?; М 
atthasatatanhàviparitamn 
9 S ?gühikaya. 


o © ч t 


s 


50 Afthakacaggo. (S.N. 777 


gahanam ditthikantàro ditthivisükayikam ditthivipphan- 
ditam! ditthisamyojanam gàho patiggàho?  abhiniveso 
parámáso kummaggo mieehàpatho  miechattam  titthà- 
yatanam?, vipariyesagàho, viparittagáho?, vippallàsagaho, 
miechágàho, ayáthàvakasmim yāthāvakan ti gàho, yavata 
dvàsatthi ditthigatáni; idam ditthimamattam. 

Mamāyite  passatha phandamāne ti mamáyitavatthu- 
acchedasamkino pi phandanti, acchijjante? "pi phandanti, 
aechinne pi? phandanti, mamaàyitavatthuviparinàmasam- 
kino? pi phandanti, viparinàmante pi phandanti, viparinate 
pi phaudanti paphandanti? samphandanti vipphandanti 
vedhanti?? pavedhanti? sampavedhanti: evam phaida- 
mane рарћапдатапе 12 samphandamàne vipphandamàne 
vedhamàáne pavedhamàne sampavedhamaáne passatha dak- 
khatha oloketha nijjhayatha upaparikkhathà ti, mamāyite 
passatha phandamaàne. 

Macche va appodake khinasote ti: yathà maechá appodake 
parittodake udakapariyàdáne kákehi và kulalehi và balakehi 
và paripátiyamánaà ukkhipiyamanà khajjamàna phandanti 
paphandaniiM samphandanti vipphandanti vedhanti pave- 
dhanti sampavedhanti; evam eva paja mamayitavatthu- 
&cehedasamkino pi phandanti, aechijjante pi phandanti, 
acchinne pi phandanti, mamáyitavatthuviparinamasamkiuo 
pi phandanti, viparinumante pi phandantü, viparinate pi 
phandanti paphandanti!! samphandanti vipphandanti ve- 
dhanti pavedhanti sampavedhanti ti, maeche va appodake 
khinasote. 

Etam pi disrà amamo careyya ti etam àdinavam disrá 
passitvà tulayitvà tirayltvà vibhavayltvà vibhütam katvà 


1 р” 8 ?kam. ? В” рай ао ; S patitthàho. 
3 S miechayatiain. 

4 p» S viparita? (= vipari°). 

D" S mamäyitam vatthum асспеда?. 

9 p" 8 aechindante throughout. 777 S on. 
5 p" Š mamáyitam vatthum viparinima?. 

э p? Si om. ; S phandanti. 

19 Si vedhenti throughout. П St om. 


o 


S.N. 778] Guhatthakasuttaniddeso, 51 


mamaítesü ti, etam pl disvà amamo сагеууа. Mamattā ti 
dve mamattà : tanhàmamattari са ditthimamattan са... 
pe... idam tanbàmamattam .. . ре... idam ditthi- 
mamattam. Tanhaámamattam paháya!, ditthimamattam 
patinissajjitva, cakkhum  amamaàyanto, soiam ашаша- 
yanto, ghánam amamayanto, jivhain amamàayanto, kaàyam 
ашашауапіо, manam amamayanto, rüpe sadde gandhe 
rase photthabbe kulam рапат àvàsam làbham yasam 
pasamsam sukham civaram pindapátam senásanam gilàna- 
paeeayabhesajjaparikkhüram kāmadhātum — rüpadhàtum 
arüpadhátum  kàmabhavam  rüpabhavam  arüpabhavam 
saünabhavam —asannábhavam —mnevasannànásannabhavam 
ekavokarabhavam eatuvokarabhavam райсауокагађћауат 
айбат  anágatam  paecuppannam  ditthasutamutavin- 
ñatabbe dhamme amamáyanto agganhanto aparámasanto 
&nabhinivisanto, careyya  vihareyya iriyeyya  vatteyya 
pàleyya yapeyya yaápeyya ti, etam? pi disvà amamo 
careyya. 

Dhavesu ásattin akubbamãāno ti. Bhavesi ti kàmabhave 
rüpabhave arüpabhave. dsatti vuccati tanhà; yo гадо 
sáràgo . . . pe . . . &bhijhà lobho akusalamülam. 
Bhavesu àsattim akubbamàno ti bhavesu ásattim akubba- 
mano, chandam решат rágam khantim akubbamano ajana- 
уашапо asaüjanayamáüno  anibbattayamàno  anabhinib- 
battayamáàno ti, bhavesu àsattim akubbamüno. Тел’ аһа 
Bhagavà : 


Mamáyite passatha рһапдатапе 
тассһе va &ppodake khinasote, 
etam? pi disvà amamo careyya 
bhavesu àsattim akubbamano ti. 


übhosu antesu vineyya chandam 
phassam pariññaya ananugiddho, 
уай attagarahi, tad akubbamiáno 
nà limpati* ditthasutesu dhiro. VÀ 


! B? pahayan. ? S evam. 
) 
3 8 evam vj disvá. а Si vd. lippati. 


52 Afthakavaggo. [S.N. 778 


Ulhosu antesu vineyya chandan ti. Antà i phasso eko 
anto, phassasamudayo dutiyo anto.  Atito еко anto, anā- 
gato dutiyo anto. Sukhà vedanà еко anto, dukkhà vedana 
dutiyo anto. Хатат eko anto, гпрап dutiyo anto. Cha 
ajjhattikàni àyatanáni еко anto, cha bāhirāni àyatanàni 
dutiyo anto. Sakkáyo eko anto, sakkayasamudayo dutiyo 
anto til. ? Chando ti? yo Катеѕи kàmaechando, kàmarago 
kamanandi kámatanhà kámasneho kàámaparilàho kàma- 
mueehà kàmajjhosànam kàmogho Кашауосо kamupa- 
dànam kámaechandanivaranam.  ? Übhosu antesu vineyya 
chandan ti? ubhosu antesu ehandam vimeyya pativineyya 
pajaheyya vinodeyya byantikareyya anabhàvam gameyyà 
ti, ubhosu апіеви vineyya chandam. 

Phassam ратїййауа anünugüldho tì. — Phasso ti cakkhu- 
samphasso, sotasamphasso, ghánasamphasso  jivhàásam- 
phasso, kàyasamphasso, manosamphasso, adhivacanasam- 
phasso, patighasamphasso, sulhavedaniyo вашрһавво, 
dukkhavedaniyo samphasso, adukkha-m-asukhavedaniyo 
samphasso, kusalo phasso, akusalo phasso, abyàlkaito* 
phasso, kàmàvaearo phasso, rüpávacaro phasso, arupà- 
vacaro phasso, suññato phasso, animitto phasso, appanihito 
phasso, lokiyo phasso, lokuttaro phasso, atito phasso, 
anàgato phasso, paccuppanno phasso ; yo evarüpo phasso 
phusana samphusaná samphusitattam?; ayam vuceati 
phasso. 

Phassaii pariü aya ti phassam tibi pariññahi parijánitvà 
Bataparinnaya tiranaparinhàya б pahaànaparinnaya. 

Katama fnàátaparinha?  Phassam janáti: ayam cakkhu- 
samphasso, ayam вођавашрһавво, ayam ghànasamphlnasso, 
ayam jivhasamphasso, ayam kayasamphasso, ayam muno- 
samphasso, ayam adhivacanssamphasso, ayam patigha- 
samphasso, ayam sukhavedaniyo phasso, ayam dukkha- 
vedaniyo phasso, ayam adukkha-m-asukhavedaniyo phasso, 
ayam kusalo phasso, ayam akusalo phasso, ayam abyākato 
phasso, ayam künávaearo phasso, ayam гпрауасато phasso, 

person. 2-2 Bi on. 373 Si om. 

! S avyükato. 5 Š samphussita?. 9 (Codd, G°. 


S.N. 778] Guhatthakasuttaniddeso, 58 


ayam arüpavacaro phasso, ayam sunnato phasso, ayam 
animitto phasso, ayam appanihito phasso, ayam lokiyo 
phasso, ayam lokuttaro phasso, ayam atito phasso, ауаш 
anagato phasso, ayam расспрраппо phasso ti jānāti 
passati; ayam ñatapariñnña. 

Katamà tiranapariñnña? Evam natam! kaiva phassam 
tireti, aniecato dukkhato rogato gandato sallato? aghato 
abadhato parato? palokato itito upaddavato bhayato upa- 
saggato calato pabhaüguto addhuvato atünato alenato 
asaranato rittato* tucchato sunnato anaítato àidinavato 
viparinàmadhammato asárakato? aghamulato vadhakato 
vibhavato sásavato sankhatato máàrimisato jàtidhammato 
jaràdhammato byàdhidhammato maranadhammato soka- 
paridevadukkhadomanassupàyasadhammato —samkilesika- 
dhammato? samudayato atthaüngamato assadato àdinavato 
nissaranato гей; ayam tiranaparinüà. 

Кабата pahanaparinna? Evam tirayitvà phasse chanda- 
ragam pajahati vinodeti byantikaroti? angbhàvam gameti. 

Vuttam h’ etam Bhagavatà: * Yo bhikkhave phassesu 
chandarágo, tam pajahatha; evam so phasso pahino bha- 
vissati ucchinnamülo tàlàvatthukato anabhàvaügato? àya- 
tim anuppàdadhammo ti; ayam pahànaparinna. 

Phassam pariññāyā ti phassam imáhi thi pariünnàáhi 


parijànitvà. 
Anünugiddho ti. Gedho vuceati tanhà. Хо rágo sārāgo 
pe... abhijhà lobho akusalamülum; yass’ eso? 


gedho райпо samuechinno vüpasanto  patipassaddho 
abhabbuppattiko nánaggini daddho, so упссай agiddho. 
So rüpe agiddho, sadde agiddho, gandhe agiddho, rase 
agildho, photthabbe agiddho, kule gane àvàse libhe vase 
pasamsaya sukhe civare pindapáte senásane gilanapaecas a- 


* Cy. 8. iii, 377. 


! $ ñanam. ? S sunnato. 

3 S sarato. 3 S ad. asaranàbhunato pi. 
5 S asárato. $ B" 5 sankilesadh . 

7 В" byantiin?. 8 В" S anabhavamkato. 

9 


S ad. dhe. 


54 Athakaragqo. (S.N. 778 


bhesajjaparikkhare, kàmadhatuyà rüpadhátuyà arüpadha- 
tuya, kàmabhave rüpabhave arüpabhave saüüabhave asañña- 
bhave nevasannanàsannabhave ekavokàrabhave catuvokà- 
rabhave paneavokárabhave, atite anagate paccuppanne, 
ditthasutamutavinnátabbesu dhammesu agiddho agadhito 
amucchito anajjhopanno! vitagedho vigatagedho catta- 
gedho vantagedho? muttagedho? pahinagedho patinis- 
satthagedho  vitarago  vigatarügo cattarāgo  vantaràgo 
muttarāgo pahimarago patinissattharàgo niecháto nibbuto 
gitibhüto sukhapatisamvedi brahmabhütena attanà viharati 
ti, phassam рагїййауа anánugiddho. 

Fad attagarahi tad akubbamanoti. Yadan ti yam. *Atta- 
дата ti* dvihi karanehi attànam garahati, katattà ca 
akatattà ca. 

Katham katattà ca akatattā ca attanam garahati? 
Katam me kàáyaduecaritam, akatam те kàyasucaritan ti 
attànam garahati; katam me vaciduccaritam, akatam me 
vacisuearitan ti aitànam garahati; katam me manoduc- 
caritam, akatam me manosucaritan ti attànam garahati; 
kato me panatipato, akatá те pānātipātā veraman ti 
айапат garahati; katam me adinnádànam, akatà me 
adinnadànà veramani ti attanam garahati; kato me kamesu 
miechacáro, akatà me kámesu mieehácárà veramani ti 
айапат garahati; kato me musavado, akata me musāvādā 
veramani ti attànam garahati; Каа me pisunà v&cà, akata 
me pisunàya vācāya veramani ti attànam garahati; kata 
me pharusà vàca, akata me pharusaya vācāya veramani ti 
aitánam garahati; Кабо me ватрһаррајаро, akatü me 
samphappalapa veramapi ti attanam garahati; kata me 
abhijhà, akatà me anabhijjhà ti attánam garahat!; kato 
me byàpado, akato me abyapado ti attànam garahati; Баа 
me miecháditthi, akatà me sammüditthi ti attànam gara- 
рай; evam Кабай ea akatatti ca attànam  garahati. 
Athavá, silesu "mhi na paripürakàri? ti attānan garahati ; 


В" S anajjhápanno. 2 Š vyantagedho. 
5 Som. 175 M attanà garahati. 
5 5 purakári. 


S.N. 718] Guhatthakasuttanidid so. 5i 


indriyesu "mhi aguttadváro ti attànam garahati; bhojane 
lamattannu 'mhi ti! attànam garahati; јасапуаш ^ana- 
nuyutto "nhi ti? attànam garahati ; na ? satisampajannena 
*^samannágato 'mhi tit attànam garahati; abhāvitā me 
eattàro satipatthanà ti attanam garahati; abhávità me 
сайаго sammappadhànà ti attanam garahaüi; abhività 
me сабќаго iddhipadà ti attànam garahati; abhavitani me 
pahe' indriyàni ti attinam garahati; abhávitàni me pinea 
balani ti attànam garahati; abhavità me satta bojjhanga 
ti attànam garahati; abhávito me ariyo atthaügiko maggo 
ti attànam garahati; dukkham me aparinnatan ti attànam 
garahati; samudayo me appahino ti айапат garahati; 
margo me abhàvito ti attànam garahaü; nirodho me 
asacehikato ti айапат garahati; evam katattà ca akatattà 
са aitànam garabati. Evam attagaralitam kammam aknb- 
bamano ? ajanayamàno asanjanayamáno? anibbattayamāno 
anabhinibbattayamàno ti, yad attagarahi tad akubbamano. 

Na limpati diflhasutesu. dhiro ti. Lepà? ti dve lepa: 
tanhálepo са ditthilepo са... pe... ayam tanhalepo 
... pe... ayam ditthilepo. Dhīiro ti dhiro pandito pañ- 
паха buddhima йаш vibhávi medhavi. Dhiro tanhálepain 
pahaya, ditthilepam patinissajjitvà, ditthe na limpati, sute 
па Шарай, mute na limpati, уїййайө na limpati na sam- 
limpati? na upalimpati, alitto asamlitto? anupalitto nik- 
khanto nissattho vippamutto visamyutto vimariyadika- 
tena? сеїаѕа viharati ti, na limpati ditthasutesu арго 20, 
Ten’ аһа Bhagavä: 


Ubhosu antesu vineyya chandam 
phassam parinniya anānugiddho, 
yad attagarahi, tad akubbamāno 
na limpati ditthasutesu dhiro!? ti. 


1-1 D" amattannu ti; S amattannun pi ti. 
2-2 D ananuyutto ti; S anayutto ti. 3 Son. 
1-3 D? Š asamannágato ti. 
5-5 S ajanasasamàno asanjanasasumano. 
$ Br 5 lepo. 7 B? palimpati. 8 P" S apalitto. 
9 В” 5 vipariyad?? throuyhont. 0 B" S ad, ti. 


56 Atthakaraggo. (S.N. 779 


Sunnam рагіпӣа vitareyya ogham 
pariggahesu muni nopalitto 

abbul hasallo earam! appamatto 
náàsimsati lokam imam рагай ca. 8. 

Saññam parinnà vitareyya oghan. ti. аппа ti kama- 
saünà byüpáüdasaüna  vihimsásanhna, ?nekkhammasannà 
abyaüpádasannà  avihimsásanna?, гправайћа  saddasanna 
gandhasanná rasasanná plhotthabbasanüna dhammasanüi; 
yà evarüpá sañña sañjanana sañjanitattam ayam vuecati 
sanna. —Sannage pariññā ti saññam tihi parinñahi pari- 
jànitvà ñatapariññaya tiranapari&naya раһапарат1ййауа. 

Katama ñatapariñña 2 — Sannam јапай: ayam kama- 
ѕайћа, ayam Dyapadasañña, ayam vihimsasanña, ayam 
nekkhammasañña, ayam abyüpádasanna, ayam avihim- 
gsüsanña, ayam rüpasanña, ayam saddasañña, ayam gan- 
dhasañña, ayam rasasañña, ayam photthabbasaüna, ayam 
dhammasanñña ti Janati passati; ayam ñataparinña, 

Кабата tiranapariñña 2 Evam дабат katva saññam 
гей, aniccato dukkhato rogato gandato sallato aghato 
ábádhato parato — palokato ītito upaddavato  bhayato 
upasaggato calato pabhanguto . . . pe... samudayato 
atthangamato assádato adinavato nissaranato tireti; ayam 
йгипарат1ййа. 

Katamā  pahánaparihha ?? Evam {гебуй*  saññaya 
ehandaragim pajahati vinodeti byantikaroli? anabhavam 
gameti. 

Ушаш ? h* etam Bhagavatà: * Yo bhikkhave saññayn7 
ehandarago, tam  pajahatha ; evam ва sañña pahina 
bhavissati uechinnamüla tálàvatthukatà anabhávangata? 
ayatim anuppaádadhamma ti; ayam pahánaparinna. 

Майар рача ti saüham  imáhi tihi parinnahi 
parijauitvà. 


* B. Ml, 27; 


L B cara. 2-2 IE ө. 3 S ad. evam tiàtam Каба. 
4 p" $8 tirayitvà (S t°). 5 prag. 


5 p" 8 «d. pi. 7 S ваййуа. 5 S ?katà. 


S.N. 779] Guhutthakasuttaniddeso. 57 


Vitareyya oghan ti kamogham bhavogham ditthogham 
avijjogham vitareyya! uttareyya patareyya samatikkameyya 
vitivatteyya ti, sabnam parinnà vitareyya ogham. 

Parigqalesu muni nopalitto ti. Paurigyahā Ú dve parig- 
баһа, tanhàpariggaho ea ditthipariggaho ea . . . pe.. 
ayam tanhapariggaho ... рө... ayain. ditthipariggaho. 

Mini ti. Monam vuecati nànam, уа раййа рајапапа 
‚.. pp... amoho dhammavieayo summáditthi; tena 
папепа samannágato muni monappatto £i. 

Тїп —moneyyani, — káyamoneyyamn — vaeimoneyyam 
manomoneyyam. 

Katamam Кауашопеууат ?  Tividhànam? káyaduceari- 
tànam раһапат, kayamoneyyam.  Tividham káyasueari- 
tam, káyamoneyyam. Kāyārammanam ? ñanam, Кауа- 
moneyyam. — Kàyaparinhi, küyamoneyyam. — Pariniiàsa- 
bhagato maggo, Еауашопеууаш. Kaye chandarágassa 
pahanam, kāyamoneyyam. — Ràyasaemkharanirodho ca- 
tutthajjhànasamüpatti?*, káyamoneyyam ; idam Кауа- 
moneyyam. 

Katamam vaeimoneyyam ? Catabbidhanam 5 vaciduecari- 
tànam  pahánam, vacimoneyyam. — Catubbidham vaci- 
sucaritam, vaeimoneyyam. Vācārammaņam © дапа, vaci- 
moneyyam.  Vàáeáparinna, vaeimoneyyam. — Parinnasaha- 
gato maggo, vaeimoneyyam. Vaeaya  ehandarügassa 
pahánam, vacimoneyyam. —Vaeisamkhaàranirodho dutiyaj- 
jhánasamàápatti?, vacimoneyyam ; idam vaeimoneyyam. 

Katamam manomoneyyam ? Tividhànam? manoduceari- 
tanam pahánam, manomoneyyam.  Tividham manosucari- 
tam, manomoneyyam.  Cittárammanaim? ñanam, manomo- 
neyyam. Cittaparinüáà,nanomoneyyam. Pariüháasahagato 
maggo,manomoneyyam.  Cittaechandarágassa ° pahánam, 
manomoneyyam.  Cittasamkhàáranirodho saññavedayita- 


1 B? S tareyya. ? pr 8 tividha. 

з p» S kayarammane (better). + B" Si eatutthajbana". 
5 5 catubbidha. $ Br $ vàeàramnmuaune. 

7 D" dutiyajhàna?. 8 S tividha?. 


9 В” ?mane: S ^mano. 10 Si сіце ch °. 


58 Afthakavaggo. [9.N. 779 


nirodhasamàpatti, manomoneyyam ; idam manomoney- 
yam. 


* Rayamunim! vàeàmunim manomunim aniüsavam 
munim moneyyasampannam? ара sabbapaháyinam. 
Kàyamunim váeimunim manomunim anásavam 
munim moneyyasampannam àhu ninhátapapákan ti?. 


Imehi tihi* moneyyehi dhammehi samannàgatà cha 
шипауо 5, àg&ramunayo? anágáramunayo sekhamunayo 
asekhamunayo paccekamunayo munimunayo 7. 

Katame àgüáramunayo? Үе te àgárikà ditthapadà viina- 
tasaásana ime āgāramunayo. 

Katame anāgāramunayo? Ye te pabbajità ditthapadà 
viňňātasāsanā, ime anágáramunayo. 

Satta sekhà sekhamunayo. 

Arahanto asekhamunayo. 

Paecekabuddhà paccekamunayo. 


Munimunayo vuecanti tathágatà arahanto sammàsam- 
buddha. 


T Ма monena muni hoti mülharüpo aviddasu, 

yo ea tulam уа paggayha varam ādāya pandito. 
Papani parivajjeti, ва muni, tena so muni; 

yo munàáti ubho loke, muni tena pavuccati. 

; Аваіаһ са satañ са Batvi dhammam 

ajjhattam bahiddhà ca sabbaloke 

devamanussehi püjito, 

yo so saügajàlam aticea so muni. 


Пера ti dve lepi, tanhàálepo са ditthilepo са 
pe... ayam tanhbālepo . . . pe . . . ayam аеро. 
Muni tanhálepam paháya ditthilepam patinissajjitvà parig- 


* Itv. $ 67. + Dhp. 268-269. 
T Sn. 597. 
1 5 ?muni throughout. 2 S ?samphanda. 
5 Siom. 3 SI S от. 5 p» S munino. 


° B" S *munino throughout. T Sad. t. 


S.N 779] G uhatthakasuttaniddeso. 59 


gahesu na limpati ! па samlimpati? па upalimpati, alitto 2 
asamlitto  «wupelitto  nikkhanto  nissattho — vippamutto 
visamyutto vimarlyadikatena? сеќава viharati ti, parig- 
gahesu muni nopalitto. 

Abbülliasallo carau, appamatto ti. Sallan ti satta sallani, 
rágasalam  dosasallam  mohasallam mànasallam  ditthi- 
sallam sokasallam  kathamkathasallum*. Yass’ etàni? 
sallani З раһіпалі ? samuechinnáni vüpasantáni pati- 
passaddhàni?$ abhabbuppattikàni nánagginà daddhàni, so 
vuceati abbülhasallo abbülhitasallo? pahatasallo?? uddhata- 
sallo samuddhatasallo uppátitasallo samuppititasallo cat- 
tasallo vantasallo muttasallo раһіпаѕаПо patinissattha- 
sallo, niechàto nibbuto sitibhüto sukhapatisamvedi brahma- 
bhütena attanà viharati ti abbülhasallo. 

Carun ti caranto viharanto iriyanto vattento!! pàlento 
yapento vápento. 

Appamatto ti sakkacecaküri!? sütaecakari!?? atthitaküri ! 
anolinavuttiko anikkhittaechando anikkhittadhuro kunsa- 
lesu dhammesu. Katháham aparipüram và silakkhandham 
paripüreyyam, paripüram và silakkhandham tattha tattha 
райлауа anugganheyyan? ti, yo tattha chando са vayamo 
ea ussāho са ussolhi ca appativàni ca satisampajannan }° 
са ütappam padhànam adhitthànam арихосо appamado 
kusalesu dhammesu. 1° Kathüham aparipüram và sama- 
dhikkhandham  paripüreyyam paripüram và samàádhik- 
kbandham tattha tattha райййуа anugganhevyan? ti... 
pe... kusalesu dbammesu. Kathàham aparipüram và 


1-1 В» na palimpati ; S om. 
2 B" S apalitto. 
3 В” S vipariyadi? always. 
3 S duecarita?. ^ В” S ete. 6 B” um. ; S sallà. 
1 B" S pahina and so on to дааа. 
8 B" S patipp°. 
9 Siom.; В” S abbu(Dhitasallo. 
19 Br S om. п Dr vattanto. 
1? Š ad. siti. 13 S gitikarl. 
14 S om. 1 B" S sati ea s?. 16—35 (р, 60) S on. 


60 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 779 


painnàkkhandham vimuttikkhandham?! vimuttinánadassa- 
nakkhandham paripireyyam paripüram và vimuttinana- 
dassanakkhandham баһа tattha pannaya anugganhey- 
yan? ti, yo tattha chando ca уйуашо ca ussáho са ussolhi 
ca appativànl ca satisampajaliaü? ea àtappam padhànam 
adhitthàngzn anuyogo appamádo kusalesu dhammesu š. 
Katháham aparinnátam và dukkham parijáneyyam, appa- 
hine và kilese pajaheyyam, abhàávitam và maggam bhà- 
veyyam, asacchikatain và nirodham sacchikareyyan? ti, yo 
tattha chando са vàyàmo са ussáho ca ussolhi са appa- 
tivàni са satisampajaññañ2 са atappam padhànam adhit- 
{апат anuyogo appamado kusalesu dhammesü ti, abbülha- 
sallo caram appamatto. 

Nāsimsatit lokam imam parañ cà ti imam lokam павіт- 
sati sakattabhāvam, param? lokam nāsimsati parattabha- 
vam. Imam lokam nāsimsati sakaruüpavedanasannàsam- 
kharaviinànam, param lokam nàsimsati pararüpavedanà- 
sannásamkháravinnanam9. 7Imam lokam nàsimsati cha 
ajjhattikani àyatanàni?, param lokam nàsimsati cha bahi- 
rani àyatanani. Imam lokam nàsimsati manussalokam, 
param? lokam nàsimsati devalokam. Imam lokam nàsim- 
sati kàmadhátum, param lokam nāsimsati rüpadhatum 
arupadhàtum. Imam lokam násimsati kàmadhàátum rüpa- 
dhatum, param? lokam nàsimsati arüpadhátum.  Punà- 
gatim? và upapattim!? уй patisandhim và bhavam và 
samsaram và vattam vā nasinsati na icchati na sādiyati 
na pattheti па piheti nàbhijappati ti, násimsati lokam imam 
рагай са. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà : 


E 


D" ad. paripüreyyam. 

D" S sati ca 5°. 3 See n. 18, p. 59. 
В” S nàsisatl throughout. 

Si paralokam ?hroughout. 

Š param rüpa*. 

7-7 S om. 5 B" Si paralokam. 
B" 5i punagatim ; 8 punagatam. 

S uppatti. 


t 


S.N. 779] Guhatthakasuttaniddeso. 61 


Sannam ратїййа vitareyya ogham 
pariggahesu muni nopalitto 
abbülhasallo earam appamatto 
násinisati lokam imam рагай са til 


DuriYo? avHaTTHAKASUTTANIDDESO З NITTIIHTO *. 


! Biom. ? pr S om. 

? В” S guhatthakasuttam (S гапа ака). 

4 Бел шаш dutiyam ; S nitthitam dutiyam duttaka- 
suttaniddeso vuceati. 


ПІ. 
TATIYO! DUTTIIATTHARASUTTANIDDESO 2. 


Vadanti ve dutthamanà pi eke, 
&hüe? pi ve saccamanàá vadanti, 
удаад са jatam muni no upeti, 
tasma muni n’ atth: khilo kuhinei. 1. 


Vadanti ve а Патапа рі ске ti. Те titthiya dutfhamanā 
padutthamaná viruddhamanà pativiruddhamana аһаіа- 
шапа paeeahatamanà àghàtitamanà paccāghātitamanā va- 
danti upavadanti Bhagavantaü са bhikkhusamghaü са 
abhütena ti, уайап ve dutthamanà pi eke. 

A fiic? pi ve saccamaná vadanti ti. Ye tesam titthtyanam 
saddahanta okappentà adhnnuceeantà saccamaná sacca- 
вайтипо bhütamanà bhütasannino tathamanà tathasannino 
yáthavamanà yàthávasanüino aviparittamana * aviparitta- 
sahnino vadanti upavadanti Bhagavantan са bhikkhusam- 
ghañ ea abhutena ti, aüne рі ve saceamanàá vadanti. 

Vadah са jūtam muni no upeti ti. So rado jāto hoti 
sañjāto nibbatto abhinibbatto pàátubhüto, parato ghoso 
akkoso upuvado Bhagavato ea bhikkhusamghassa са abhü- 
tenā ti, vādañ са játam muni по ирей ti. 

AMwn* ti. Monam vuceaíi ñanani уа panna pajanana 
.. pel... amoho dhammavieayo sammáditthi; tena 


* See Chap. II. p. 5T. 


і p'$S on. 

2 pr Dutthakatthakasutti anukatthi ; S om. whole title. 

3 В” S atho. 4 B" S aviparita? (= ita). 
62 


S.N. 181) Dutthatthakasuttaniddeso. 63 


üánena samannagato muni monappatto . . . pe.. 
sangajàlam aticea so muni ti! 

Yo садат upeti so dvihi kàranehl vada upeti. Кагако 
kárakataya vadam upeti; aàthava vuccamàno upavadi- 
yamáno kuppati? byápajjati patitthiyati, kopan ca dosan 
са аррассауай са pütukaroti акагако 'mhi ti ?yo vadam 
upeti so? imehi dvihi karanehi уада upeti. Muni dvīhi 
küranehi vádam na upeti. АКагако ahürakatàya* vadam 
na upeti; athavà vuccamàno upavadiyamáno па kuppati 
па byápajjati na patitthiyati na Кораћ са dosan ca appac- 
сауай ca piátukaroti akárako 'mhi ti muni imehi dvihi 
kiranehi vàdam na upeti na upagacchati na ganhüti па 
parámasati na abhinivisati ti, vàdan са játam muni no 
upeti. 

Таята muni w atthi khilo kuhinet ti. Tasmā ti tasmā 
tamkáranà tamhetu tappaccayà tamnidana munino ahata- 
саба 5 Lhilajàtata 9 pi n’ аі; рапса pi cetokhili n’ 
&tthi; tayo pi khilà n'atthi; rigakhilo dosakhilo moha- 
khilo n' atthi na santi па samvijjati n' upalabbhati, pahino 
samuechinno vüpasanto patipassaddho abhabbuppattiko 
папасоіпа daddho.  Auhim: ti kuhinei kimhici katthaci 
ajhattam và bahiddhà và aijhattabahiddhà và ti, баша 
muni n’ atthi khilo kuhibei. Теп’ аһа Dhagavà: 

Vadanti ve dutthamana pi eke, 

айде” рі ve? saccamanà vadanti, 

vàdan ea jātam muni no upeti, 

tasmaà muni n’ atthi khilo kuhinei ti. 
Sakam hi ditthim Капаш aceayeyya 
chandánunito гпсіуа nivittho? 
sayam samattáni ракиђрашапо?, 
yathà hi jàneyya, tathà vadeyya. 2. 


! B" S от. 

? S ad. 18 after upavadiyamáno, kuppati, byápajatti, 
patitthiyati. 3753 $ muni. 

* S ad. muni. 5 S ápàtacittatà. $ Si КЫА. 


t Beatha; S atho рі. š 5 ke. 9 5 kuppamano. 


64 Affhakavaggo. [S.N. 781 


Sakam hi ditthin katham accayeyya ? ti. Үе te titthiya 
Sundarim * paribbàjikam hantvà!, samanànam sakyaputti- 
yánam avannam ракаѕауібуа, evam etam làbham yasam 
sakkarasammánam paccāãharissāmā ti —evaimditthikà ? 
evamkhanükà evamrucikà evamladdhikà evamajjhasayà 
evamadhippàyà, te nàsakkhimsu sakam ditthnn sakam 
khantim sakam rueim вакат laddhim sakam ajjhàsayam 
sakam  adhippiyam  atikkamitum. Atha kho sv eva 
ayaso te? paecágato ti, evam pi sakam hi ditthim katham 
accayeyya? 

Athavà sassato loko, idam eva saecam, mogham аййап 
ti yo so evamvádo, so вакат ditthim вакат khantim 
вакат rueim sakam laddhim вакат ajjhásayam вака 
adhippiyain katham ассауеууа atikkameyya samatikka- 
meyya vitivatteyya ? Tam kissa hetu? Tassa ва ditthi 
{айа samattà samádinnáà сапа paràmatthà abhinivitthà 
ajjhosità adhimuttà tj, evam рі вакат hi ditthim katham 
accayeyya ?*  Asassato loko, antava loko, anantavà loko, 
tam jivam tam sariram, айһаш jivam annam sariram, 
hoti tathāgato param marana, na hoti tathàágato param 
marani, hoti са na са hoti tathàgato param marana, n’ eva 
hoti na na hoti tathagato param шатала, idam ета saccam, 
mogham aññan ti yo so evamvádo, so вакат ditthim 
sakam khantim вакат rueim sakam laddhim sakam ajjhà- 
sayam sakam adhippáyam katham accayeyya atikkameyya 
samatikkameyya vitivatteyya ? Tam kissa hetu?  Tassa 
sü ditthi tathà samattà samadinna gahità paramattliá 
abhinivitthà ajjhosità adhimuttà ti, evam рі sakam hi 
ditthim katham aeeayeyya ? 

Chaidünunito ruciyā uiviffho O. Chandānunīto ti sakaya 
ditthiyà sahaüya hhantiyà sakaya ruerya sakaya laddhiyà 
yayati niyyati vuyhnati sımhariyatið. — Yathà hatthiyünena 


* (Cp. Ud. IV. 8; J. n, 415; Dhp. Com. iii, 474. 

! 5 hatāssa. ? D» S ad. te. 
* S tetam (= tesam ?). 

* BP S ad. athavà sassato loko. ° Š sampar’, 


S.N. 781] Dutthatthakasuttaniddeso. 65 


và rathayanena và аѕѕауапепа và goyünena và ajayünena 
và mendakayanena! và otthayánena và kharayünena và 
yàyati niyyati vuyhati samharlyati?; evam eva sakāya 
ditihiyà вакауа khantiyà ѕакауа rueiyà sakàya laddhiyà 
yāyati niyyati vuyhati samhariyati? ti, ehandanunilto. 
Huciyà nivif!fho ti вакауа ditthiyà sakāya khantiyà вакауа 
rueiyà ѕакауа laddhiya nivittho patitthito allino upāgato 
ajjhosito adhimutto ti, chandünunito ruciyā nivittho. 

Sayam samattani pakiubbamano? ti sayam samattam karoti, 
paripunnam karoti, апотат karoti, асса settham vi- 
settham * pàmokkham? uitamam pavaram karoti; ayam 
satthà sabbannü ti sayum samattam karoti, paripunnam 
karoti, anomam karoti, атташ settham visettham pámok- 
kham uttamam pavaram karoti: ayam dhammo svakkháto$, 
ayam gano supatipanno, ayam ditthi bhaddika, ayam 
райрада supannattà, ayam maggo niyyaniko? ti sayuam 
samattam karoti, paripunnam karoti, anomam karoti, 
aggam settham visettham pāmokkham uttamam pavaram 
karoti janeti saüjaneti* nibbatteti abhinibbatteti? ti, 
sayam ваша ати pakubbamáno. 

Vathà hi janeyya {айа vadeyya ti уай јапеууа tathà 
vadeyya katheyya bhaneyya dipeyya 19 vohareyya. Sassato 
loko, idam eva ѕассаш, mogham айпап ti yathà janeyya 
tathà vadeyya Каеууа bhanevya dipeyya vohareyya. 
Asassato loko . . . pe... n° eva hoti na na hoti tathàgato 
param maran, idam eva saceam, mogham annan ti yatha 
jàneyya tathà vadeyya katheyya bhaneyya dipeyya 1 voha- 
геууа ti, yathà hi jàneyya tathá vadeyya. Ten’ аһа 
Bhagava : 


1 B? mendayánena. 2 5 sampar°. 
3 Š pakuppamano. 

B” visittham (= visista); ebscichere visetthain. 

5 В” pàmukkham ; 8 pamukkham sometimes. 


da 


$ В” svàkhyato often. 7 B. neyyüniko. 
8 p» Sion. 9 Brom. 


10 рь S dipayeyya. 


66 Atthakaraggo. (S.N. 782 


Sakam hi ditthim katham ассаувууа 
chandánunito rueiyà nivittho? 
sayam smnattàni pakublamano, 
yatha hi jàneyya tathà vadevyàa ti. 


Yo attano silavatáni jantu 
anáànuputtho ca! paresa? ратуа?. 
&ànariyadhammam kusala tam àhu, 
yo àtumànam sayanm eva pàvà?* 3. 


Yo «Чапо silucatüni jantā ti. Yo ti yo yadiso yathayutto 
yathàávihito yathapakáro yanthànappatto? yamdhamma- 
samannágato khattiyo và bráhmano và vesso và suddo và 
gahattho và pabbajito và devo và manusso уа. SUaratani? 
ti. Atthi silañ с’ eva vattaü? са, atthi vattam? na silam. 

Katamam sila с' eva vattan са? Idha bhikkhu silavà 
hoti, pàtimokkhasamvarasamvuto viharati àcaragoearasam- 
panno, anumaítesu vajjesu bhayadassávi samādāya sik- 
khati sikkhaápadesu; yo tattha samyamo samvaro avitik- 
kamo, idam silam; yam samadanam, tam vattam 7; 
samvaratthena silam, sumadanaithena vattam?; idam 
vuccati silan с’ eva vattan ca. 

Katamam vattam? na silan? | Attha а адап, aranni- 
kaügam Š pindapatikañeam — pimnsukülikaügain — tecivari- 
kangam  sapadanacirikaügam — khalupaechabhattikangam 
nesajjikangam yathásanthatikangam ; idam vuecati" vattam 
na? silam. Viryasamádünam рі vuceati хайат”? na 
silam: Каша taco ca пака ca ані са avasussatn, 
salire upisussatu mamsalohitam, yan tam purisathümena 
purisabalena purisaviripena purisaparakkamena pattab- 


! В’ va ? p" $8 paresam. 

S püvaduen, see below, p. 68. 

У paxvsda, see below, p. 68. 

° pr S уаш Шапат p°. 5 D" S silabbatàni. 
р" S vata? (vatta = vrtta 2). 

5 arantiakangam. 

Br valam na; 8 na va (ca 2). 


-1 


r 


290 


S.N. 782] Dulthatthakasuttantddeso. 61 


bam, па tam apàpunitvà viriysssa sauthanam bhavissaü 
ti eittam pagganhati padahati; evarūpam virivasunadánam 
vueeati! уф ип? па silam. "Na tàvàlam imam pal- 
адкат bhindissámi удха me anupadaya àsavehi cittam 
vimuceissati ti cittam pagganhāti padahati; evarūpam 
pi viriyasamādānam vuecati vattain na silam 3. 


4* Nāssissam, na pivissáàni, vihárato na nikkhaminm, 
па pi passam піраіеѕѕаш tunhasalle anühate ti 


eiiam pagganhāti padahati; evarüpam pl viriyasmna- 
дапаш vueeati vattam na silam’. Na tāvāham imamhā 
йвапа vutthabissámi, сайката orohissiumi, vibara nikkha- 
missami, addhayoga nikkhiinissámi, pasada wikkhamis- 
sāmi, hammiyà nikkhamissimi?, gahüya nikkhamissami 
lena nikkhiunissámi, Капуа  nikkhimissámi, kütagára 
niklhamissami, attà nikkhanmissaui, malā nikkhamissami. 
uddhanha* nikkhamissami, upatthiüuasaálüya nikkhamis- 
simi, mandapà nikkhamissimi, гик ашпа nikkhamissīmi 
уйуа me anupadaya? āsavehi città  vimucecissati ü 
cittam pagganháti padahati; evarüpam рі virivasamáda- 
nam vuceati vattam па silam. — Imasmin беха pubbanha- 
samayan ariyadhammam üharissami samáharissàmi adhi- 
gacehissiml  phusayissimi?  saechikarissàmi ti citta. 
pagenuhàti padahati; evarüpam рі viriyasumadanain 
vuccati vattam па silam.  Imasmin neva majjhantika- 
samayam siyanhasamayanm purebhaitam paechabhattam 
purimayàmaim 10 majjhimayãämam paeehimayamam kalo 
junhe vasse hemante gimhe, purime vayokhandhe, maj- 
jhime vayokhandhe, paechbime vayokliandhe arivadhamman 


* Thag. 225: 313, etc. 


| Dp? S «d. idamı. 
2 D" S vata? (vatta =vrtta ?». 


03 after 3 in В" aid S. 5 S dud. nitipadaha. 
$ S attha. T S kuddhà. 
з B" S ad. па. "0° S phassayissi: 


? Б» S purimam y^ majjhinam y? pacehimam y?. 


68 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 782 


aharissimi samáharissiml adhigaechissáàmi phusayissàmi! 
saechikarissimi ti eittam pagganhàti padahati; evarüupam 
pi viriyasamádànam vuecati vattam na silam. 

Jani ti satto naro mànavo poso puggalo jivo jagu? 
jantu indagu manujo ti, yo attano silavatàni jantu. 

Anánupulfho ca ° paresa páva* ti. l'aresan bi paresam 
khattiyauam bráhmananam vessinam suddànam gahatthà- 
nim pabbajitànam devànam manussünam.  znanupufflo 
ti aputtho apueehito anayáeito? anajjhesito appasadito. 
Рага ti? attano silam và vattam và silavattam và pávadati. 
Aham asmi silasampauno ti và, vattasampanno ti và, 
gilavattasampanno* ti và, jatiyà và gottena và kolaputtikena 
và vannapokkharataya và dhanena và ajjhenena vā kamma- 
yatanena và sippàyatanena và vijjatthànena và sutena và 
patibhànena và annatarannatareng và vatthunà, necákulà 
pabbajito ti và, mahakulà pabbajito ti và, mababhogakula 
pabbajito ti và, ulárabhogakulà pabbajito ti và, ñato 
yusassi sagahatthapabbajitànan? ti và. làbhi "mhi eivara- 
pindapátasenásanagilanapaecayabhesajjaparikkhàrànan ti 
vā, suttantiko ti và, vinayadharo ti và, dhammakathiko 
и va, &raüBlko ti và, pindapátiko ti và, pamisuküliko ti 
vi, teeivariko ti уа, sapadánacáriko ti và, khalupaecha- 
bhattiko ti và, пеѕајјіко ti va, yathàsanthatiko ti và, 
pathainassa jhànassa labhi ti уа, dutiyassa jhànassa làbhi 
ti va, tatiyassa Jhanassa lübhi ti và, eatutthassa јһапавѕа 
làbhi ti va, akasanañeayatanasamapattiya labhi ti và, 
vinnáuanciyaianasamáüpattiya labhr ti và, akiñeanñaya- 
tinasamüpattiyà labhi ti và, nevasannanasanniyatana- 
samapattiyā АШ ti và pavadati Кабоб bhanati dipayati 
voharati, ti ananuputtho ea paresa? pàvà 10, 


1 p' S phassaylssaml. ? Bi jatu ; B" S jagu. 
"opns ca. 3 8 pāvadā. 5 B” ayacito. 
9€ Brom. pivi t1: 5 pavadà ti. 
В” S silabbata" always. 
Si запази pabbajitànan ; B" sagahatthīnam p°; 
S sihagahatthapabbajitàni. See p. 09, н. t. 

"OR paresan. 10 S pada (= p&vada). 


5 


S.N. 182] Dutthatiakasuttanislidleso. n 


atnariyaąadhammam kusala tam айй ti. Kusala ti ve te 
khandhakusalà dhatnkusalà àyatanakusala paticcaxonup- 
pádakusali — satipatthanakusalà | sammappadbanakueala 
iddhippádakusalà indriyakusalà balakusalà bojjhancaku- 
salā maggalkusala phalakusalà nibbánakusala, !te kusala! 
evam ahamsu: Anariyànun eso dhammo, n’ eso dhammo 
алуапаці; bālāīnam eso dhammo, п’ eso dhammo paydi- 
tànam; asappurisinum eso dhammo, п’ eso dhammo 
sappurisinan ti evam àhamsu evam kathenti evam bha- 
nanti? evam dipayanti evam voharanti ti, anariyadhammam 
kusala tam аһа. 

Yo итап хауат cea раса 3 ti. Лепа vuceati atta. 
Sayam era. para ti sayam eva attànam pávada* ti: aham 
asmi silasampanno ti và, vattasampanno ti vā, silavatta- 
sampanno ti và, jàtiyà và gottena và kolaputtihena và 
vaunapokkharataya ?và dhanena? và ajjhenena? và kamma- 
yatanena уа slppàyatanena và vijatthánena và sutena và 
patibháanena ? và aüinatarannatarena vā vatthunà, uccákula 
pabbajito ti và, mahàkula pabbajito ti và, mahābhogakuła 
pabbajito ti và, ulàrabhogakulà 5 pabbajito ti và. nàto 
yasassi sagahatthapabbajitànan? ti và, làbhi 'mhi civara- 
puidapatasenásanagilanapaecayabhesajjiparikkháranan ti 
va, suttantiko ti và, vinayadharo ti và, dhammakathiko 
ti và, àranniko ti va, pindapatiko 19 ti và, pamsuküliko ti 
và, tecivariko ti và, sapadánacárlko ti và, khalupaechàá- 
bhattiko ti và, пеѕајјіко ti và, yathüsanthatiko ti vā, 
pathamassa jhánassa lābhī ti và, dutiyassa jhanassa làbhi 
ti và, tatiyassa jhánassa labhi ti và, catutthassa jhanassa 
labhi ti và, áàkásanancayatanasamapattiya làbhr ti và. 
vinñanañenyatanasamapattiya labhi ti và, akiücaünbáya- 


1-1 $ dhátukusalà. 
š Š pávada. S vüvada. 

5—5 5 vaddhanena. S dhaññena. 
7 Š patilabhena. 8 8 ulirayabhoga . 
9 В” S sagahatthap?; Si gahatthassa p°. 
0 Br pindi°. 


S bhanenti. 


с жою 


70 Atfhakavaqgo. [S.N. 182 


tanasamápattivi labhi ti và, nevasaünanasannàyatana- 
samapattiya libhi ti và pàvadati katheti bhanati dipnyati 
voharati ti, yo àtumánam sayam eva pàáva'. Теп’ aha 
Bhagavà : 


Yo attano silavatàn) jantu 
anànuputtho са рагева раха °, 
anariyadhammam kusalà tam аһа, 
yo àiumünam sayam eva рата? ti. 


Santo ca bhikkhu abhinibbutatto 

iti "han ti silesu akatuihamàno? 

iam ariyadhammam kusalà vadanti, 
yass? ussadáà п’ atthi kuhinei loke. 4. 


Santo са bhikkhu abhinibbutatto ti. Santo ti rügassa 
вап Ма ? santo, dosassa santatta santo, mohassa san- 
айа ? santo, kodhassa upanáhassi makkhassa palàsassa 
isstya maceharlyassa mayáya satheyyassa thainbhassa 
sirambhassa manassa atnmnànassa madassa pamadassa 
sabbakilesànam ^ sabbaducearitanam — sabbadarathanam 
sabbaparilahàn:;n sabbasantapanam — sabbakusalübhisam- 
khàránam santattà samitatta vüpasamitatta? vijjhàtatta 
иш айа vigatatta patipassaddhatti santo vüpasanto? 
nibhuto patipassaddho ti, santo*. 

Bhikkhi ti sattannam dhammanam bhinnatta bhikkhu ; 
sakkayaditthi bhinnà hoti, viokieehà bhinnà hoti, silab- 
bataparamaso? bhinno hoti, rigo bhinno hoti, doso bhinno 
hoti, moho bhinno hoti, mano bhinno hoti: bhinn’ assa 
honti pápakà akusalà dhammáà sankilesika ponobbhaviká 
radara dukkhavipika àyatim Játijaramaraniyà. 


| B" pava ti; 5 ратайа ti. 2 5 pàvada ti. 

* S pāvada. + 5 akattamāno. 
^ В” 8 samitattà. 

" S npasanmisntta. 

7 p" S od. upasanto. 8 Siom. 

9 S ?paramása bhinnā 


S.N. 783] JIiufthatthakasulttauiddeso. 11 


*Pajjena katena attana, 

Sabhiya ti Dhagavi, 
parinibbànagato vitinnakamliho 
vibhavan? ea bhavaü ea vippaháxa 
vusitavà khinapunabbhavo ti?. 


Santo ca bhikkhu abhinibbutatto ti. Racassa nibbà- 
раа ° dosassa nibbapitattà З mohassa nibbápitattà abhi- 
nibbutatto, kodhassa upanāhassa makkhassa palasassa 
issiya macchariyassa шауауа sàátheyyassa thambhassa 
sürnmbhassa mánassa atimánassa madassa pamādassa 
s&bbakilesanam ^ sabbaduecaritanam ^ sabbadarathànam 
sabbaparilàhànam sabbasantāpānam sabbákusalàábhisain- 
khārānam nibbàpitatta abhinibbutatto ti, santo ea bhikkhu 
abhinibbutatto. 

5 Tti "han. t^ silesu akatthamáno ti. Iti "han. ti pada- 
sandhi padasamsaggo  padapáripüri akkharasamavayo 
byaüjanasilitthatà padanupubbata-m-etam, iti 'han ti. 
Silesu. akatthamüno ti. Idh' ekaeco katthi hoti vikatthi ; 
во katthati vikatthati? aham asmi silasampanno ti và 
vaittasampanno ti và silavattasampanno ti và, jatiyi và 
gottena và kolaputtikena và vannapokkharatàya уй... 
pe... n’ evasannanüsanhüyatanasamüpattiya lübhi ti và 
katthati vikatthati. Evam na / katthati na / vikatthati, 
katthana? àrato virato pativirato nikkhanto nissattho 
vippamubto visamyutto vimariyüdikatena cetasà viharat 
ti, iti "han ti silesu akatthamáno. 

Гат ariyadhammam: kusald vadanti ti. IKusalà tt ye te 
khandhakusalà* dhátukusalà àyatanakusalà patieeasamup 


* Sn. 514. 


1 В” vibhavam bh?; Si vibhavan cábh?. 
? D" ad. sa bhikkhu. 3 Br S ad. abhinibbuttatto. 
4-4 B? idahan ti here and below; S idahan ti and 
idahan ti. 
5 Biom.; S has katti, vikatti, kattati, vikattati. 
9 S kattana, 7 S dhamme khandhe kusala. 


72 Átthakavaggo. [ S.N. 783 


pádakusali —satipatthànakusalài | sammappadhànakusala 
iddhippádakusalà indriyakusalà balakusala bojjhangaku- 
salā maggakusalà ! phalakusala nibbanakusalà, ?te kusala? 
evam radanti. Ariyánam eso dhammo, n' eso dhammo 
anariyánam ; panditànam eso dhammo, n’ eso dhammo 
balanam; sappurisanam eso dhammo, n’ eso dhammo 
asappurisánan ti, evam vadanti evam? kathenti evam 
bhananti evam dipayanti evam voharanti ti, tam ariya- 
dhammam kusalà vadanti. 

Fass ussada п atthi kuhinei loke ti. Vassa ti avahato 
khinàásavassa.  Ussadà ti satt’ ussadà, ràgussado dosus- 
sado mohussado mánussado ditthussado kilesussado kam- 
mussado. Yass'* ime ussadà п «tthi na santi па samvij- 
janti? n’ upalabbhanti, pahinà samuechinnà vupasantà 
patipassaddhà ê abhabbuppattiki ñānagginā daddha 7. 
Kuhinciti kuhinel kimhici katthaci ajjhattam và bahiddhā 
và ajjhattabahiddhaà và. Lohe ti apāyaloke manussaloke 
devaloke khandhaloke dhàátuloke àyatanaloke ti, yass’ 
ussadà п’ айі kuhinei loke. Теп’ аһа Вһасаха : 


Santo са bhikkhu abhinibbutatto 

iti "Лап ti silesu akatthamàno 

tam ariyadhammam kusala vadanti, 
yass’ ussadà п’ atthi kuhiñci loke ti. 


Pakappità samkhata yassa dhammà 
purakkhata? santi avivadàata?, 
yad attani passati ànisamsam, 
tan? nissito kuppspatieca-santim. 5. 


Pakappitá samkhatá yassa dhammà ti. Pakappaná ti 
дуе pakappani, tanhapakappanà са ditthipakappana са... 
pe... ayam tanhapakappanáà . . . pe . . . ayam ditthi- 
pakappanaà.  Sajkhatá ti  samkhatà visamkhaià abhi- 


1 § «d. maggangakusalà. 2 2 S dhátukusala. 

3 Sad. uriya nam. + Si tass’. 

^ B" vijjanti; S pavijjanti. 9 S patipp". 

T S ad. va. 5 8 purakkhità, see below, p. 18. 


9 B" 8 avevadātā. 1 B" $ iam n°. 


S.N. 784] Dutthatthakasuttaniddeso. 13 


samkhatà sanithapità ti pi samkhatà ; athavà aniecà sam- 
khatà paiiecasamuppanna khayadhammáà  vayadhamma 
virágadhammáà nirodhadhamma ti pi samkhatà. Риза 
ti ditthigatikassa. Dhamma vuüccanti dvàsatthi ditthi- 
gatàni ti, pakappità samkhata уаѕва dhammà. 

Purakkhatá! santi avivadáta 2 ti. D'urckkhará ti dve 
purekkhàra, tanhápurekkhàro ea ditthipurekkháro ea . + . 
e. pe... ayam tanhápurekkháro . . . pe... ayam 
ditthipurekkhüro. Tassa tanhápurekkhàro appahino, dit- 
thipurekkhàro appatinissattho, tassa tanhapureklbarassa 
appahinattà, tassa З ditthipurekkhàrassa  appatinissat- 
(раа, so tanham và ditthim vá purato katva earati, 
tanhádhajo tanhaketu tanhadhipateyyo ditthidhajo ditthi- 
ketu ditthadhipateyyo tanhaya và ditthiyà và parivàrito 
сагай tj, purakkhata. Santa ti santi? samvijjanti upalab- 
bhanti* Arīvadātā ti avivadata 5 avodātā aparisuddhà 
samkihttha samkilesikà ti, purekkhatà santi avīvadātā 

Yad attani passati anisamsan. ti. Yad айант ti yam 
attani. Ata vuccati ditthigatam; attano ditthiyà dve 
ànisamse passati, ditthidhammikañ ca ānisamsam sam- 
p&rüyikaü ca ānisamsam. 

Katamo? ditthiyaà ditthidhammiko inisamso? Yam- 
ditthiko sattha hoti, tamditthikà sávakà honti; tam- 
ditthikam  satthàram  sávakà sakkaronti garukaronti" 
mànenti püjenti apacitun? karonti; labhanti са tatoni- 
dànam  civarapindapátasenásanagilanapaecayabhesajjapa- 
rihkhàram. Ayam ditthiyà ditthadhammiko ànisainso. 

Katamo ditthiyà samparayiko anisamso? Ayam ditthi 
alam nàgattiya? và supaunattiya và yakkhattaya và 
asurattaya và gandhabbattaya và maharájattaya và in- 
datiiya và brahmattàya và devattüya và. Ayam ditthi '? 


1 В” purekkhàtà ; Š purekkbatà. 


* B? avevadátà ; S avevadátà. 3 Som. 

1 S ad. аі. 5 Dr S avevadatà. 

$ 5 katam' eva. 7 Б” garum’. 8 Si apacittim. 
9 S nàgatthaya . . . supaunatthàya . . . and so on. 


10 S ditthiyà (or ditthi уа). 


74 Atthakaraggo. [S.N. 784 


alam suddhiyà visuddhiyà parisuddhiyà! muttiyà vimuttiyà 
parimutiiya; ауа ditthiyà sujjhanti visujjhanti? pari- 
sujhanti muecanti vimuecanti parimuceanti, imāya 
ditthiya sujjhissámi visujjhissàmi parisujjhissami muccis- 
sāmi? vimucelssámi parimuceissáümi ti àyatim phalapati- 
kamkhi* hoti. Ayam ditthiyà sampariyiko ānisamso. 

Aitano ditthryà ime dve апіѕатѕе passati dakkhati 
oloketi nijhaàyati upaparikkhati ti, yad attani passati 
anisamsam. 

Tan? nissito kuppa-patieca-santin 9. ti. Tisso santiyo, 
&ecantasanti tadangasanti sammatisanti?. 

Кайаша aecantasanti?  Accantasanti vuccati amatam 
nibbànam; yo so sabbasamkhàárasamatho sabbupadhipati- 
nissaggo tanhakkhayo уігасо nirodho nibbànam ; ayam 
accantasanti. 

Кайаша  tadaügasanti ? Pathamam ê jhánam samá- 
pannassa nivaranà santa honti, dutiyam jhànam вата- 
pannassa vitakkavicārā santa honti, tatiypam jhánam 
samàpannassa piti santà hoti?, eatuttham jhànam sami- 
pannassa sukhadukkha!? santa honti, akasanañeayatanam 
samàpannassa rüpasannà  patishasahhà nanattasanñña 
santa honti, viññanañeayatanum вашараппазва аКава- 
nafleayatanasanna santa hoti, àalineaüfiayatanam samā- 
pannassa vinhnanancayatanasanna santa bhoti?, п’ eva- 
sañña-nasaññayatanam — samápannassa  ákincannàyatana- 
ваййа santa hoti; ayam tadangasanti. 

Кабата sammalisanti? Sammatisanti vuecanti dvà- 
satthi ditthigata ! ditthisantiyo; api ea sammaltisanti 
imasmim atthe !* adhippetà santati?? ti. 


S parivisuddhiyi. ? B on. 

B” muiieissiml and so on. 

B" phalapatik?; 8 phalam pátik?. 

D" б tam ni’. $ S kuppaticea?. 

* B" 8 sammuti? (throughout and correct). 

B pathamajjhánam and so on. 

S honti. 1 S sukhadukkhan. 
u pr ?ratàni. 12 Si om. 13 BP santi. 


с 


о qo 


S.N. 785] Dutthatthakasuttaniddeso. 15 


Tan? nissito? | kuppa-paticca-santin. ti? kuppasantim 
pakuppasantim * eritasantim?  sameritasantin 9 calita- 
santim ghatitasantim "^  kappitasantim — pakappitasan- 
tim? aniecam  samkhatam —paticcasamuppannam kha- 
yadhammam vayadhammam  virigadhammam — nirodha- 
dhammam santim  nissito? sito”  allino — upágato 
ajjhosito adhimutto ti, tan nissito kuppa-paticca-santim. 
Ten’ aha Bhagavá : 


Pakappità samkhatà yassa dhamma 
purakkhatà santi avivadàátà, 

уай attani passati ànisamsam, 

tan nissito kuppa-patieca-santin!? ti. 


Ditthinivesà na} hi sváàtivattà 
dhammesu niecheyyà samuggahitam, 
fasmá naro tesu nivesanesu 
nidassati!?? àadiyati-ecca dhammam. б. 


Ditthinivesa na hi svàütirattà ti. 13 Dilthinivesá. ti? 
sassato loko, idam eva saccam, mogham айдап ti abhini- 
vesapparàmáso ditthinivesanam; asassato loko, antavà 
loko, anantavà loko, tam jivam tam sariram, annain jīvam 
aññam sariram, hoti tathágato parammaranā™, na hoti 
tathàgato parammaranà, hoti ca na ca boti tathagato 
parammarana, п’ eva hoti na па hoti tathàgato param- 
marana, idam eva вассаш, mogham annan ti abhini- 
vesapparàmüàso ditthinivesanan!9 ti, ditthinivesa. Ун hi 


1 8 tam. 2 Si ad. ti. 

3 Siom.; S ad. Каррар ti. 4 S om. 

5 5 editasanti. 6 Som. 

? В” ghattitasantim ; 5 ghatitasanti. 

8 5 sito. 

9 Siom.; В” S asito. 10 S kuppam р“. 
1 $ nam (nivesáànam). 

1? PTS nirassati. 13-3 Si от, 

H D? param шагапа throughout. 

15 


Š ?nivesánam. 


76 Atfthakavaggo. [S.N. 785 


srálivattà ti durativattà! duttarà duppatara dussamatik- 
Каша dubbitivatta ti, ditthinivesa na hi svàtivattà. 

JIhaminesu niccheyya samuggalitan. ti. Dhammesü ti 
dvàsatthi ditthigatesu. — Nieeheyyàá ti niechinitva viniechi- 
пита vicinitvà pavieinitvà tulayitva tirayitvà vibhàvayitvà 
vibhütam katva. ?Sunmwuggahitan ti nivesanesu? odhi- 
saggüho? vilaggáho varaggaüho? kotthàsaggaho песауар- 
gàho samuecayaggáho : idam ѕассат фасеПат tatham 
bhütam yàthàvam aviparittan ti gahitam paramattham 
abhinivittham ajjhositam adhimuttan ti, dhammesu nic- 
cheyya samuggahitam. 

Tasmü naro tesu nivcsanesü А. T'asma ti tasmà tam- 
kàranà tamhetu ёатрассауа ° tamnidàna9. Naro ti вао 
naro mànavo poso puggalo jivo jagü jantu indagü 
manujo. Tesu nivescnesü ti tesu ditthinivesanesu ti, 
(ава naro tesu nivesanesu. 

Nidassatīi ādiyati-cca 7 dhamman ti. Nidassati’ ti аут 
kāranehi nidassati, paraviechindanàya và nidassati, ana- 
bhisambhunanto vā nidassati. 

Каат paraviechindanàya nidassati? Paro viechin- 
dati: So satthā na sabbannü, dhammo na svàkkhato, 
gano na suppatipanno, ditthi na bhaddika, райрада na 
suppanüattài, inaggo па niyyàniko; n’ ай ettha suddhi 
và visuddhi và parisuddhi và mutti và vimutti và pari- 
mutti và; ?na Баћа sujjhanti? và visujjhanti và pari- 
sujjianti уа muecanti và vimuecanti và parimuecanti уй; 
hina nihinà omaka lamaka jatukka!? parità ti. Evam 
paro viechindati ; evam vieehindiyamàno satthàram nidas- 


1 Si dur?; S durá&titto. 2-2 Si om. 

? S odissaggàho. 4 $ paraggaho. 
5 Si vas elsewhere àappaecayà. 

$ 8 tamnidānam. 

7 p» Š àdiyali ea. 8 S nirassati. 


9-9 D" S п’ ай ettha. sujjhanti, «s sometimes Si in tus 
contest. 
10 D" chatukkà ; S eatukkà as usual. 


S.N. 785] Dutthatthakasuttuuiddeso. TT 


sati, dhammakkhanam nidassati, сарат nidassati, ditthiin 
nidassati, patipadam nidassati, maggain nidassati. vam 
paravicchindanāya nidassati. 

Katham anabhisambhunanto nidassati? Siam anabhi- 
sambhunanto.silam nidassati, vattam anabhisambhuyanto 
vattam  nidassati, silavattam  anabhisambhunanto sila- 
vatiam nidassati. Evam anabhisambhunanto nidassati. 

Adiyati-eca? dhamman Vi. Satthàram ganhati, dhiun- 
makkhanam рапһай, сапап ganhàti ditthim  ganháti, 
patipadam ganpháti, maggam ganhiati, ?phalam даай? 
paràmasati abhinivisati ti, nidassati adiyati-eca dhammam. 
Теп’ aha Bhagavà : 


Ditthinivesa? na hi svativattà 
dhammesu niecheyya samuggahitam, 
tasmá naro tesu nivesanesu 
nidassati àdiyati-eea dhamman ti. 


Dhonassa hi п’ atthi kuhinei loke 
pakappità ditthi bhavàbhavesu, 
шауай са тапай са раһауа dhono 
sa kena gaecheyya? Апӣрауо so. 


Dhonassa hi w atti kuhiñei loke pakappita difti bhava- 
bharesū ti. Dhouo? ti. Dhonà vuecati pannà, уа panna 
pajánanà vieayo pavieayo? dhammavieayo sallakhanà 
upalakkhaná paeeupalakkhanà? pandiecam kosallam ne- 
puünam vebhavya? eintà upaparikkhà bhnri medhà pari- 
nàylkà vipassanà sampajjannum patodo? pañña patüindri- 
yam paüüábalam pannasattham * paññapasado? райіа- 
üloko panná-obháso!? paññapajjoto paniaratanam amolo 
dhammavieayo sammaáditthi. 

Kimkàrana dhoná vuceati panna? Тауа райдаха 


1 Be ádiyati ea. 2-2 Br S on, 

3 5 ditthenivesà. í See below ou r. S15. 

° Son. Š S vebhavyan. 

7 В” $ padoto. š p" pannasattham. 
9 


S paünábháso. P S pannayácana. П S panLà. 


18 Afthakaraggo. [S.N. 786 


kayaducearitam dhutan са !dhotan са! sandhotah са 
lniddhotañ ea!, vaeiduccaritàam ?dhutan ca dhotaü ea 
sandhofa& са niddhotan са 2, manoduecaritam dhutaün 
ea dhotah ea sandhotaB ea niddhotan са, гаро dhuto са 
dhoto са sandhoto ca niddhoto ea, doso moho kodho 
upanáho makkho palàso? issà macchariyam maya sáthey- 
уаш thambho sarambho шапо atimàno mado pamādo, 
sabbe kilesà, sabbe duccarità, sabbe Чагаа, sabbe pari- 
laha, sabbe santàpà, sabbakusalabhisamkhara dhutà са 
dhotà са sandhotà са niddhotà са; tam kàranà dhonā 
vuceati pafinaà.  Athava sammaditthiyà miechaditthi dhutà 
са dhotà ea sandhotà са niddhotà ca, summàsamkappena 
miceháàsamkappo dhuto ea dhoto ea sandhoto са niddhoto 
са, sammávàcaya miechàvaca dhutà са, sammakamman- 
tenat mieehakammanto dhuto ea, samma-ajivena miechà- 
ajivo dhuto ea, sammávayamena miechávayimo dhnto ea, 
sammiüsatiya miechàsati dhutà са, sammasamüdhiná mic- 
chāsamādhi dhuto ea, sammànànena? micchánánam dhutaii 
cà, sammavinuttivà miechávimnutti dhutà ea dhotà са 
sandhotà ea niddhotà са. — Athavà ariyena atthaügikena 
тассепа sabbe kilesà, sabbe duccaritā, sabbe daratha, 
sabbe parilàhà, sabbe вашара, sabbakusalübhisamkharà 
dhutà ea dhotà ea sandhotà ea niddhotà са. 

6 Arahā imehi? dhoneyyehi dhammehi upeto samupeto 
upagato samupagato upapanno samupapanno samannià- 
gato; tasmü arüha dhoso. Бо dhutarigo dhutapápo 
dhutakileso dhutapariliho ti dhono. 

Auhinei ti kuhinei kimhici katthaci ajjhattam vā 
hahiddhà và ajjhattabahiddha va. Loke ti apayaloke 
pe . . . ayatanaloke. Pakuppanā ti dve pakappana, 


IO Sy qug T ? B" S on. 

? 3 Dr Š ad. dhuto ea dhoto ca sandhoto ea niddhoto 
en, end repeal these words with necessary change of gender 
“ler 1вва, auacchariyani, maya . . . ap to sabbe kilesā. 

а Dr S ad. dhotà са po. 
5 Т» 8 ad. dhoto са sandhoto ca niddhoto ea. 
6 S useimehli. 


S.N. 786] Dutthatthakasuttaniddeso. 79 


tanhápakappana са ditthipikappana ca . . . pe. . . ayan. 
tanhapakappan&à . . . pe. . . ayam ditthipakappana. 
Dhavabhavesu ti bhavabhave, kammabhavce, punabbhave, 
kàmabhave kammabhave, kümabhave punabbhave, rüpa- 
bhave kammabhave, rüpabhave punabbhave, arüpabhave 
kammabhave, arüpabhave  punabbhave, punappunam! 
bhave? ?punappunam gatiyi? punappunam upapattiya 
punappunam patisandhiya * punappunun attabhávabhi- 
nibbattiyi. 

Dhonassa hi n'atthi kuhinci loke pakappità Ч 
Е ti; 5 @һопаѕва hulinci loke Dbhavābhavesu 

6 kappità? pakappità abhisaimkhata santhapita ditthi 
d'ail na santi па samvijjnti n'upalabbhanti, pahina 
samucehinna vüpasantà patipassaddhà abhabbuppattika 
ñanaggina daddhà ti, dhonassa hi n'atthi kuhihei loke 
pakappità ditthi bliavabhavesu. 

Máyait са manañ ca раћауа dhoro ti. Мана vuceati 
valieanikà cariyà. І ekaeco Кауепа duccaritam caritvå, 
касаѕа? duccaritam earitvà, manas duecaritam сатіхӣ, 
tassa patiechadanahetu pápikam ieeham panidabati: Mà 
mam jaünBa? ti iechati, ша mam jaüna$ ti samkappeti, 
mà mam jaünna? ti vacam bhàsatij mà mam jaüná 5 
ti Кауепа parakkamati. Үл evarūpā maya māyāvitā 
aeensarü? vahcahà nikati nikiranà ? paribarana kuhanà !! 
pankuhaná срадапа pariechádanà | anuttànikammam 12 
anavikammam !? vocchadana pàpakiriyà; ayam  vuecati 
maya. 

Мано ti. Elkavidhena mano, ya cittassa unnati. Duvi- 
dhena mano:  attukkamsanamano paravambhanamáno. 
Tividlieua mano: seyyo 'ham asmi ti mano, sadiso 'ham 


! Dr S panappuna?. ? S gahita. 
3-3 BS on. t 5 sandhiya. 5-95 Bien. 
° B pakappita kappatà abhisamlhiatà. 
1 Б>” vácáya. 5 D" jannü. 
9 8 ассауа. ду mme 


HM Si guhanà, pariguhanā, but below ku”. 
35 S °kamma. 


80 Atthakavayyo. [S.N. 786 


asmi ti mano, hino 'ham asmi ti апо. Catubbidhena 
māno: labhena manam janeti, yasena! mānam janeti, 
раѕатѕауа manam janeti, sukhena manam janeti. Pañca- 
vidhena māno: lābhi 'mhi manäpikānam rūpānan ti 
manam janeti, lābhi 'mhi manapikanam saddànam gan- 
dhànam rasinam photthabbānan ti manam janeti. Chabbi- 
dhena mano: eakkhusampadáya шапат janeti, sotasam- 
padaya* ghánasampadàya jivhasampadàya kàyasampadàya 
manosampadaya manam janeti Sattavidhena máno: mano 
atimáno manatimano ománo adhimáno asmimàno mic- 
еһашапо. Atthavidhena mano: labhena manam janeti, 
alabhena omanam janeti, yasena manam janeti, ayasena 
ошапат janeti, pasamsiya manam janeti, ?nindàya ománam 
janeti?, sukhena manam janeti, dukkhena ománam janeti. 
Navavidhena mno: seyyassa seyyo 'ham asmi ti mano, 
*ѕеууаѕѕа sadiso ‘Пат asmi ti mano, seyyassa hino 'ham 
asmi ti maàno?, sadisassa? seyyo 'ham asmi ti mano, 
sadisassa sadiso ‘ham asmi ti mano, sadisassa hino 'ham 
asmi ti mano, hinassa seyyo аш asmi ti апо, hinassa 
sadiso 'ham asmi ti mano, hinassa hino 'ham asmi ti 
mano.  Dasavidhena mano: idh' ekaeco mānam janeti 
jàtiyà và gottena và kolaputtikena và vannapokkharataya 
và dhanena và ajjhenena và kammayatanena và sippāya- 
tanena và vijjatthànena và sutena và patibhánena và 
annataranünatarena va — vatthuna. Yo evarüpo mano 
maññana maññitattam unnati unnamo dhajo sampaggāho 
ketukamyatà cittassa, ayam vuecati mano. 

Мацай са тапай ca pahãya dhono t$ mayañ ca manañ 
ca pahāya pajahitvà vinoditvà byanükaritvà anabhávam- 
gamen ā ti, шауаћ са manañ са pahàya dhono. 

Na? kena gaccheyya anüpayo so ti. Upayo? ti дуе upaya, 


tanhüpayo ca ditthüpayo ca... pe... ayam tanhü- 
payo... pe... ayam ditthüpayo. Tassa tanhüpayo 
1 Si yassena. ? BI ad. manam janeti. 
3 3 ion. 1-3 8 om. 
^ 51 saddisassa. ? p" S ad. dhono. 


7 Son. $5 p" upaya. 


S.N. 757] Dutthatthakasuttaniddeso. 81 


pahino, ditthüpayo patinissattho ; tanhupayassa pahī- 
пайа, ditthupayassa patinissatthatta «üpayo so! kena 
rágena сасеһеууа, kena dosena gaccheyya, kena mohena 
gaceheyya, kena mànena gaccheyya, kaya ditthiyà gac- 
сһеууа, kena uddhaecena gaccheyya, kàya vicikiecháya 
gaeeheyya, kehi anusayehi? gaceheyya ratto ti và duttho 
Ы và muülho ti và vinibandho ti và parámattho ti và 
vikkhepagato ti và anitthangato? ti và thàmagato ti va? 
Te abhisamkhàra pahina, abhisamkhàrànam —pahinattà 
башуа kena gaecheyya пегауіко ti và tiracchánayoniko 
ti và pittivisayiko? ti уа manusso ti và devo ti và rupi ti và 
агарі ti và saññi ti và asahni ti và nevasaüür-násalül ti 
vā? So hetu п’ atthi paeeayo n’ atthi kàranam n’ atthi 
yena gaecheyyà ti, sa" kena? gaecheyya?  Anüpayo so. 
Ten’ аһа Bhagavaà : 


Dhonassa hi п’ atthi kuhinei loke 
pakappità ditthi bhavàbhavesu ; 

màyan са апай са рапауа dhono, 
s&? kena?’ gaccheyya? ^ Anüpayo so ti. 


Upayo hi dhammesu upeti vàdam, 
anüpayam kena katham vadeyya? 
attam nirattam na hi tassa atthi, 
adhosi so ditthim idh’ eva sabbam. 8. 


Upayo hi dhammesu upeti vádan ti. Upayo ti дуе 
upaya, tanhüpayo са ditthüpayo са... pe... ayam 
tanhüpayo . . . ре... ayam ditthüpayo. Tassa tauhü- 
payo appahino, ditthupayo appatinissattho, tanhüpayassa 
appahinattà, ditthüpayassa appatinissatthattà dhammesu 
тайазь upeti, ratto ti và duttho ti và mülho ti và vini- 
bandho ti và parümattho ti và vikkhepagato ti và anit- 


1 В б puggalo; see p. 82, 1. 12. 


2 S anupayogehi. 

з В» S anitthagato here and below. 

^ Bi gatiyo; and below. 5 S petti? as usual. 
$° BP S от. 7 Bv tena. 

8 S om. 9 S kenaci. 


83 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 787 


thangato! ti và tbamagato ti và; ie abhisamkhàrà 
appahmáà, abhisamkharànam appahinattà gatiyaà vadam 
upeti, nerayiko ti và tiracehànayoniko ti và pittivisaylko 
ti và manusso ti và devo ti và rūpī ti và arūpī ti và 
sanii ti và авайїп ti và nevasaüni-nàsanni ti vi vadam 
upeti upagaechati ganháti paramasati abhinivisati ti, upayo 
hi dbammesu ирей vàdam. 

Anüpayam kena Каат  vadeyya ? ti.  Upayo ti dve 
upaya, tanhüpayo са ditthüpayo ca... pe... ayam 
tanhüpayo . . . pe... ayam ditthüpayo. Tassa tanhü- 
payo pahino, ditthüpayo patinissattho, tanhüpayassa 
pahinattà, ditthüpayassa patinissatthattà anāpayam? kena? 
ragena vadeyya, kena dosena vadeyya, kena mohena 
vadeyya, kena mánena vadeyya, kaya ditthiyà vadeyya, 
kena uddhaecena vadeyya, kaya vietkiecháya vadeyya, 
kebi anusayehi vadeyya ratto ti và duttho ti và mülho 
ti và vinibandho ti và paràmattho ti уа vikkhepagato 
ti và anitthangato* ti và thàmagato ti và? Те abhisam- 
khàrà раһіпа, abhisamkháàrànam pabinattà gatiyà kena 
vadeyya nerayiko ti уай... pe.. . nevasanhl nasaññi 
ti và? So hetu п’ а, paecayo п’ atthi, kàranam n’ 
atthi yena vadeyya katheyya bhaneyya dipayeyya voha- 
reyyà ti, anüpayam kena кааш vadeyya 2 

Абат nirattiam na hi tassa atthi tì. Ана ti sassata- 
ditthi? п’ ай, nirattā ti uechedaditthi n’ аі, attā ti 
gahitam п’ atthi, nirattā ti muneitabbam n’ atthi; yass’ 
atthi gahitam tass’ atthi muñeitabbam, yass’ atthi muüci- 
tabbam tass’ atthi gahitam; gabanamuncanam sama- 
tikkanto 7 arahá vuddhiparibānim vītivatto. Бо vuttha- 
vāso cnnaearano . . . pe? . . . п аш tassa punab- 
bhavo ti, attam nirattam na hi tassa atthi. 


1 p? S anitthágato. 2 S anusayam. 

3 p" 8 ad. puggalam. 4 В” anitthagato. 
5 В» S attànuditthi. ° D" $ gahanam muncana. 
7 


S samantikkamanto. 
B» S om. pe ана read gataddho gatadiso jitimarana- 
зашвато. 


x 


S.N. 787] Dutthatthakasuttaniddeso. 83 


Adhosi so (Шин idl? ега sabban ti. Tassa dvasatthi 
ditthigatàni раһіпапі samuechinnàni vüpasaniani pati- 
passaddhàni abhabbuppattikàni Dànagginaà daddháni. So 
sabbam! ditthigatam ¿d era adhosi dhuni niddhuni 2 
pajahi vinodesi byanti-akasi anabhávam gamesi ti, adhosi 
so ditthim idh’ eva sabbam. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà : 

Upayo hi dhammesu upeti табаш, 
anupayam kena katham уайеууа ? 
attam nirattum na hi tassa atthi, 
adhosi so ditthim idh’ eva sabban ti. 


ТАТІҮО З РСТТПАТТПАКАХСТТАХІРрЕХО * NITTHITO 5. 


1 В” sabbad?. 
? B corrupt, implies addition of sandhuni. 

3 B» S om. 4 S dutthakasutta?. 
5 B" S samatto tatiyo. 


CATUTTHO! SUDDHATTHAKASUTTANIDDESO?. 


Passàmi suddham paramam arogam?, 
ditthena samsuddhi narassa hoti, 
evüàbhijànam*à paraman ti natvà 
suddhanupassi ti? paeceti nánam. 1. 


Passüámi suddham: paraman arogan U. Passami 9 sud- 
dhan ti passàmi? suddham, dakkhámi suddham, olokemi 
suddham, nijbháyàmi suddham, upaparikkbami suddham. 
Paramam arogan ti paramam àrogyappattam 7 khemap- 
pattam? tànappattam ° lenappattam ° sarapappattam рага- 
yanappattam abhayappattam aceutappattam amatappattam 
nibbànappattan ti, passimi suddham paramam aroga. 

Гепа saiisuddhi narassa hoti tà cakkhuviünanena 10 
rüpadassanena narassa suddhi visuddhi parisuddhi matti 
vimutti parimutti hoti, naro sujjhati visujjhati parisujjhati 
mueeati vimuecati parimueeati ti, ditthena samsuddhi 
narassa hoti. 

Evabhijünan paraman ti ñatrā ti evam abhijananto. 
ajànanto vijānanto pațivijānanto  pativijhanto, idam 
paramam aggam settham visettham pàmokl ham uttamani 
pavaran ti ñatra jànitvà tulayitva tirayitvà vibhavayitvà 
vibhütam katvà ti, evàbhijanam paraman ti fiatva. 


1 D? om. ; S. atha. ? S ad. vuceati. 
3 5 arogyam. 4 So Codd.; PTS. eta°. 
5 Br S om. here and below, as D*! in PTS. 
9-6 Si от. T D" агодаш; S arogyam. 
š p" om. 9 В” ?pattam. 
10 


D» S cakkhuvinnànam. 
1 SiS paraman; B" pavaran. 


S.N. 789] Suddhatthakasuttaniddeso. 85 


Suddhaānupassı ti puceeti банап ti. ! Yo suddhan 
passati so suddhānupassīi. Гассе áuan ti cakkhuvinna- 
nena? rüpadassanam? nànan ti pacceti, maggo ti pacceti, 
patho ti pacceti, піууапап ti paeceti ti, suddhānupas=ī 
ti paeceti йарат. Теп’ аһа Вһадаха: 


Раѕѕаті suddham paramam агосаш, 
ditthena samsuddhi narassa hoti, 
evibhijanam paraman ti Dàtvà, 
suddhànupassi ti pacceti nànan ti. 


Ditthena ce suddh? narassa hoti, 
hànena và so pajahati dukkham, 
айпепа so sujjhati sopadhiko, 
ditthi hi nam pavat tathà vadánam. 2. 


Репа ce suldhi narassa hoti ti cakkhuvinnánena 5 
rüpadassanenus ce narassa suddhi visuddhi parisuddhi 
mutti vimutti parimutti hoti, naro sujjlati visujjhati 
parisujjhati muecati vimuccati parimuccati ti, ditthena 
ce suddhi narassa hoti. 

Ханепа са so pajaháti dukkhan ti cakkhuvinnànena ? 
rüpadassanena ce naro játidukkham pajahati, jaràdulkhain 
pajahati, byadhidukkham pajahati, maranadukkhaim paja- 
hati, sokaparidevadukkhadomanassupayasadukkham paja- 
һай ti, дарепа và so pajahati dukkham. 

Алепа so sujjhati sopadhiko ti аййепа asuddhimaggena 
miechàpatipadàya aniyyanapathena? annatra satipatthà- 
nehi aünnatra sammappadhànebi annatra iddhippadehi ? 
aññatra indrlyehi annatra balehi annatra bojjhangehi 
aññatra ariyatthangikamaggena ? naro sujjhati visujjhati 


m 


S om. this paragraph and the stanza. 

B? cakkhuviññanam. 3 B" rüpadassanena. 

Š s&va. 5 Br S cakkhuvinnaàuam. 
В” S апіуапа°, but correctly p. ST, L 11. 

В” S iddhipādehi, often. 

В” ariyà atthangikà шайда; S апуо atthangiko 
maggo. 


t° 


o = 0 à 


DTE Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 789 


parisujjhati mueeati vimuceati parimuceati. Sopadhiko ti 
sarago sadoso samoho samino satanho saditthi sakileso 
Sa-upadano ti, ahnena so sujjhati sopadhiko. 

Ditfhi hi nam раға tathà vadànan ti sà уа ditthi tam 
puggalam pàvada? ti; iti và yam puggalo miechaditthiko 
vipartadassano ЫЗ. Гала vadanan ti tathà vadantam 
kathentam bhanantam?* dipayantam voharantam: sassato 
loko, idam eva saccam, mogham айдап ti {аа vadan- 
tam 5 kathentam  bhanantam dipayantam  voharantam 
asassato? loko, antaváà loko, anantavà loko, tam jivam tam 
sariram, аййат jivam айдат sariram, hoti tathágato 
parammaraná, па hoti tathàgato parammaranà, hoti са па 
ca hoti tathagato parammaraná, п’ eva hoti na na hoti 
tathàgato parammaraná, idam eva saecam, mogham аййап 
ti tathà vadantam? kathentam bhanantam dipayantam 
voharantan ti, ditthi hi nam pàáva! tathà vadánam. Теп’ 
Aha Dhagavà : 


Ditthena ee suddhi narassa hoti, 
папепа và so pajaháti dukkham, 
аййепа so sujjhati sopadhilio, 

ditthi hi nam pava! {айа vadanan ti. 


Na bráàhmano aññato suddhim aha 
ditthe sute silavate mute và, 

punñe са pápe cà anupalitíto, 
attanjaho na-y-1idha pakubbamano?. 3. 


Na ратно aññato suddhim айа ditthe snte silavate 
mute vá ti. Na ti patikkhepo. Drahmano ti sattannam 
dhammanam bahitatta bràhmano; sakkayaditthi һара 
hoti, vieikieeha báhita hoti, silabbataparamáso? bāhito 


1 5 sava. 2 B vāvada. 

? D" om. t, * S bhauen&un as usual. 
5 8 vadantam. 9 Si assassato as often. 
7 p" S pakuppamiüno. 

8 


Si silabbatta?. Si has silavata in metrical passages ; 
silavatta (= silavrita), silabbatta = silabbati (= silavrata). 


S.N. 790] Swuddhatthakasuttaniddeso. 87 


hoti, rgo bāhito hoti, doso bahito hoti, moho bàhito hoti, 
mano bàáhito hoti, bàhit' assa honti рарака akusala 
dhamma saükilesikà ponobbhavikà sadarà! duklihavipáka 
ayatim játijarámarantya : 


* Вапеіуа sabbapapakàni 
Sabhiya ti Bhagavā 
vimalo sādhusamāhito thitatto 
samsüram айсса kevalī so, 
anissito? tādi pavuccate? sa brahma. 


Na brühmano aññato suddhim аһа М brahmano annena 
asuddhimaggena miechapatipadáya aniyyünapathena anüa- 
tra satipatthànehi annatra sammappadhànehi aüüatra 
iddhippádehi annatra indriyehi annatra balehi anüatra 
bojjiaügehi aünatra ariyatthaügikamaggena, suddhim 
visuddhim parisuddhim muttim vimuttim parimuttim n’ 
аһа па katheti na bhanati na dipayati na vobharati ti, na 
brāhmano annato suddhim аһа. 

Ditthe sute вЧагайе mute và ti. Sant еке samana- 
bràhmanà ditthasuddhikà; te ekaecànam rüpànam dassa- 
nam maágalam paecenti; ekaecánam rüpànam dassanam 
amarngalam paecenti. 

Katamesam rüpanam dassanam mahgalam  paccenti ? 
Te kàlato vutthahitvaà abhimangalagatani rüpàni passanti : 
vàtasakunam Š passanti, pussaveluvalatthim ° passanti, 
gabbhinitthim passanti, kumarikam? khandhe àropetvà 
gacchantam passanti, punnaghatam passanti, rohitamac- 
cham passanti, àjannam passanti, ajahnaratham passanti, 


* Sn. 519. 


1 Si sadadhà; Š madárà, below p. 98; B° Si sadarà; 
S davodara. 
2 B? S asito here aud below. 
S samuccado, later samuceato. 
B" S ariyena atthaügikena m°. 
B^ ehapasakunam ; S vàpasaranam. 
S phussa?. 7 D? kumàrakam. 


88 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 790 


usabham passanti, gokapilam passanti; evarupánam rüpà- 
nam dassanam maügalam paccenti. 

Katamesam rüpiánam dassanam amangalam paccenti? 
Palàlapuijam passanti, takkaghatam passanti, rittaghatam 
passanti, natam passanti, naggasamanam 1 passanti, 
kharam passanti, kharayánam passanti, ekayuttayanam 
passanti, kanam passanti, kunim passanti, khanjam 
passanti, pakkhahatam? passanti, jinnakam passanti, 
byādhikam passanti, matam? passanti; evarūpānam rūpā- 
nam dassanam amangalam paccenti. Ime te samana- 
brāhmanā ditthasuddhika, te ditthena suddhim visuddhim 
parisuddhim muttim vimuttim parimuttim paccenti. 

Sant’ еке samanabràhmana sutasuddhiká; te ekaccànam 
saddànam savanam mangalam paccenti; ekaeeanam saddà- 
nam savanain amabgalam paecenti. 

Katamesam saddànam savanam maügalam paceenti? 
Te kàlato vutthahitvà abhimangalagatani* saddàni sunanti: 
vaddha ti và vaddhamànà ti và punnà ti và pussá? t 
vā assoka% ti và ѕшпапа ti và sunakkhattà ti và suman- 
galā ti và sirī ti và sirivaddhà ti уй; evarüpánam saddà- 
nam savanam maùgalam paccenti. 

Katamesam saddànam savanam amangalam paccenti ? 
Капо ti và Киш ti và khanjo ti và pakkhahato* ti và 
jinnako ti và byádhiko ti và mato ti và chinnan ti và 
bhinnan ti và daddhan ti và natthan ti và m’ atthī® ti 
và; evarüpànam saddànam savanam amangalam paccenti. 
Ime te samanabráhmanà sutasuddhikà te sutena suddhim 
visuddhim  parisuddhim  muttim vimuttim  parimuttim 
paceenti. 

Sant’ еке samanabráhmanpà silasuddhikà ; te silamattena 
samyamamaitena  samvaramaitena —avitikkamamattena 


B" naggasamanakam ; Š khaggapannam. 

B" pakkhapàdam (see A. iii, 385). 

В” matakam. 

S abhimaügalam kathánam. 

В” phussa. 5 8 asoka. 
B» pakkhapado. 8 5 naggi. 


“<< @ +> G t мн 


S.N. 790] Sudidhatthakasuttaniddeso. 89 


suddhim — visuddhim —parisuddhim — muttim — vimuttim 
parimuttim paccenti. 

Samano! Mundikàputto evam аһа: Catühi kho aham 
thapati? dhammehi samannágatam purisapuggalam pannà- 
pemi sampannakusalam  paramakusalam — uttamapattip- 
pattan samanam ayojjam?.  Katamehi catūhi? Idha 
thapati* na küyena papakammam karoti, na papikam 5 
vücam bhasati, na pápakam samkappam  samkappeti, na 
pàpakam àjivam ájivati. Imehi kho abam thapati* catūhi 
dhammehi samannàgatam —purisapuggalam  pahnápemi 
sampannakusalam  paramakusalam —uttamapattippattam 
samanam ayojjham. 

Evam eva вап” еке samanabrāhmanā silasuddhikà ; te 
silamattiena samyamamattena samvaramattena avilikka- 
mamatteng& suddhim  visuddhim  parisuddhim — muttim 
vimuttüm parimuttim paecenti. 

Sant’ еке samanabràhmanáà vattasuddhika?. Те hatthi- 
vattikā 8 và honti, assavattikà và honti, govattikà va honti, 
kukkuravattikà và honti, kakavattikà và honti, Vàsudeva- 
уа Ка và honti, Baladevavattikà và honti, Punnabhadda- 
vattikà và honti, Manibhaddavattikà và honti, aggivattika 
và honti, nàgavattikà và honti, supannavattika và honti, 
yakkhavattikà và honti, asuravattikaà và honti, gandhab- 
bavattikà và honti, mahárájavattikà và honti, candavattikà 
và honti, suriyavattikà và honti, Indavattika và honti, 
Brahmavattikà vā honti, devavattikà và honti, disavattikà 
và honti. Ime te samanabràhmanà vattasuddhikà; tena 
vattena suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim muttim vimuttim 
parimuttim paecenti. 

Sant’ eke samangabrahmanà mutavisuddhika. Те kalato 
vutthahitvà ? pathavim  imasanti, haritam  àmasanti, 


Si samanamundika? ; S samano pi mundina?. 
S рапа; D? gahapati always. 


3 B? ayojjam alicays. + p? S gahapati. 
5 В” 8 pàpakam. ° B? kammam ; S Карра. 
? Br S vata? alicays. 8 D" Э ?vatikà always. 

9 


B" S utthahitvà. 


90 Afthakavaggo. [S.N. 190 


gomayam imasanti, kaechapun ! àmasanti, jàlam 2 akka- 
manti ?, tilavàhau * àmasanti, pussatilam 5 khádanti, pussa- 
telam makkhenti, pussadantakattham khādanti, pussa- 
mattikaya nhāyanti, pussasitakam ° nivaásenti, pussavet- 
апат 7 vetthanti. Ime te samanabrühmaná muta- 
suddhikà; tena mutena suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim 
muttim vimuttim parimuttim paccenti. 

Na brāhmano aññato suddhim aha ditthe sute silavate 
mute và ti brühmano ditthasuddhiyà pi suddhim n’ &ha, 
sutasuddhiyá pi suddhim n’ аһа, eilasaddhiyà pi suddhim 
п’ aha, vatiasuddhiyà pi suddhim п’ аһа, mutasuddhiyà pi 
suddhim n' àha na katheti na bhanati na dipayati na 
voharati ti, na bràhinano aüfüato suddhim аһа ditthe sute 
silavate mute và. 

Риййе ca pēpe са «nüpalitto ti. Puünam vuccati yam 
kinei tedhàatukam © kusalàbhisamkhàram; apuññam vuccati 
sabbam akusalam. Yato punnàbhisamkháro са арийћа- 
bhisamkhàro ea àneüjábhisamkháro ea pahina honti uccehin- 
namülà tàlavatthukatà anabhávangata? ayatim anuppá- 
dadhammá, ettàvatà 10 рийле ca pápe са na limpati "na 
saumnlimpati" na upalimpati, айо asumlitto алйраййо 
nikkhanto nissattho!? vippamutto visamyutto vimariyá- 
dikatena !? eetasa viharati ti, puññe са раре ea anüpalitto. 

Attasijaho na-y-idha pakubbamáno ti. Attanjaho ti atta- 
ditthijaho ; attaüjaho ti gáhajaho ^; attaüjaho ti tanhàva- 
sena ditthivasena gahitam paramattham abhinivittham 


! 8 kaccham. ? Dr phàlam ; S. phalam. 
з 5 àmasantt 4 5 tilakam. 


° В” S phussa? йе. 

° B" phussasatakam; S phussasátikam. 

? B" phussavetthànam ; 8 phussanivethanam. 

8 $ hetukam. 

° $ anabhávamkatà, which reading is followed below by 
В». 

V Si ad, ea. u-h pr S от. 12 $ nissato. 

B pr S vipariyadi? «s usual. 

HO pr S attagihanjalio: S attaü. 


S.N. 791] Suddhatthakasuttaniddeso. 91 


ajjhositam adhimuttam, ! sabbam tam! сайат hoti vantam 
muttam pahinam patinissattham. Na-y-idha pakubbamanuo* 
ti puňňābhisamkhāram vā apuüüabhisamkháram va 
aneüjábhisamkhàram và akubbamáno? ajanayamano asan- 
janayamáno anibbattayamàáno anabhinibbattayamáno ti, 
attanjaho na-y-idha pakubbamáno. Геп’ аһа Bhagavà: 


Na brühmano anüato suddhim аһа 
ditthe sute silavate mute và, 

puüüe са раре ca anüpalitto, 
attahjaho na-y-idha pakubbamáno ti. 


Purimam pahàya aparam siftàse 
ejáànugà te na taraníti sangam, 

te uggah&àyanti nirassajanti, 

kapi уа sákham pamukham gahàya. 4. 


Purimam pahüya. aparam sitse ti purimam satthàram 
pahāya aparam satthàram nissità, purimam dhammak- 
khànam рарауа aparam dhammakkhànam nissità, purimam 
сапат раһауа aparam ganam nissità purimam ditthim 
paháya aparam ditthim  nissità, purimam  patipadam 
pahāya aparam  patipadam  nissità, purimam maggam 
pahāya aparam maggam nissità sannissità* allinà upagatà 
ajjhosità adhimutta ti, purimam раһауа aparam sitàáse. 

Ejünugü te па taranti saügau ti. Ej vuccati tanbà, yo 
таро sárügo . . . pe... abhijjhà lobho akusalamülam. 
Ljanwgá ti ejanugaà ejanugatà? ејапиѕаіа, ejàya panna 
patità abhibhütà pariyádinnaeittà. Хаё tarauti вайдан ti 
rügasangam dosasangam mohasaüngam máànasaügam ditthi- 
sahgam kilesasaügam  dueearitasahgam па taranti, па 
uttaranti na pataranti na samatikkamanti na vitivattanti 
ti, ejānugā te па taranti sahgam. 

Te uggahayanti nirassajanti ti satthāram ganhanti, tam 
muicitvà annam sattharam ganhanti; dbammakkhánam 


17 B? sabbàássatam ; S ваһһа?, ? 5 pakuppamano. 
3 D? apakubbamàno; S 'pakuppamáno. 
1 D" Б om. 5 бі от. $ В” te na: S na te. 


02 Athakavaggo. (S.N. 791 


ganhanti, tam muneitvi anham dhammakkhànam gan- 
hanti; ganam ganhanti, tam muñcitvà айаш ganam 
ganhanti; ditthim ganhanti, tam muneitvà aññam ditthim 
ganbanti; patipadam ganhanti, tam muncitvà annam 
patipadam ganhanti; maggam ganhanti, tam mulcitvà 
annam maggam ganhanti, ganhanti ca muñcanti са, 
àdiyanti ea nirassajanti! cà ti, te uggahàáyanti nirassa- 
јап ?. 

Кар va sükhan. pamukham цаййуй ti yathà makkato 
агаппе pavane caramàno sákham сапра, tam muncitvà 
anham sakham ganhati, tam muneitvà aññam sàkham 
ganhàti; evam eva puthü? samanabrühmanà puthü? 
ditthisatàni ganhanti ea muñeanti ea, ádiyanti са nirassa- 
janti са ti, kapi va sakham pamukham gaháya. Теп аһа 
Bhagavà : 


Purimam pahàya aparam sitáse 
ejànugà te па taranti saügam, 

ie uggahayanti nirassajanti, 

kapi va sákham pamukham gahayaà ti. 


Sayam samádàya vatāni jantu 
uccãvacam gacehati sannasatto, 
vidvàá? ca vedehi samecca dhammam 
na ueeüvacam gacchati bhüripahno. 5. 


Sayam samādāya vatāni jantu ti. Sayam samādāyā ? t 
ваат samādāyað. Vatānī ti hatthivattam và assavattam 
và govattam và kukkuravattam và kàkavattam và Vāsu- 
devavattam và Daladevavattam và Puunabhaddavattam và 
Manibhaddavatiam và aggivattam và nàgavattam vå 
supannavaltam và yakkhavattam và asuravatiam và 
pe... disavattiam và àdàya samádàya àdiyitvà sama- 
diyitvà ganhitvà parümasitvà abhinivisitvā. Jantū ti satto 

! S nidassati (= nir?). 2 Š nidassanti (= nir?). 
3 Br puthu. 
а pr Si viddháà; S vineà here and below. 

5-6 Bi om. 


S.N. 792] Suddhatthakasuttantiddeso. 93 


naro. . . pe. . . manujo ti, sayam samádaüya vatàni 
jantu. 

(7ссдгасат gacchati sansasatto ti satthàrato sattharam 
gacchati, dhammakkhàünato dhaimmaklhàánam  gaechati, 
ganato ganam gaechati, ditthiyà ditthim gaechati, pati- 
padàto patipadam gacchati, maggato maggam gaechati. 
Sannasatto ti kamasaññaya Dyapadasaññaya vihimsā- 
ваййауа ditthisannáya satto visatto āsatto lageo laggito 
palibuddho. Yathà bhittikhile và nàgadante và bhandam 
sattam visattam asattam laggam laggitam palibuddham, 
evam eva kamasaññaya byapadasaññaya vihimsüsanniya 
ditthisahnàya вабо visatto àsatto laggo laggito palibuddho 
ti, uccavacam gaechati salinasatto. 

Vidra ca vedehi samecca dhamman ti. Vidrā ti vidvà 
vijàgato ňānī buddhimà! vibhàvi medhāvīi. Vedehī ti 
vedà vuceanti catüsu maggesu nànam paünà paünindriyam 
райћараіат dhammavicayasambojjhango, vimamsà vipas- 
ѕапа sammàáditthi; tehi vedehi játijaràmaranassa antagato 
antappatto? kotigato kotippatto pariyantagato pariyantap- 
patto vosànagato vosáànappatto tànagato tanappatto lenagato 
lenappatto saranagato saranappatto abhayagato abhayap- 
patto aceutagato  accutappatto amatagato amatappatto 
nibbànagato nibbánappatto, vedànain và antagato ti vedagu, 
vedehi và antagato ti vedagü, sattannam dhammanam 
viditatíà vedagu; sakkáyaditthi vidita hoti, vicikiechā 
vidità hoti, silabbataparimaso vidito hoti, rago vidito hoti, 
doso vidito hoti, moho vidito hoti, mano vidito hoti, 
vidit! assa honti рарака akusalà dhammaà samkilesikà 
ponobbhavikà sadara? dukkhavipákà àyatim jaràmaraniyà. 

* Vedani viceyya kevalàni 
Sabhiya ti Bhagavà 
samanànam уап р’ atthi bràhmanánam 
sabbavedanàásu vitarigo 
sabbam vedaim atieca vedagü so ti. 


* Sn. 529. 


1 B" 8 om. 2 D? patto always. 3 8 davodará. 


94 Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 792 


Vidrà ca vedehi samecca dhamman ti. Samecca abhi- 
вап ecca dhammam: sabbe samkhārā aniceaü ti samecea 
abhisamececa һатта ; варре samkhàra dukkhà ti 
ѕашесеа abhisamecea dhammam; sabbe dhammà anattà 
ti samecca abhisameeca dhammam; ауіјјарассауа sam- 
khàrà ti вашесса abhisamecea dhammam; samkhára- 
рассауй viüBünan ti samecca abhisamecca dhammam; 
уіђдапарассауа nàmarüpan ti, патагпрарассауа salàya- 
tanan ti, salàyatanapaceayà phasso ti, рһаѕѕарассаућ 
vedunà ti, уедапарассауа бапа ti, іапһарассауа upadànan 
tij upàdanapaeeaya bhavo ti, bhavapaecayà ]ай ti, jàti- 
paecayá jaràmarauan ti sameeca abhisameeca dhammam ; 
avijànirodhà samkhàranirodho ti samecca abhisameeca 
dhamman, samkhāranirodhā vinüànanirodho ti samecca 
abhisameeca dhammam, vitinànanirodhà nàmarüpanirodho 
ti, nàámarüpanirodha salàyatananirodho ti, salàyatana- 
nirodha phassanirodho ії, phassanirodhà vedanàánirodho 
ti, vedanànirodhà tanhaánirodho ti, tanhánirodhà upàádàna- 
nirodho ti, upàádànanirodhà bhavanirodho ti, bhavanirodhà 
jàtinirodho ti, jatinirodhà jarimarananirodho ti samecca 
abhisameeca dhammam; idam dukkhan ti samecea abhi- 
samecea dhammam ; ayam dukkhasamudayo ti, ayam 
dukkhanirodho ti, ayam dukkhanirodhagàmini райрада 
ti вашесса abhisameeca dhammam ; ime йвауй ti ѕатесса 
abhisameeca dhammam; ayam àsavasamudayo ti, ayam 
àsavanirodho ti, ayam  àsavanirodhagionnini patipadà ti 
sumeecca abhisamecea dhammam; ime dhamma abhiñ- 
heyyà ti ! sameeca abhisameeca dhaummam!; ime dhammà 
рагійћеууа tj, ime dhamma pahatabba ti, ime dhammá 
bhavetabbaà ti, ime dhanmmà saeehikatabbà ti /sameeea 
abhisameeca diammam; ehannam phassayatananam samu- 
dayulü ca atthañgamañ са аѕвадай ? са adinavan са 
пізѕагараћ ea sumeeen abhisameeca dhammam ; раћсап- 
nam upidanakkhandhaánam samudayan ca atthaügaman 
ca asgadah ea àdinavan са nissarauan? са samecea abhi- 

1-1 Si ош. 2 Si samudayan. 
3 5 nivaranan. 


S.N. 793] Suddhatthakasuttaniddeso. 95 


samecca dhammam ; eatunnam mahàbhütànan sauiudayan 
ea atthangamarn са assádai са айїпауай са nissaranan ca 
samecea abhisamecea dhammam; yam kinci samudaya- 
dhammam  sabban tam  nirodhadhamman ti вашесса 
abhisamececa dhammanu ti, vidvà ea vedehi samecca 
dhammam. 

Ха uccãracam gacchati. Ubhüripanio ti na satthārato 
satthàram gaechati, na dhammakkhànato dhaimmakkhànam 
gacchati, na ganato сапат gaechati,na ditthiyà ditthim 
gacchati, na patipadàya patipadam gaechati, na maggato 
naggam gaechati. DBhüripanno!ti mahápanno puthupaüüo 
hásapaliüo? jJavanapanño tikkhapanno nibbedhikapaüino. 
Bhüri vuecati pathavi; taya pațhavīsamāya райпауа 
vipulàya? vitthatàya samannàgato ti, na uccàãvacam gac- 
chati bhüripanno. Tew аһа Dhagavà : 


Sayam samadaya vatüni jantu 
uccàvacam gacchati sannasatto, 

vidvà ea vedehi ѕашесса dhammam 
па песауасат gacchati bhuripanio ti. 


Sa sabbadhammesu visenibhuüto 
yam kiünci dittham уа? sutam mutam 


va 
tam evadassim vivatam carantam 
kenidha lokasmim vikappayeyya? 6. 


Sa sabbadhammesu  visenibhuto yam kinci. ditthag га 5 
satam mutam га ti. Sena vuceati márasenà ; kàya- 
duecaritam màrasenà, vaeiduccaritam  márasená, mano- 
duecaritam шагаѕепа, rágo шагаѕепа, doso mürasenà, 
moho maàrasenà, kodho upanàho . . . pe? . . . sab- 
bakusalàbhisamkhárà ^ márasenà. ^ Vuttam h’ etam 
Bhagavata : 


1 B? $ ad. bhūripañňo. 2 Š hasupañño. 
3 B» $i vipullàya. t Б" ca. 
5 B? Š са here and below. ° Br S onm. 


96 Átthakavaggo. [S.N. 793 


*Kàmà te pathamà sena, duiiyàrati! vucoati, 

tatiyà khuppipāsā te, eatutthti tanhà pavuceati. 

? Paücamam — thinamiddhan ? te, chatthà  bhirü 
pavuceati, 

sattamam З vielkiechà te, makkho thambho te 
atthamo. 

Labho siloko sakkàro miecháladdho са yo yaso 

yo с’ attanam samukkamse pare ca атајапай. 

Ева Namuei te sena Kanhassabhippahàrini, 

па nam asüro jmàti, jetvà са labhate sukhan ti. 


Yato catühi maggehi?* sabbà ea mārasenā, sabbe са 
patisenikará kilesá, Jità ea рагајња са bhaggà vippaluggà 5 
parammukhà, so vuceati crisenibhüto. So ае viseni- 
bhuto, sute visenibhüto, mute visenibhüto, vinünate viseni- 
bhüto ti, sa sabbadhamtmesu visenibhüto yam kinei dittham 
va sutam matam va. 

Tam evadassiny vivata carantan {з tam eva suddha- 
dassim ê visuddhadassim parisuddhadassim vodanadassim 
pariyodànadassim ; ашата suddhadassanam — visuddha- 
dassanam  parisuddhadassanam vodánadassanam pariyo- 
dànadassanam.  Virafan ti. Tanháchadanam kilesacha- 
danam  avijjaehadanam 8; tàni ehadanàni vivatàni honti 
viddhamsitàni upaghatitàni? samugghátitàni pahináni 
samueehinnàni vüpasantàni patipassaddhàni abhabbup- 
pattkani Bánagginà daddhàni. Carantan ti carantam 20 
viearantani M iriyantam  vatíantam pālentam yapentam 
yüpentan ti, tam evadassim vivatam carantam. 


* Sn. 486-9, with variants. 


| B" 5 dutiyà arati. ?-? D? paneami ti middhan. 
3 DB? sattami. 3 p S ad. ariya. 
5 бї vippaluttà. 9-5 Si om. 


7 5 ad. ditthichadanam. 

8 B" 8 «d. ducearitachadanam. 

? S ugghàtitàni. 

10 D? ор. п B? viharantanm. 


S.N. 794] Suddha!thakasulfaniddeso. 97 


М 


Kewidha lokasmine vikappayeyyā ti. Kappa! ti dve 
Карра, tanhākappo са ditthikappo cà . .. pe... ayam 
tanhàkappo...pe...ayam ditthikappo. ?Tassa tanhà- 
kappo palio, ditthikappo patinissattho : tanhakappassa 
pahinattà ditthikappassa  patinissatthattà kena ragena 
kappeyya, kena dosena Карреууа, kena mohena карреууа. 
kena mánena kappeyya, kāva ditthiyà Карреууа, hens 
nddhaecena Карреууа, kaya vicikicehāya Карреууа, keb: 
anusayelhi kappeyya ratto ti và duttho ti và mülho t va 
vinibandho ti và paramattho ti và vikkhepagato ti vā 
anitthaügato Ы và thamacato ti và 22 Te ablisamkhàárà 
pahina, abhisamkháranam palinattà gatiyà? kena kap- 
peyya nerayiko ti và, tiraechanavoniko ti ла pittivi-ayiko ' 
ti và manusso ti vi devo ti và rupi ti và агарі ti và sani 
ti và asaüni fi và nevasanni-násahni tj và? бо hetu 
п’ абі, рассауо п’ atthi, kāranam n’ atthi yena kappeyyau 
vikappeyya vikappam apajjeyya. Лолаѕтін ti apiyaloke 
manussaloke devaloke khaudhaloke dhàtuloke iyatanaloke 
ti, kenidha lokasmim vikappayeyya. Ten аһа Бһасаха : 


Ба sabbadhammesu visenibhüto 

yam пе dittham va sutam mutam và 
tam evadassin vivatam carantam 
kenidha lokasmim vikappayeyya? ti. 


Na kappayauti, na purekkharonti, 
üieeantasuddhi ti na te vadantri:; 
adaànagantham? gathitam? visajja 
asam na kubbanti kuhinei loke. p 


Ха kappayauti na purekkharouti ti. Kappa ti dve Карра, 


tanhakappo ea ditthikappo ca . . . pe . . . ayman tanha- 
Барро .. . pe . . . ayam ditthikappo. Tesam tanha- 


kappo pahino, ditthikappo patinissattho : tanhàkappassa 
pahinattaà ditthikappassa patinissatthattà tanhakappom và 


t- See m 119. 2-1 S om. 3 Br Si gativo. 
3 S petti? as usual. > Br S adànagandham. 
5 B" gadhitam ; Š gad(h)itam. 


98 Atfhakaraggo. (S.N. 794 


ditthikappam và na kappenti na janenti na sanjanenti 
па nibbaitenti nábhinibbattenti ti, па kappayanti. Na 
purekkharonti ti. Dve purekkhàrà, tanhapurekkhàro са 
ditthipurekkhàro са... ре... Ayam tanhapurekkhàro 
e. pe... ayam ditthipurekkharo. Теѕаш tanhápurek- 
kara pahino, ditthipurekkharo patinissattho; tanhapurek- 
kharassa pahinatta ditthipurekkhàrassa patinissatthatta 
па tanham và па ditthim và purato kaivà caranti; na 
tanhadhaja, na tanhaketu, na tanhādhipateyyā; na ditthi- 
dhajà, na ditthiketü, na ditthàdhipateyyà: па tanhaya 
và па ditthiyà và parivāritā caranti ti, na kappayanti 
па purekkharonti. 

Aecantasuddhi ti na (e vadauti ti. | Accantasuddhi ti 
anaccantasuddhim ! samsárasuddhim 2  akiriyasuddhim ! 
sassatavàdam na vadanti na kathenti na bhananti na 
dipayanti na voharanti ti, ассапбаѕпааһ ti na te vadanti. 

Adünaganthais? gathita:p* visajjà ti. Ganthàá? ti eattàro 
gantha?, abhijhà kāyagantho 9, byápado kayagantho, 
silabbataparünaso káyagantho, idamsaecabhiniveso kaya- 
gantho. 

Attano ditthiyà rāgo abhijjhā kāyagantho. Paravādesu 
āghäāto appaecayo byāpādo kāyagantho. Attano silam và 
vattam và silabbatam và paràmasan ti silabbataparámaso 
kàyagantho. Attano ditthe? idamsaccábhiniveso Кауа- 
gantho. 

Knnkáranà vuccanti? adànagantho ? Tehi ganthehi 
гарат adiyanti upádiyanti ganhanti paràmasanti abhini- 
visanti, vedanam вайпап samkhare vinnaànam gatim 
upapattim patisandhim bhavain samsáravattam àadiyanti 
upadiyanti ganhanti paràmasanti abhinivisanti; tamkáranà 
vuecanti idànagantho. 

Visajjaà ti ganthe vossajjitvà và visajja; athavà ganthe?’ 


1 S ^suddhi. ? S ?suddhi ti. 

3 pr» S ?gandham. t B” gadhitam ; S. gathitam. 
5 pe 8S candha. 6 B'S °gandho, always. 

7 pH S ditthi. 8 Si vuecati; see l. 2 from below. 
э p" S gandhe gadhito gandhite, here and below. 


S.N. 795] Suddhatthakasul taniddeso. 99 


gathite ganthite bandhe! vibandhe àbandhe lagge lagpite 
palibuddhe? photayitvà? và visajja; yathà vaylam và 
ratham và sakatam và sandamànikam và sajjam visajjam * 
karonti vikopenti, evam eva ganthe vossajjitva và? visajja*; 
athavà ganthe cathite ganthite bandhe?” vibandhe àbandhe 
lagge laggite palibuddhe photayitvà và? visajjà ti, adana- 
gantham gathitam visajja. 

dsan па kubbanti kuhiüci loke ti. Asā vuccati апра, 
yo rāgo sārāgo . .. ре. . . abhijjhà lobho akusalamiülam. 
Азап» na kubbauti ti ават па kubbanti na janenti na 
sañjanenti na nibbattenti nabhinibbaitenti. Kahiñeī ti 
kuliifiei kimhiei katthaci ajjhattam và bahiddhà và ajjhat- 
tabahiddha và. Loke ti apàyaloke . . . pe . . . àyatana- 
loke ti, àsam na kubbanti kuhiñei loke. Теп’ апа Bhagavà: 


Na kappayauti, na purekkharonti, 
aeeantasuddhi ti na te vadanti, 
adànagantham салат visajja 
ава na kubbanti kuhiñci loke ti. 


Simátigo? braàhmano, tassa n’ atthi 

hatvà ca disvà са samuggahitam; 

na rigaràgi па virügaratto, 

tassidam n’ atthi param uggahitam?. s. 

Sunátigo brühmano, tassa. n’ atthi natrá са dised ca 

samuggalitun ti. Sima ti catasso simüyo; ѕаккауаа і 
vicikicchà silabbataparámáso ditthánusayo vieikieehanu- 
sayo tadekattha са kilesa, ayam pathamá simà; olürikam 
kàmarágasamyojanam, patighasamyojanam, olàriko kàma- 
ràgànusayo, patighànusayo, iadekattha са kilesà, ayam 
duiiyà sima: anusahagatam kámaràágasamyojanam, pati- 
ghasamyojanam,  anusabagato  kàmarigánusayo, pati- 
ghànusavo, tadekatthà ea kilesā; ayam tativü sini; 


1 Si om. ? S ad. bandhane. 
3 S родах іга. 3 5 vissajjam. 
5 S on. và. $ $ visajjam. 

8 


* Siom. bandhe. B" S om. và. 
Si simatigo throughont. 19 Codd. ad. ti. 


Ф 


100 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 795 


rüparágo arüparigo mano uddhaceam avijjà, mánànusayo 
bhavar&gànusayo avijjanusayo tadekatthà ca kiles, ayam 
eatuttha sīmā. Yato eatühi ariyamaggehl imà catasso 
simáyo atikkanto hoti samatikkanto vitivatto, so vuceati 
simátigo. JBrülhmano ti sattannam dhammānam báhitatta! 
bráhmano? . . . pe . . . anissito? tadi pavuccate brahma. 
Tassā ti arahato khinàsavassa. Ñatrā ti paraeittaBánena 
уй ñatva, pubbenivasanussatinanena và Batvà. Disrā ti 
mamsaeakkhunà và * dibbaeakkhunà và disvà ti? simátigo 
bráhmano tassa п’ atthi natvà ca disvà ea. Samuygahitan 
ti tassa idam paramam aggam settham уіѕе һат 
pamokkham uttamam pavaran ti gahitam раташа Пат 
abhinivittham ajjhositam adhimuttam п?” алт ti n’ atthi 
na santi? na samvijjati n’ upalabbhati, pahinam samuc- 
chinnam vüpasantam patipassaddham abhabbuppattikanm 
Bànagginà daddhan ti, simátigo bràhmano tassa n’ atthi 
üatvà са disva ca samuggahitam. 

Na таатай? na viragaratto tì. Itagarattà vuccanti. ye 
pañeasu kámagunesu тайа giddha gadhità muechità ° 
ajihopanna? 1асса laggitā palibuddhà.  Virágarattà vue 
canti ye rüpávaearárüpávaearasamápattisu 10 тайа giddhà 
gadhità muechità ajjhopannà laggà laggità palibuddha. 
Na ragaráqi ha vcirüqaratto ti yato kāmarāgo ca rüparàágo 
са ürüparàago ea pahina honti ucehinnamulà talavatthukatà 
anabiiávangata!! àyatim anuppádadhamma, ettavatá na 
rágaragi na viràgaratto. 

Tassīdam w atthi param uggalītan ti. Tassa ti arahato 
khīņāsavassa. Tassa idam paramam aggam  setthain 
visettham påmokkham uttamam pavaran ti gahitam parā- 

! 5 pahitatta. 
? p" 8 ad. sakkáyaditthi báhità hoti, vieikiechà báhità 


hoti, silabbataparamáso bāhito hoti. . . ре... (see p. 86). 
3 P> S (a)sito. 4 S ad. disvà. 
5 pr S ор. 6 Sion. 
7 Š ràgarattà (abore тАсагао). 
8 B samuccehità here and below. 9 D" ајјһоѕапра. 


10 Br rüpávavaeara- a2. п pr 5 katu; 


S.N. 795] Suildhatthakasultaniddeso. 101 


, 


mattham ! abhinivittham  ajjhositàm adhimuttam “n 
atthi ti? w atthi ?na santi? na samvijjati n upalab- 
bhati, pahinam samuechinnam  vüpasantam  patipassad- 
dham abhabbuppattikam ñānagginā daddhan ti, tassīidamı 
n' atthi param uggahitam. Теп’ аһа Bhagava: 

Уплабоо bràáhmano, tassa n' atthi 

пака ea disvà са samuggahitim: 

na гасагаої, na viracaratto, 

tassidam w atthi param uggahitin ti. 


CaTv TIN 0 SUDPHATTHAKASUTTANIDDEZO NITTIIITO э: 


і Si S paràmattham : B" рагаша Наш. 
2—2 D? S џи, ^ bom. 3 DU S on. 
5 p" 5 samatto catuttho. 


PANCAMO! PARAMATTHARASUTTANIDDESO?. 


Paraman ti ditthisu paribbasàno?, 
yad uttarimkurute jantu loke 

hinà ti anne tato sabba-m.aha, 
tasmà vivādāni avitivatto. 1. 


Paraman ti ditthisu paribbasano * ti. Sant’ eke samana- 
brāhmaņā ditthigatika. Te? dvāsatthiyā ditthigatànam 
anüatarannataraditthigatam 9, idam paramam aggam set- 
tham visettham pamokkham uttamam pavaran * ti gahetva 
uggahetvà ganhitvà parümasitvà abhinivisitvà, sakaya? 
saküyn? ditthiyā vasanti samvasanti!? àvasanti pari- 
vasanti. Yathà āgārikā™ và gharesu vasanti, sāpattikā và 
apattisu vasanti, sakiles&à và kilesesu vasaníi; !?evam eva 
вап? еке samanabrahmana ditthigatika; te dvasatthiyà 
ditthigalànam annatarannataram ditthigatam, idam para- 
mam aggam settham visettham pámokkham uttamam 
pavaran ti gahetvaà uggahetva ganhitvà paramasitvà abhi- 
nivisitvà, sakàya salaya ditthiyà vasanti 12 13 samvasanti 1% 
asanti parivasanti ti, paraman ti ditthisu paribbasano. 

Yad uttarimkurute jantu loke ti. Yadan ti yam. Utta- 
гн Ките ti uttarimkaroti 18, aggam settham visettham 


і Be S on. 


2 B” paramatthakasutti-anukkati; S. paramakkatain- 
kasutti-anuklati. 


3 S parippassáno. 4 S paribbayano. ° B» Si và. 
ё B" annataraüüataram d°; S aññataram d°. 
7 Š param. 8 Siem. 
° p" S sakaya; Si sakkàaya. 
10 B" parasanti; Š om. 11 S agárità. 
12-32 Si om. 13—13 $ om. м D" parasanti; Š om. 


102 


S.N. 796] Daramatthakasuttaniddeso. 103 


pàmokkhum uttamam pavaram karoti: ayam вайа sab- 
banhü ti uttarim karoti, aggam  settham  visettham 
pimokkham uttamam pavaram karoti; ayam dhammo 
svakkbáto!, ayam gano supatipanno, ayam ditthi bhad- 
diki, ayam patipadà supaññatta, ayam maggo niyyaniko 
ti uttarim karoti, aggam settham visettham pamokkhan 
uttamam pavaram karoti nibbatteti abhinibbatteti. Janta 
ti satto naro . . . pe... manujo. Loke ti apáyaloke 
... pee... dyatanaloke ti, yad uttarimkurute jantu 
loke. 

Птпа ti аййе tato sabba-m-ahá ti. Attano sattharam 
dhammakkháànam? сапат ditthim patipadam maggam 
thapetva?, sabbe parappavade khipati ukkhipati parikkhi- 
pati: so satthà na sabbanüu, dhammo na svakkhato, gano 
па supatipanno, ditthi na bhaddikà, patipudà na supan- 
йайа, maggo na niyyaniko; п’ atth' ettha suddhi và 
visuddhi và parisuddhi và mutti va vimutti và parimutti 
và; fna tattha * sujjhanti và visujjhantii và parisujjhanti 
và muecanii và vimuecanti và parimueeanii và; hina 
nihinà omaka làmakà jatukka? parittà Ы evam аһа evam 
katheti evam bhanati evam dipayati evam voharati ti, 
hina ti anne tato sabba-m-áha. 

Tasmà еігайапі avitivatto ti Stasma tamkàraná tamhetu 
tappaceayà tamnidànaá? ditthikalahàni ditthibhandanáni 
ditthiviggahani ditthivivádani ditthimedhagāni uritivatto 
anatikkanto asamatikkanto? tif, {авша vivadani avīti- 
vatto?. Теп’ аһа Bhagava: 


Paraman ti ditthisu paribbasáno, 
yad uttarimkurute jantu loke 
hina ti айде tato sabba-m-àha, 
tasmá vivadáni avitivaito ti. 


1 B? svakhyáto. 2 S sudhamma^?. 

š В” dhapeti; S janetva. 3-5 B? n’ atth’ ettha. 
5 B" chatukkà ; S ehatalikam. 6—6 S ош. 

7 B? ad. vivadàni ti. 8 D? ad. avitivatto. 
9 


B» S ad. ti. 


104 Atthiakuvagngo. [S.N. 797 


Yad attani passati anisamsam 
ditthe sute srilavate mute vi, 

tad eva so tattha samuggahiaya 
nilinato passati sabbam аййат. 3. 


Yad? attanz passati. dnisaiiscip diffe sute silarvate mute 
тё 1. Yad айант ti yam attani. Atta vuecati ditthigatam. 
Attano ditthiyà dve inisumse passati; ditthadhammikan 
са inisamsam, samparáyikaü ca ánisamsam. 

Katamo ditthiya ditthadhammiko anisamso? Yam- 
ditthiko sattha hoti, tamditthika sávakà honti, tamditthi- 
kam sattharam sávaká sakkaronti garuükaronti mánenti 
pujenti *upacitim karonti?; labhanti ea tatonidànam ci- 
varapiundapatasenasanagilinapaecayabhesajjapariklhàram . 
Ayam ditthiya ditthadhanuniko ánisamso. 

Katamo ditthiya samparayiko ànisamso? Ayam ditthi 
alam mnágattàya và supannattàya vā yakkhattaya và 
asurattàya va gandhabbattava và mahárajattaya và in- 
dattàya và brahmattàya và devattàya và. Ayam ditthi 
alam suddhiya visuddhiyà parisuddhtyà muttiya vimuttiyà 
parimuttya ; ?imáya алуа sujjhanti visujjhanti pari- 
sujiianti inuecant] vimuecanti parimuecanti?: nnàya 
ditthivà  sujjhissiümi 3 visujihissami — parisujjhissümi š 
muecissüml vimuecissàmi parimucceissàmi ti ayatim phala- 
patikamkhi hoti. Ayam ditthiva ватрагауіко ànisamso. 
Attano ditthiya ime dve inisamse passati. 

bitthasuddhiya? pi dve ànisamse:passati ; sutasuddhiya 
рі dve anisamse passati; silasuddhiyaà pi dve ànisamse 
passati: vattasuddhiya? pi dve ánisamse passati: muta- 
suddhiyà pi dve ānisamse passati: ditthadhammikan ea 
anisamsum, samparàylkaü ca inisamsam. 

Katamo  mutasuddhiya  ditthadhamimiko | ànisamso ? 
Yunditthiko satthà hoti, tamditthika sāvakā honti. 
pe... ayam mutasnddhiyá ditthadhammiko ànigamso. 


Posee above, chap. LIL, p. 60. SARDI SONE 
5-3 6 от. 4 8 dittlisuddhi api. 
5 p? S vata? ; Si vatta? as always. 


S.N. 798] DParamaltthakasuttaniddeso. 165 


hatamo mutasuddhiva samparayiko ānisamso? Ayarı 
ditthi alam nàágattàya và...pe...ayan mutasuddhiya 
samparayiko ànisunso. Mutasuddhiyà pi ime dve ani- 
samse passati dakkhati oloketi mijjhavati upaparikkhati 
ti, yad attani passati ànisamsam ditthe sute sīlavate 
mute và. 

Tad era so tattha samingqgahaya ti. Tad wā ti tam 
ditthigatam. Гаа ti sakāya ditthiya sakāya khantiyā 
sakāya ruciyā вакауа laddliya. 1 Samugyahāyā ti! idam” 
paramam aggam settham visettham pámolkkham цата 
pavaran ti gahetvà uggahetvà ganhitvà paramasitva abhi- 
nivisltvà ti, tad eva so tattha samuggahàávya. 

ANilhinato passati. ваат айдан ti. пар satuharan 
dhammakkhánam garam ditthim  patipidam шассаш 
hinato nihtiato omakato limakato jatukkato? parittato* 
passati dakkhati oloketi nijjbāyati upaparikkhati ti, 
nihinato passati sabbam айдат. Ten’ аһа Dhagava: 


Yad attani passati anisam=sam 
ditthe sute sillavate mute vi, 

tad eva so tatiha samuggahàáya 
nihinato passati sabbam annan й. 


Tam và pi gantham? kusalà vadanti 
yam nissito passati hinam айдат. 
tasma hi 9dittham ха sutam mutam 
vā 
silabbatam? bhikkhu na nissnyeyxa. 3. 
Таш cà pi ganthan 5 Eusalü кайан ù. Kusalà ti xe te 
khandhakusalà dhátukusalà àüyatanakusalà paticcasamup- 
pàdakusali  satipatthanakusalà sammappadhànakusalà Š 
iddhippadakusalà indrivakusala balakusalà bojjhaügakusslà 
maggakusalà phalakusalà nibbánakusalà. te kusalà evam 
vadanti: gantho eso, lambanam ? etam, bandhanam etmn, 


1 Sion. 2 S ad. ga. 3 Be ehatulikato ; 5 ea?. 
3 BP ad. dassati : S ud. diszati. 5 Br S candham. 
6-6 D" S ditthan са. z Si silabbattam. 


5 В” samuppadhana^. ? В” S lageanam (better). 


106 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 798 


palibodho eso íi evam vadanti evam kathenti evam 
bhananti! evam dipayanti evam voharanti ti, tam và pi 
gantham kusalà vadanti. 

Yam missito passati hum айй ti Yam nissito ti 
yam? sattharam dhammakkhánam ganam ditthim pati- 
padam maggam nissito sannissito? allino upagato ajjhosito 
adhimutto. Passati hinam айлап ti aünam satthàram 
dhammakkhanam  ganam ditthim  patipadam  maggam 
hinato nihinato omakato làmakato jatukkato* parittato 5 
passati dakkhati oloketi nijhàyati? upaparikkhati ti, 
yam nissito passati hinam айда. 

Tasmà hà ditthay ca хилл mutane rà silabbatai? bhikkhu 
na nissayeyya ii. asma ti tasmà tamkāraņā tamhetu 
tappaecayáà tammnidànà. ЭО Лат và ditthasuddhimm vā 
sutam và sutasuddhim và muta và mutasuddhim và sam 
và silasuddhim và vatta và vattasuddhim và na nissayeyya 
na ganheyya па parümaseyya nabhiniviseyyà ti, tasma 
hi dittham уа sutam mutam và silabbatam" bhikkhu na 
nissayeyya. Теп’ аһа Bhagava: 


Tam và pi gantham kusalà vadant 
yam nissito passati hinam annam, 
tasmá hi dittham va sutam mutam và 
silabbatam * bhikkhu na nissayeyyà ti. 


Ditthim pi lokasmim? na kappayeyya 
йапепа và silavatena và pi, 
samo ti attànam апарапеууа, 
hino na mannetha, visesi và рі. 4. 
Ditthüp pi lokasmigy? na kappayeyya nàüuena và silava- 
tena cá pi Ы.  Atthasamápatti&aneue са pancabhinnàána- 
nena và miechànanena và 51ела va сайепа са $ilavattena 


1 S bhanenti as usual. ? $i tam. 

3 D" oj, ; S assato. 4 Br chatukko ; S chatukkato. 
5 Br S ad. dassati, see p. 105, n. 4. 

9 D? ad. upanijjhayati. 7 Ni silavatam. 

8 


)" ]okasmi. 


S.N. 800] Paramatthakasuttuniddeso. 107 


và Фр па kappayeyya na janeyya па sahjaneyya па 
nibbatteyya nàbhinibbatteyya. | Lokasuin ti apüyaloke 
1 manussaloke devaloke khandhaloke dhátuloke! àyatana- 
loke ti, ditthim рі lokasmim? па kappayeyya üànena 
và silavatena và pi. 

Samo ti attānam anüpaneyya ti. Sadiso "ham asmi ti 
attanam na upaneyya, јайуа vā gottena vā kolaputtikena ? 
và vannapokkharatiya vā dhanena và? ajjhenena và 
kammáyatanena và sippiyatanena? уа sutena và pati- 
bhànena và aünatarannatarena và vatthuna ti, samo ti 
attànam anuüpaneyya. 

Hino na macüetha visesi và pi ti. Hino 'ham asmi ti 
attànam па прапеууа, Jatiya và gottena vā... pe... 
aünatarannatarena và vatthunà. Seyyo 'ham asmī ti 
aitinam na upaneyya, јайуа và gottena vā... pe... 
aññataraññatarena và vatthuna ti, hino. na manheiha 
уівеѕі và рі. Теп’ аһа Bhagava: 

Ditthim pi lokasmim na kappayeyya 
папепа và silavatena và pi, 

samo ti айапаш anüpaneyya, 

hino па maüüetha, visesi và pí ti. 


Attam? pahaya anupadiyano 

пале? pi so nissayam no karoti, 

sa ve viyattesu па vaggasàári, 
ditthim pi so na рассеїі Кїїсї. 5. 


tan pahüya anupadiyano ti. Attam pahayga ti atta- 
ditthim pahàya; attam рарауа ti attagaham? раһауа; 
attam paháyà ti tanhàvasena ditthivasena gahitam рага- 
ша ат abhinivittham ajjhositam adhimuttam раһаха 
pajahitvà vinodetvà byantikatvà? anabhávam  gamitvà. 


1—1 D? pe, ? В lokasmi. 
? В» 5 kulaputtikena. + B ad. dhaBBena và. 
5 Br S ad. vijjatthànena và. 
ê S attham, always in this stanza and Comm. 
1 S nànena. 8 51 раһат; ВР attagaham. 
9 p" S byantikaritva. 


108 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 800 


Attam раһауа anupādiyāno ti catühi upadanehi anupádi- 
уашапо aganhamáno aparümasamàno anabhinivisamáno 
ti, айат раһауа anupádiyano. 

Nüne! pi so nissayam no karoti tìi Attbasamüpattindye? 
và ditthinissayam và na karoti na janeti па sahjaneti na 
nibbatteti nàbhinibbatieti? ti, Bàne! pi so nissayam по 
karoti. 

Sa re viyattesu na vaggasári ti. Sa ve vavatthitesu * 
bhinnesu dvejjhápannesu dvelhakajátesu nanaditthikesu 
nánàkhantikesu? nànarueikesu nanaladdhikesu nànàáditthi- 
nissayanissitesu, chandagatim  gacchantesu, doságatim 
gaechantesu, mohàágatim gaechantesu, bhayàgatim gac- 
chantesu, na ehandagutim gacchati, na doságatim gac- 
chati, na mobhagatim gaechati, na bhayügatim gaechati, 
na ràgavasena gacchati, na dosavasena gacchati, na 
mobhavasena gacchati, па mánavasena gacchati, na ditthi- 
vasena gaeehati, na uddhaceavasena gaechati, na vici- 
kiechàvasena gacehati, na anusayavasena gaccehati, na 
vaggehni dhammehi yàyati niyyàyati? vuyhau? samhari- 
yati? ti, sa ve viyattesu na vaggasárt. 

Dilthii pi so na pacceti kisci ti. Tassa dvasatthi ditthi- 
gatāni pahinani samucehinnáni vüpasantáni patipassad- 
dhani abhabbuppattikani hünagginà daddhàni. So kinei 
ditthigatam ла pacecti na paceagacchati ti, ditthim pi во na 
paeeeti kinei. Ten’ аһа Bhagavà : 

Attam palàya anupadiyano 

hàne! pi so nissayam no karoti, 

sa ve vlyattesu na vaggasüri, 

ditthim pi so na paeceti kiñci ti. 
5 ninena. = 8 danena. 
D" na abhi; Š anabhi?. 
D? viyattesu. 
5 ninimabtakesu. б p? niyyati. 
T D" ad. sumadiyyati. 
S samliarati here and below. 


S.N. 801] Paramatthakasuttauildeso. 109 


Yassübhayante panidhidha n' atthi 
bhavábhavaya idha và huram va, 
nivesanáü tassa па santi keci 
dhammesu niccheyya samuggahitum. 6. 


Yassübhayante pauidhtdha w atthi bharãbharãya idha rä 
huran vā ti. Yassq ti arahato khinásavassa. inta! ti 
phasso eko anto,'phassasamudayo dutiyo anto; atitam еко 
anto, anāgatam dutiyo anto; sukha vedana eko anto, 
dukkhà vedanà dutiyo anto: пашаш eko anto, rüpam 
dutiyo anto: cha ajjhattikaàni ayatanāni eko anto, cha 
bàhiràni àyatanáni dutiyo anto; sakkāyo еко anto, sakka- 
yasumudayo dutivo anto. Panidhi vuecati tauhá; yo 
табо sáràgo . .. pe . . . abhijhà lobho akusalamülain. 
Bharabhavaga ti bhavabhavaya, kammabhaváaya, punab- 
bhavàya, kāmabhavāya kammabhavāya, kámabhavaya 
punabbhavaya, rüpabhavàya kammabhavaya, rüpabhavaya 
punabbhaváàya, агпрарћахауа  kammabhaváya. | arüpa- 
bhavāya punabbhav&ya, ?punappunam bhaváya,? punappu- 
nam gatiyà punappunam upapattiyi, punappunam pati 
sandhiyáà, punappunam attabhavàbhinibbattiyà. dha ti 
sakattabhaüvo, Aura ti parattabhávo; idha ti sakarüpa- 
vedanasannásamkhàravinnanam, hur& ti pararüpavedanà- 
sannàsamkhàravinnàugm ; idha ti cha ajjhattikani àyata- 
nani, hura ti cha bāhirāni àyatanáni; idhà ti manussaloko, 
hura ti devaloke ; idhà ti kamadhátu, hura ti rüpadhatu 
arupadhatu 3; idhā ti kamadhatu rüpadhàtu, hurà ti 
arüpadhàtu. 

Yassübhayante pauidhidha w atthi blucábhacaga ida ca 
kuram cà ti yassa ubho ante, bhavābhavāşya $, idha và 
huram? và panidhi? n’ айі? na ?samvijati, n' upa- 
labbhati?, pahina samueehinná vüpasantà patipassad- 


1 B" Š anto. 
2-2 Dv pnunappunabhavaya; 5 punappunábhaváya, pu- 
nappunagatiyà and so on. 
š В? Si от. + BP S ad. са. 5 D? «d. ea. 
° D? S ad. tanhà. ? D? S ad. na santi. 
8-8 B? samvijjanti n’ upalabbhauti. 


110 Althakavaggo. (S.N. 801 


ара? abhabbuppattika Bànagginà daddhà ti, yassübhayante 
panidhidha n’ atthi bhavabhavàya idha và huram và. 

ANiresana tassa na santi keci à. —  Nivesana ti dve nivesaná, 
tauhanivesaná са ditthinivesanà са... pe... ayam 
tanhanivesanà . . . pe.. . ayam ditthinivesana. — T'assá 
ti: arahato khinàsavassa. Nivesaná tassa 2 па santi ti? 
na santi na samvijjanti п’ upalabbhanti, pahinà samuc- 
chinnà vüpasantà patipassaddhà abhabbuppattika nanag- 
gina daddha ti, nivesanà tassa na santi keci. 

Dihammesu  niecheyya samuggahitan. ti. Dhammesü ti 
dvàsatthiya? ditthigatesu. Niecheyyā ti niechinitvà vinic- 
chinitvà vicinitva 4 pavicinitva 5 tulayitva tirayitva vibhà- 
vayitvà vibhütam Кафуа. Odhiggàho vilaggàho varaggàho 
kotthásaggaho uceayaggábo samuccayaggàho: idam saceam 
taecham íatham bhütam yāthāvam aviparitan ti капыш 
paràmattham abhinivittham ajjhositam adhimuttam n’ 
atthiê па samnvijati n’ upalabbhati, pahinam  samuc- 
chinnüm vüpasantam patipassaddham abhabbuppattikam 
Bànagginà daddhan ti, dhamunesu niecheyya samuggahi- 
tam. Ten'àha Bhagavá: 


Yassübhayante panidhidha n’ atthi 
bhavaàbhavaya idha và huram va, 
nivesanā tassa na santi keci 
dhammesu nieeheyya samuggahitan ti. 


Tassidha ditthe và sute mute và 
pakappità ш atthi апа pi sanna: 
tam brahmanam ditthim anadivanar 


- 


kenidha lokasmim vikappayevya? T 
T'assulha ditthe va sute mute và pakappità w «atti айй 
pi samna ti. Tassā ti arahato khinàsavassa tassi ".— Dilthe 
1 $ patipassanná. 
?-? D" S па santi keci ti nive-anà tassa na santi keci 
бан. 
3 p" S dvàsatthi. 1 S od. pativieinitvà. 
° Б parivicinitvi. 5 Br 8 ad. na santi. 
7 бі от.; S tassa tassa. 


S.N. 502] Paramatthakasuttaniddeso. 111 


và ditthavisuddhiyá! vā sute và sutavisuddhivà? và mute 
rü mutavisuddhiya vā sannapubbangamatà  sannadhi- 
pateyyatà;? sannáviggahena sannaya utthapita * kappità ê 
abhisamkhatà sapthapità ditthi n’ atthi па "samvijjati 
n’ upalabbhati? раһта ? samueehinnà vüpasanta pati- 
passaddhá abhabbuppattika nanagginà daddhà ti, tassidha 
ditthe va sute mute và pakappità n’ atthi апп pi sañna. 

Tam brahmanam ditthim anáddiyanan ti. Dráhimano ti 
sattannam dhammanam Бараба bràáhmano? . . . pe. 
anissito ? tadi !?pavueeate brahma9, Tum рына 
ditthim anādiyāänan ti tam bráhmanam апп anadi- 
yantam aganhantam &paramasantam abhinivisantan ! ti, 
tam bráhmanam ditthim anadiyanam. 

Kenidha loka asmü vikappayeyyā tì. Карра ti dve 
kappa, tanhákappo ca ditthikappo са . . . pe.. . ауаш 
tanhakappo . .. ре... ayam ditthikappo. Tassa tanhá- 
kappo pahino, ditthikappo patinissattho ; tanhakappassa 
pahinattà, ditthikappassa patinissatthattà, kena rāgena 
kappeyya? kena dosena Барреууа? kena mohena kap- 
peyya? kena mánena kappeyya ? kaya ditthiya kappeyya ? 
kena uddhaecena kappeyya? kaya vieikiecháya kappeyya ? 
kehi anusayehi kappeyya ratto ti và duttho ti và mülho 
ti ха, vinibandho ti và parámattho ti và, vikkhepagato 
ti và, anitthangato!? ti và thàmagato ti và? Te abhi- 
samkhàra pahina, abhisamkharànam pahinattà, gaíiya!? 
kena kappeyya nerayiko ti và tiracchānayoniko ti và 


1 B” ditthasuddhiyà ; S ditthisuddhiyá. 
2 B? S sutasuddhiya, . . . mutasuddhisà and so on. 
3 Dr Si ош. ѕвайпа; S santánipateyyatà; В" vikappa- 
yeyyata. 
4 $i uddhapita. ° B" 8 prefix samutthapità. 
$ B? S ad. na santi. 
7-7 B" 8 samvijjanti n’ upalabbhanti. 
8 B? 5 ad. sakküyaditthi bàhità hoti. 
° BD" S азо. 
10-10 S pavuceato sa brahma. H S abhinivesantan. 
1? В» S anitthágato. 13 Ni gatiyo. 


112 -Althakavaggo. (S.N. 803 


l pittivisayiko ti và!, manusso ti và devo ti và, торт ti và 
arüpi ti và, santi ti và, asanni ti và, nevasalitiinasantii ti va? 
So hetu n’ atthi, paceayo n’ atthi, kàranam п” atthi; yena 
kappeyya vikappeyya vikappam арајјеууа. Lokasmin ti 
apáyaloke ° manussaloke devaloke khandhaloke dhatuloke 2 
áyatanaloke ti, kenidha lokasmiüm vikappayeyya? Теп’ 
ара Bhagavā : 


Tassidha ditthe va sute mute và 
pakappità n’ atthi anu рі sana; 
tam bràhmanam ditthim anādiyānam 
kemdha lokasmim vikappayeyyà? ti. 


Na kappayanti, na purekkharonti, 
dhammà pi tesam na paticechitàse?; 
па brahmano silavatena neyyo, 
ратгаћсаёо na paeceti tādi. 8. 


Na kappayanti na purekkharontt ti. Карра ti dve kappa, 
tanhákappo са ditthikappo са . . . pe.. . ayam tanhà- 
kappo . . . pe... ayam ditthikappo. 

Katamo tanhalappo?  Yàvatà tanhasamkhatena sima- 
katam mariyádikatam * odhikatam parlyantikatam ° parig- 
gahitam mamayitam : idam mamam, etam mamam, etta- 
kam mamam, ettàvatà mamam, mama тора saddà gandhà 
rasa photthabbà; attharanaà püpuraná; dasidása ajelakà 
kakkutasukarà —hatthigavássavalavà — khettam — vatthu ? 
hiraàüam suvannam gàmanigamaràjadhaniyo ratthaü ca 
janapado ea koso ea kotthagaran са; kevalam pi maha- 
pathavim ? tanhàvasena mamāyati, yàvatà? atthasata- 
tanhaviearitam 2. Ayam tanhakappo. 

Katamo «ditthikappo ? — Visativatthuka sakkāyaditthi, 


1-1 Ki om. (S petti^). 2-2 D" pe. 
3 Fausholl pan’ icchitàse. 4 Som. 
5 5 pariyanta?. 9 D" vatthum, as always. 
7 


В" ad. ший viearitam ayam; 5 ad. tanhaviearitam 
satam ayam. 
8 М от. ° Bi ?viparitam. 


S.N. 803] Paramatthakasuttaniddeso. 113 


dasavatthuka —míechaditthi, dasavatthuka antaggāhikā 
ditthi; уй evarüpa ditthi ditthigatam ditthigabanam 
ditthikantàram  ditthivisükayikam !  ditthivipphandit;iun 
ditthisamyojanam  gàho  patiggiho? abhiniveso parā- 
máso kummaggo micchàápatho miechattam titthàyatanum 
vipariyesag&áho viparittagaho? vippallāsagāho mieehügaüho 
ayüthávakasmim yàthàvakan ti gàho, уйуайй dvásatthi 
ditthigatàni. Ayam ditthikappo. 

Tesam tanhákappo pahino, ditthikappo patinissattho ; 
tanh&kappassa pahinatta, ditthikappassa patinissatthatta, 
tanhákappam và ditthikappam và na kappenti na janenti 
па safjanenti na mnibbattenti nàbhinibbattenti ti, na 
kappayanü. 

Na purekkharonti ti. Purekkhārā ti dve purekkhàrà, 
tanhápurekkhàro са ditthipurekkhàro ca... ре... 
ayam i&nhapurekkharo . .. ре... ayam oT Porte 
khàro. Tesam tanhàpurekkhàro pahino, ditthipurekkháro 
patinissattho; tanhapurekkhàrassa pahinattà, ditthipurek- 
Бһагавѕа patinissatthattà, na tanham và, na ditthim và 
purato katvà caranti; na tanhadhajà, na tanhàáketü, na 
tanhadhipateyyà, na ditthidhajà, na ditthiketü, na dittha- 
dhipateyyà, na tanhàya và, па ditthiyà và parivàrità * 
earanti ti, na kappayanti na purekkharonti. 

һатта pi tesan па paticchitàse ti. һатта vuecanti 
dvàsatthi ditthigatàni. Tesan ti tesam  arahantànam 
khinàsavanam. Patiechitāse ti sassato loko, idam eva 
saccam, mogham aññan ti na  patiechitàse; asassato 
loko ... pe... п’ eva hoti na па hoti tathágato 
parammaranà, idam eva saceam, mogham aünan ti na 
patiechitàse ti, dhamma pi tesam na paticchitüse. 

Na brühlmano silavatena neyyo ti. Ха ti patikkhepo. 
Brāhmano ti sattannam dhammanam Бараа brāhmāno ° 


S “аш. Cf. M. 1. 485. 2 В” patitthàto. 
Si viparitta? (— viparita) always; В” S viparita?. 
B" 8 parivaretva. 

B? S om. pe, aud have the avyükatas in full. 

° DB" S ad. sakkayaditthi bahita hoti. 


тж © ы 


114 Atthakavaggo. [3.N. 803 


... pe... anissito! tādi ?pavuecate brahma? Na 
bràhmano silaratena пеџуо ti bràhmano silena và vattena 
và silavattena và З па yüyati? na niyyàti na vuyhati па 
samhariyati* ti, na bráhmano silavatena neyyo. 

DParangato па pacceti tad ti. Рагазь vuecati amatam 
nibbànam; yo so sabbasamkhárasamatho sabbüpadhipati- 
nissaggo fanhakkhayo virágo nirodho nibbànam. Yo 
páragato?  párappatto? antagato antappatto? Lotigato 
koiippatto9 7. . . pe9 . . . п’ atthi tassa punabbhavo ti, 
pürangato. Ха peccet? ti sotàpattimaggena ye ева 
pahina, te lilese ?na рипа paeceti? na paccágaechati; 
sakadàgimimaggena 10 ув lilesà раһтпа !%, te kilese ?na 
puna paceeeti? na paecügaechati; anàgamimaggena !©уе 
kilesa pahīnā?°, te kilese ?na рипа pacceti? na paecá- 
gaechati; arahattamaggena 19 ye kilesà pahina 10, te kilese 
?na puna paeceti? na paecagaechati ti, püraügato na 
paceeti. 

Та ti. Arah& pañeah'akarehi tādi, ittbānitthe tādi, 
eattàvi ti tādi, tinnàvi ti tādi, muttāvī ti tādi, tamniddesà 
tādi. 

Katham ar&hà itthánitthe tadi? Arahā labhe pi tādi, 
alabhe pi tādi, yase pi tādi, ayase pi tādi, pasamsaya pi 
tādi, nindaya pi tādi, sukhe pi tādi, dukkhe pi tadi; 
lekaü ce!! bāham gandhena limpeyyum !°, Pekaù ce! 
baham vasiya taccheyyum, amusmun n’ atthi rāgo, 
amusmim п’ atthi patigham ; anunayapatighavippahino 
ugghatimggbatim vitivatto anurodhavirodhasamatikkanto. 
Evam araha itthánitthe tādi. 

Каат araha саат ti tadi?  Arahato гасо catto 


1 Dr Š asito as abore. 
2-2 D" pavueeate sa brahmà ; S pavuceato ti sabbrahmà. 


3-3 S dànapadàyati. 4 8 sümharati as above. 
5 D" párangato. 9 В” ?patto. 
7 p» Sad. vitthàro jàátimaranasamsaro. 
8 Son. 9-9 B? па puneti na paeceti. 


10719 pr ye kilese а рапа. 
пп S ekaece. 1? S limpeyya. 


S.N. 508] Paramatthakasuttanidldeso. 115 


vanto muito pahino patinissattho; doso moho kodho 
upanaho makkho paliso issi macehariyam maya sāthey- 
yam thambho sàrambho mano atimāno mado pamado, 
sabbe kilesa, sabbe ducearita, sabbe daratha, sabbe pari- 
laha, sabbe santapa, sabbakusalabhisamkhara саба vanta 
тиа pahinà patinissatthi !. Evam arahā cattüvi^ ti 
tadi. 

Каат агаһа tinuavi ti iàdi? Araha 3kāmoghanı 
tinno, bhavogham tinno”, ditthogham tinno, avijjoghanm 
tinno, sabbasamkharapatipatham tinno uttinno nittinno 
atikkanto samatikkanto vitivatto ; so vutthaváso сіппаса- 
rano... ре... п’ абі tassa punabbhavo ti. Evam 
araba (innàavi? ti tadi, 

Каап агара muttavri' ti tādi? — Arahato raga cittam 
muttam vimuttun suvimuttam, dosa cittam muttam vi- 
muttam suvimuttam, шоһа eittun muttam vnnuttan 
suvimuttani kodháà upanühà makkha palasa 15884 ё mac- 
chariyà mayá satheyya ата sárambhà mana atimànà 
mada pamada sabbakilesehi sabbaduecaritehi sabbadara- 
thehi sabbaparilàhehi sabbasantapehi sabbákusalabhisam- 
kharehi eittam muttam vimuttun suvimuttam. Evam 
arahà muttavi? ti tādi. 

Katham агаһа tamniddesáà tādi? — Araha, sile sati, silava 
ti tamniddesà tādi; saddhüya sati, saddho ti tamniddesa 
tadi; viriye sati, viriyavà ti tamniddesá tādi; satiyà sati, 
satimà ti tamniddesà tadi; samadhismim ? sati, samahito 
ü tamniddesà tadi; paünüya sati, раййауа ti tamniddesa 
tādi: vijáya sati, tevijjo ti tamniddesá tadi; abhinnáya 
sati, chalabhihno ti tamniddesà tādi. Evam агаһа tam- 


1 $i ?passaddha. ? S cattàvidità. 
3 з S liamoghatinno bhavoghatinno and so o; В" ахо: 
ghatinno. 
+ В” 5 sabbasamsarapatham. 
В» 8 «d. jatimarauasamsàre and on. pe. 
S tinnaāviditā. 
S muttavidità here and below. 
В» S issàya. ? Bb» S samadhimhi. 


5 


6 


~] 


oo 


116 Atthakaragqo. [S.N. 803 


niddesà (айт ti, párangato na pacceti tādi. Ten’ аһа 
Bhagavà : 

Na kappayanti na purekkharonti, 

dhamma pl tesam na patiechitàse; 


na bràhmano silavatena neyyo, 
pàrangato na paeceti tadi ti. 


1 Рлқслмо? PARAMATTHAKASUTTANIDDESO NITTHITO!. 


11 В” Paramatthakasuttaniddesi райсашї; 5 ^niddeso 


paneamo. 
E S о. 


!' CHATTHO JARASUTTANIDDESO !. 


Appam vata jivitam idam, 

oram vassasatà pi miyyati, 

yo ce рі atieea jivati 

&tha kho so јагава? pi miyyati. 1. 


Appui vata Ленат idan ti. Jicitan ti ayu thiü 
yapanà уарапа ігіуапа vattanà pàlana jivitam jivitindri- 
уаш. Арі са dvihi kàranehi appakam jJivitam, thokanı ? 
jivitam, thitiparittataya * vā appakam ]Jivitam, ѕагаѕара- 
rittatàya vā appakam jivitam. 

hatham thitiparittataya và appakam jivitam? — Atite 
eittakkhane jivittha, na jivati, na jivissati; anügate 
eittakkhane jivissati na jivati, na jivittha ; paccuppanne 
cittakkhane jivati, na jivittha, na jivissati. 


*Jivitam attabhávo са sukhadukkhà са kevalà 
ekacittasamàayuttà, lahuso vattati-kkhano 8. 
Cullisitisahassani? kappa titthanti ye marū, 
na tv eva te pi jivanti dvihi eittehi samàhita.? 


* Verses not. traced; quotl above, Ch. IH. p. 42, and 

in Пахн тада, Ch. VIII. 
1-1 B” jarüsutti anukkati; S rájasuttaniddeso anukkati. 

2 S jarata sàva ; below p. 120 n. 10, p. 121 n. 6 Jarasava, 

3 B? thokakam. 

4 Si ?parittattàya, (throughout. (a contaminated Jorm, 
parittattà- parittatvà ?). 

5 B" S vattati khano. 

6 Si eulasiti?. 7 B? S samohità. 


118 Atthakaraggo. [S.N. 804 


Ye niruddhā marantassa titthamānassa vā idha, 
sabb' eva sadisa khandhā gatā appatisandhika 1. 
Апал ата са ye bhaügà?, ye са Шапса ? ападаба, 
tadantare niruddhànam vesaunmam ® m atthi lakkhane. 
Anibbattena na Jàto, paecuppannena Jivati, 
eittabhangamnato loko, panhatti paramatthiyà. 
Хайй ninnà pavattanti chandena ратата * 
acehinnavárá? vattanti salàyatanapaecayà. 
Anidhanagat&? алса, punjo п’ atthi anágate, 
паа yeva Парі àragge sasapüpama. 
Nibbattànaü ea dhammanam bhaüngo nesam purek- 
khato. 

palokadhammà ? titthanti poranehi? amissità. 
Adassanato àyanti bhangà gaechanti dassanam, 
vijjuppádo va акаѕе uppajjanti vayanti? са ti. 

Evam thitiparittataya appakam уат. 

Каап sarasaparitiataya appakam jivitam 2  Assásupa- 
nibaddham jivitam, passisupanibaddham jīvitam, аѕва- 
sappassisupanibaddham jivitam, mahabhütupanibaddhum ? 
jivitam, " usmüpanibaddhaim jivitam 11, kavalimkàrábàru- 
panibaddham 12  jivitam,  viüüanupanibaddham jivita, , 
mulam pi imesam dubbalam, pubbahetü pi imesam dub- 
balà. ye pi'? paeeaya te рі dubbalà, ye pi pabhavikü t- pi 
dubbali, sahabhu?* pi imesam dubbalà, sampayogá!? pi 
imesam dubbalà, sahaja рі imesam dubbalà, уа pi payojikà 
ва pi dubbalà. Aññamaññam 18 nieendubbala iine," añña- 


! В” Б apatisandhiya. ? В" S асра. 
* B" 8 vesamam. а Dv parinàmikà. 
° В" aeechinnadhàrà (better); S aechintanará. 


9 B" S anitthàna*. 7 5 lokadhammaánti. 
8 B" S puranehi. 
9 В" Si vyanti; S nivattati. ; ef. p. 48, n. 5. 


19 p" üpanibandham. H-M В’ Soy, 
1? В” kabalikarà? ; Š kabalinbkàrahàrupanibandhananm. 
P p'ea; Sei. + В” 5 saliabhiümi. 


15 D" sampayogo . . . dubbalo; Š om. sampayogi ... 
w а. 
16 10 р" ime nieeadabbalà. 


S.N. 801] Jardsuttaniddeso. 119 


maññam anvatthità! ime, аййашаййаш paripátayanti ime, 
aññamaññassa hi w atthi tüyità?, па са pi thapenti 
snnamaün' ime, yo pi nibbattako so na vijjati, na са 
kenaei koci háyati, bhaügabyá? са ime hi sabbaso, puri- 
mehi pabhàvità ime, ye рі pabhavita? te puro mata, purimà 
pi са расса pi ca aññamaññam na kadáci addasun ti. 
Evam sarasaparittatàya appakam jivitam. 

Api са eàtummahàràjikànam devàánam jivitam upadaya 
manussinam  appakam  jivitam, parittakum °  fvitam, 
thokam? jivitam, khanikam jivitam, lahukam  jivitam, 
ittaram £ jivitam, anaddhaniyam jīvitam, па ciratthitikam 
jvitam távatimsánam  devànam?, yāmānam devànam, 
tusitānam devànam, nimmaànaratinum devànaim, para- 
nimmitavasavattnam devánam, brahmakayikànam devä- 
nam jivitam upádaya manussünam  appakam  jivitam, 
parittakam jivitam, thokam jivitam, khanikam jivitam, 
lahukam jivitam, ittaram jivitam, anaddhaniyam jivitam, 
па ciratthitikam jivitam. 

Vuttain h' etam Bhagavatà: *appam idam bhikkhave 
manussinam йуп, gamaniyo samparàyo, mantaya phot- 
thabbam, kattabbam kusalam, caritabbam brahmacariyam, 
n'aithi јабаѕѕа amaranam. Yo bhikkhave ciram jtvati, so 
vassasatam appam và bhiyyo. 

Appam йуп manussánam, hileyya!? nam suporiso, 
cureyy' adittasiso va, п’ atthi maccussa n’ àágamo. 

t Accayanti ahorattà, jivitam uparujjhati, 

ayum? khiyati!? maccánain, kunnadinam va üdakanP? 


ti. 
* 5.1, 108 with variants. T S. i, 109. 
! B? apavattità. 2 5 павіуа. 
? B? gantabbà; S gantabyà. * D? pabhāvikā. 


5 B? addasamsu; 5 addasu. 

9 B" S parittam, kere and below. 

? В" thokakam, throughout; S. thollam. 

8 S ittharam kere and below. 9 B» S «ad. pe. 
10 Codd. 1°. п В» 9 ayu (cp. Thag. 145). 
12 D^ khiyyati. 13 В” S odakam. 


190 Afthakavaggo. [S.N. 804 


ÁAppam vata jwitam idum oram vassasatà pi miyyati H. 
Kalalakále pi cavati marati antaradhayati vippalujjaü. 
Abbudakále! pi cavati marati antaradhàyati vippalujjati. 
Pesikale pi cavati marati antaradhayati vippalujjati. 
Ghanakále pi cavati marati antaradhayati vippalujjati. 
3 Pasakhakale 2 pi cavati marati antaradbàyati vippaluj- 
jati’. Jàatimatto* pi cavati marati antaradhayati vip- 
palujjati. Pasūtighare pi cavati marati antaradhāyati 
vippalujjati. Addhamasiko pi cavati marati antaradhayati 
vippalujjati. Másiko pi cavati marati antaradhāyati vip- 
palujjati. Dvimāsikoĉ pi timásiko? pi catumāsiko pi 
paüncamásiko pi cavati marati antaradhayati vippalujjati. 
Chamásiko pi sattamaàsiko pi atthamásiko pi navamasiko 
pi dasamàsiko pi samvaechariko pi cavati marati antara- 
dhayati vippalujjat.  Dvivassiko pi tivassiko pi catu- 
vassiko pi paücavassiko pi ehavassiko pi sattavassiko pi 
atthavassiko pi navavassiko pi dasavassiko pi visativassiko 
pi timsavassiko pi cattálisavassiko? pi paññasavassiko pi 
satthivassiko pi sattativassiko pi asitivassiko pi navuti- 
vassiko pi cavati marati antaradhayati vippalujjati ti, oram 
vassasata рі miyyati. 

Yo ce pi aticca йай ti. Yo vassasatam atikkamitva 
jivati, so ekam và vassam jivati, dve và vassàni jivati, tini 
vā vassani Jivati, cattari và vassáni Jivati, panca và vass&ni 
jivati?, дава và vassani jivati, visati và vassànl Jivati, 
timeam và vassáni jivati, eattálisam và vassani }їуай ti, yo 
ce pi atieca jivati. 

Atha kho so jarasá!? pi miyyati ti. Yadà jinno hoti 
vuddho? mahallako addhagato vayo anuppatto khanda- 


1 Si ambuda?. 2 Si paücasakha". 373 8 om. 
1 B» 8 jàtamatto. 5 B" sutiyaghare; S sutiyamatte. 
9 S has dvemasiko, temàsito, catumásato, рапса? . .. 
ваќатавікаќо, attha?, nava’, дава. 
7 D? temásiko. 
5 B? S cattarisa?, here and L 4 from below. 
9 B° 8 ad. pe. 1? $ jarásàáva. 
п p? vuddho. 


S.N. 805] Jarásuttaniddeso. 121 


danto palitakeso vilünam khalitasiro1 vallinam tlakáha- 
tagatto vaüko bhaggo dandaparàyano, so jar&áya рі cavati 
marati antaradhàyati vippalujjati. 


*N' atthi maranamhà mokkho. 

tTPhalànam iva раккапат pato patanato bhayam, 
evam jàtànam? maccánain niecam maranato bhayam. 
Yathā pi kumbhakàrassa kata mattikabhàjana 
sabbe bhedanapariyantà?, evam maccàna jivitam. 
Daharà са mahantà ca уе bālā ye са paudità, 
sabbe maecuvasam yanti, sabbe тассирагауапа 
Tesam maecuparetànam gacchatam paralolato 
na pita tàyate puttam пай và pana nàtake. 
Pekkhatan üeva* ñatimam passa lálappatam? puthü ; 
ekameko 'va maccánam go vajjho viya niyyati. 
Evam abbhàáhato loko maceuna са jaràya cà ti; 


atha kho во јагаѕаё pi miyyati. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà: 


Аррат vata jivitain idam, 

oram vassasata pi miyyati, 

уо се рі aticea Jivati 

atha kho во jarasá? рі miyyati ti. 


Soennti janà mamayite, 

па hi santi niecà pariggahà; 
vinüàbhàvasantam? еу’ idam 

iti disvà nàgáram vase. 2. 


Socanti Jana mamàyite ti. Jana ti khattiyà са brahmana 
ca vessá са suddà са gahatthà ca pabbajità ca ?devà саз 


* Perse untraced. 

f Sn. 576-81 with variants ; су. D. n, 120. 

1 Si and apparently B" vilüunam kh? ; S viluna Кр, 

? B" 8 јаіапа. 5 Si Š bhedapar?. 

4 5 fievan. 5 5 làlabbatam. $ S jarásáva. 

т B" vinábhàvam santam ; S vinabhavasantim and below 
vinàbhávam santam. 8-5 б om. 


[29 Aíithakavagnqo. [S.N. 805 
manussà ea. Машайа ti dve mamatta, tanhàmamattan 
ea ditthimamattan са . . . pe.. . idam tanhüàmamattam 

pe... idam ditthimamattam. Mamayitavatthu- 
acchedasamkino! pi socanti, acchijjante pi socanti, acchinne 
pi socanii; mamàyitavatthuviparinàmasamkino ? pi so- 
canti, viparinàmante pi soeanti, viparinate pi socanti kila- 
manti paridevanti, urattālim kandanti, sammoham àpajjanti 
ti, socanti Jana mamaàyite. 

Na hi santi niccà pariggahü ti. Pariggahā ti dve parig- 
саћа, tanhápariggaho са ditthipariggaho ca . . . ре... 
ayam tanhápariggaho . . . ре... ayam dubiae du bos 
Tanhápariggaho апіссо samkhato —patiecasamuppanno 
khayadhammo  vayadhammo —virügadhammo —nirodha- 
dhammo viparinamadhammo.  Ditthipariggaho 3 апіссо 
samkhato patiecasamuppanno khayadhammo vayadhammo 
virágadhammo nirodhadhammo viparinàmadhammo. 

Vuttiam h’ etam Dbagavatà:  *Passatha no tumhe 
bhikkhave tam pariggaham yváyam pariggaho nieco dhuvo 
sassato aviparinàmadhammo sassatisaamam 3 tath’ eva 
thassati ti?—No b’ etam bhante.—Sadhu bhikkhave, aham 
pi kho etam bhikkhave pariggaham na samanupassámi 
yvüyam pariegaho nieco dhuvo sassato aviparinàmadhammo 
sassatisamam tath’ eva thassati ti pariggahà пісса dhuvà 
sassatà aviparinàmadhamma п’ atthi na santi na sam- 
vijjanti n’ upalabbhanti ti, na hi santi niecá ралосаћа. 

Vinabhüvasantam ° ev idan ti.  Nànabhàve vinabhàre 
annathàábhàve sante samvijjamaàne? upalabhiyamáàne. 

Vuttam h' etam Bhagavatà: * Alam Ananda mā soci, 
та paridevi. Мапа etam Ananda mayá patikace' eva 


* М. і, 137. T D. ii, 144. 


1 py 5 mamayitanı vatthum aecheda?. 

? pr S шашауаш vatthum viparinama^. 

з Dr S ad. pi. 

5 See Sam. iii, 143; Mil. 423. 5 See above, p. 121, n T. 
© Br» S «d, atthi. 


S.N. 806] Jarüsuttuuiddeso. 123 


akkhütam: sabbeh' eva piyehi manápehi nānābhāvo viņā- 
bhàávo аййаіарһахо? Тат Ка ettha Ananda labbha 
yan tam јаќат bhütam samkhatun palokadhmnumam, tam 
vata ma palujji ti? № etam thanam vijjti. *Purimánam 
purimánam khandhánam dhátünam ayatananam vipari- 
nàmaiiüathabhàv& pacchimā pacchimà khandha ea dhàtuyo 
ca iyatanàni ca pavattanti ti, vinübhávasantam ! еу 
idam. 

Iti disrā nāgāram йгазе ti. It? ti padasandhi padasam- 
saggo padapāripūri akkharasamavāyo Dyañjgjanasihtthata 
padanupubbata-m-etam 2 iti ti. Iti? Jisc& passitvà tula- 
уйуй tirayitvà vibhāvayitvā vibhūtam Каба mamattesn ti, 
itidisva.  Nàgárem dvase ti sabbam gharávüsapalibodham 
ehinditvà, puttadarapalibodhum | ehinditvà, natipalibodham 
ehinditvà, mittamaecapalibodhim chinditvà, sannidhipali- 
bodham chinditvà, kesamassum ohüretva, kāsāyāni vat- 
{апі acchādetvā, асагавша anagürtyam pabbajitva, аКїйса- 
nabhávam 4 upagantvà, еко careyya vihareyya iriyeyya 
vatteyya pàlevya yapeyya yàpeyyà ti, iti disvà nàgàram 
avase. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà : 

босап janà mamiyite, 

na hi santi niecà parigguhá ; 

vinàbhávasantam! еу’ idam 

iti disvà nāgāram àvase ti. 

Maranena pi tam pahiyati. 

yam puriso mama-y-idan? ti maünati, 
etam? pi viditvà pandito 

na mamattaya nametha màamako. 8. 

Marawena рі tam pahuan ti. Maranan ti уа tesam 
tesam sattànam tamhà tamhà sattanikáyà cuti cavanatà 7 


ж The rest or the quotation is not in D. ii, 144. 


See ubore, p. 121, 4. 7. 7 B" 5 padànupubbam etam, 


1 
3 Bv iti ti. 3 Sic Codd. 5 B? mam’ idan. 
6 


B" etam disvana: below etam іва, 
B» ad. khandhánam. 


194 Atlhakavaggo. [S.N. 806 


bhedo  antaradhànam maccu  maranam — külakiriyà!, 
khandhánam bhedo, kalevarassa nikkhepo, jivitindriyass' 
upacchedo. Tun ti rüpagatam vedanágatam saiinágatam 
samkharagatam vinnanagatam. Pahīyatī ti pahiyati jahi- 
yati? vijahiyati antaradhàyati vippalujjati. Bbhásitam pi 
h' etam : 
*Pubb' eva maccam vijahanti bhogā, 
maeco va? ne pubbataram jaháti, 
asassatà bhogino kamakámi, 
tasmà na socam' aham sokakàle. 
Udeti àpürati veti cando, 
аат gametvana paleti suriyo, 
vidità*^ maya sattakalokadhamma?, 
tasma па socàm' aham sokakàle ti, 


maranena pi tam pahiyati 6. 

lam puriso mama-y-idan. ti maññatt tà. Yan ti rüpa- 
gatam vedanàgatam saññagatam samkhàragatam viňňā- 
nagatam. Puriso ti samkhà samañña pannatt Іокауоһаго? 
пашаш nàmakammam nàmadheyyam nirutti byahjanam 
abhilàpo. Mama-y-idan’ ti maññati ti tanhàmaünanaya 
maññati, ditthimaññanaya шардай, manamaññanaya 
maññati, kilesamaiihanaya mannati, duccaritamannanaya 
таййай, payogamaünnanaya mannati, vipakamañnanaya 
тайпайї ti, yam puriso mama-y-idan ti maññati. 

Etam pi чайга pandito ti. FEtau, àdinavam ñatva 
jànitvà tulayitvà tirayitva vibhávayitvà vibhütam katvā 
mamattesu ti, etam pi viditvà. Pandito” ti? buddhima 
папі vibhàvi medhávi ti, etam рі viditvà pandito. 

Na mamattāya nametha. māmako ti. Mamattà ti dve 


* Jat. ili, 154 with variants. 


1 В» kalankiriyà. ? S om. 

3 В” ea. + Б vicito. 

5 Br sattuka?; S satthuka^. $ B" pahiyyati. 

T pr S om. S шаша idam. 

о B» S ad. dhiro pandito paññāvā. 1 pv бот. 


o 


S.N. 806] Jarasuttaniddeso. 125 


mamaíta, tanhamamattañ ca  ditthimamattan са... 
pe.-..idam tanhamamattam ... ре... idam ditthi- 
mamaítam.  Mànmako ti buddhamàmako dhammamámako 
saüghamàümako; so Bhagavantam mamàyati, Bhagavā 
tam pugegalam parigganháti. 

Vuttam h’ etam Bhagavatà: * Ye te bhikkhave bhikkhu 
kuhà thaddhà lapā sañei unnalà asamāhitā, па me te 
bhikkhave bhikkhü māmakā, apagatà ca te! bhikkhü 
imasmà dhammavinaya, na са te imasmim dhammavinaye 
vuddhim virülhim vepullam āpajjanti. Ye ca kho te 
bhikkhave bhikkhü nikkuhà nillapà dhir& athaddhà ? susa- 

màhità, te kho me bhikkave bhikkhü amaka, anapagatà ? 
са te bhikkhü? imasmà dhammavinuya, te са imasmim 
dhammavinaye vuddhim virülhim vepullam àpajjanti. 


Kuhà thaddhà* lapā sangi? unnalà asamahita, 
па te dhamme virühanti sammàsambuddhadesite. 
Nikkuhàá? пШара dhirà athaddhà? susamahita, 
to ve dhamme virühanti sammásambuddhadesite. 


Na mamattaya nametha. màmako ti mamako? tanhama- 
таат раһауа, ditthimamattam  patinissajjitva, mamat- 
taya na nameyya, na onameyya, na tamninno assa, na 
iappono, na tappabbhàro, na tadadhimutto, na tadádhi- 
pateyyo ti, na mamattiya nametha mamako. Ten' аһа 
Bhagavà : 


Maranena pi tam pahiyati, 

yam puriso mama-y-idan ti maññati, 
etam? pi viditvà pandito 

na mamattàya nametha màmako ti. 


5 A15 20: 


= 


B" S ad. bhikkhave. ` B^ abaddhà ; S àtabaddhaà. 


3 5 anupagatà. + B? baddhà ; S taddhà. 
5 Айа. has siñgi. ° В” dukkuha. 

т B? abaddhà; S араааһа. 8 Siad. ti. 
9 


B? etam disvà viditvana. 


126 Althakavaggo. (S.N. 807 


Supinena yathà pi sangatam 
patibuddho puriso па passati, 
evam pi! piyàyitam janam 

petam kàáàlakatam па passati. 4. 


Supinena yatlà pi sungatan ti sangatam samagatam samà- 
hitam sannipatitan ti, supinena yathà pi saügatam. 

Patibuddho puriso na passati ti. Yathà puriso supina- 
gato сапат passati, suriyam passati, mahásamuddam 
passati, sinerupabbatarijam ? passati, hatthim passati, 
assam passati, ratham passati, pattim? passati, вепй- 
byüham passati, irümaramaneyyakam passati, уапагаша- 
neyyakam passati, bhümirümaneyyakam passati, pokkha- 
raniràmaneyyakam passati, patibuddho na Кїйсї passati 
ti, patibuddho puriso na passati. 

Evam pi? piydjyitaue janan ti. 5 Evan ti* opammapati- 
sampáadana9. — Piyayitaus ? јанан ti” plyayitam? mamā- 
yitam janam mataram và pitaram và bhátaram và bhaginim 
và puttam và dhitaram và mittam ?và amaceam ° vā 
ñatisalohitam ° và ti, evam pi piyàyitam janam. 

Petam külakataii па passati ti. Рей vuceanti mata 
kālakatā. Na passati na dakkhati nàdhigaechati па vin- 
dati ng patilabhati ti, petam kàlakatam na passati. Ten’ 
аһа Bhagavà : 


Supinena yathà pi saügatam 
patibuddho puriso na passati, 
evam pl piyayitam janam 
petam kalakatam na passati ti. 


1 BU om. рі, here and below. 

? D" sinerum pabbataràjànam ; S  sinerupabbatarà- 
Janam. 

3 Bi patim. 4 Brom. 5 5 Siom.; S evam pi. 

5 В” ?sampàdanam ; Š °saampadanam. 
7 7 Bi on. 

8 pr Si om. 3-9 D? S vàmaccam. 

10 pr S байт và ва°. 


S.N. 808] Jarásuttaniddeso, 197 


Ditthà pi sutà pi te Jana 

yesam пашат idam pavuceati, 
пашат evávasissati 

akkheyyam petassa jantuno. 5. 

Ditthā рі sutà pi te jana ti. Рі а ti ye eakkhuvinnáná- 
bhisambhüta. Sutā ti ye sotavinninàbhisambhütà. Te 
Jana ti khattiyà ca brahmanà ca vess& en suddā! ea 
gahatthà са pabbajità? са deva са manussá са ti, ара pi 
gsuta pi te Jana. 

Yesam патат idam pacuceati ti. Yesan ti? khattiyanam 
bráhmanàpam vessanam suddánam gahatthanam pabba- 
jtànam  devinam  manussànam. —.NVümw«es ti samkhā 
samaniüà paünnatti lokavohàro* пашаш námakammam 
nàmadheyyam nirutti byañjanam abhilàpo. — Pacuccatt ti 
kathiyati? bhaniyati dipaynti? vohariyati tj, yesam пашат 
idam pavuccati. 

Хатат erávasissati akkheyyan ti. Rüpagatam vedaná- 
gatam sanhagatam samkhàragatam vinnanagatam pahiyati? 
jihiyati? vijahiyati 9 antaradhayati vippalujjati. пашаш 
evávasissati. Akkheyyan ti akkhatum kathetum bhanitum 
dipayitum voharitun ti, патат evávasissati akkheyyam. 

Petassa jantuno t.  Petassü ti matassa külakatassa!. 
Jantuno ti sattassa narassa mánavassa posassa puggalassa 
jivassa jagussa!? jantussa indagussa!? manujassá!* ti, 
akkheyyam petassa jantuno. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà : 

Ditthà pi sutà рі te jana 
yesun пашаш idam pavuceali, 
патат evàávasissati 
akkheyyam petassa jantuno ti. 


1 p" suddha, ozten. ? DB" pabbajjitā. 

3 Si от. + pr S voháro. 

5 B? ad. vuecati pavuccati; S ad. vuccati. 

в В” kathiyyati und so on. ? В» dipiyyati. 

š B" pahiyyati. ° В’ jehiyyati. 

10 p" S on. п prkalankatassa often. 
12 


Si játussa as usual; S jarassa. 
В” hindagussa; S hinárassa. 14 S manussà. 


128 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 809 


Sokaparidevamaccharam 

na jahanti giddhà mamayite, 
tasmà munayo pariggaham 

hitvà acarimsu! khemadassino. 6. 


Sokaparideramaccharam па jahanti ? giddhà mamáyite ti. 
око ti ñatibyasanena và phutthassa, bhogabyasanena và 
phuithassa, rogabyasanena và phutthassa, silabyasanena 
và phutthassa, ditthibyasanena và phutthassa, айпайа- 
rannatarena và.byasanena samannàgatassa, aññatarañña- 
tarena và? dukkhadhammena phutthassa?* soko восапа 
socitattam antosoko antoparisoko antodàho ° antoparidaho9 
cetaso parijjhàyanà domanassam sokasallam. 

* Paridevo ti hàtibyasanena và phutthassa . . . ре... 
ditthibyasanena và phutthassa, annataraünatarena và 
byasanena samannagatassa, aünatarannatarena và dukkha- 
dhammena phutthassa adevo paridevo àdevanà paridevanà 
adevitattam paridevitattam vaca раіаро vippalapo lalappo 
làlappayana lálappàyitattàm. 

tMacchariyan ti palea macchariyáni, avasamacchariyam 
kulamaechariyam làbhamaechariyam уаппатасеһагіуат 
dhammamaechariyam ; yam evarüpam macchariyam mac- 
charáyanà maccharàáyitattam m veviecham kadariyam katu- 
kancakatà" aggahitattam cittassa; idam vuccati mac- 
chariyam. Api са khandhamaechariyam pi macchariyam, 
dhàtumacehariyam pi macchariyam, àyatanamacchariyam 
рі macchariyam. Саһо vuceati macchariyam ; gedho vuc- 
cati tanhà; yo rágo sārāgo... pe... abhijjhā lobho 
akusalamülam. 

Mamattà ti dve mamatta, tanhümamattan ca ditthi- 


* See below, p. 184. T See p. 184. 


= 


B" àcarisu ; Si àcarimsu, but below a°; S acarimsu. 
В” pajahanti. 3 p" S on, 

8 ad. ti. 5 B" *daho. e Вр ?laho. 

B? katakanjukatà ; 5 ketukaniyatà [katukaneukatà 2]. 
See below, p. 184, n. 7. 


чм > Юю 


S.N. 809] Jarásutteniddeso. 199 


mamattaü ca... pe... idam tanhümumattam 
ре . .. idam ditthimamattam. 

Mamàyitavatthu-acehedasamkino 1 рі soeanti, aechij- 
jante pi socanti, aechinne pi socanli; mamuüyitavatthu- 
vipariuàmasamkino? pi socanti, viparinàmante рі socauti, 
viparinate pi socanti. Mamaàyiltavatthu-acchedasamkino 
рі paridevanti, aeehijjante рі paridevanti, aechinne pi 
paridevanti; mamayitavatthuviparinàmasumnkino pi pari- 
devanti, viparinàmante pi paridevanti, viparinate pi pari- 
devanti. Mamaàáyitavatthu rakkhanti gopenti pariggan- 
hanti, mamayitan ti maecharayanti. — Miinàyitasmim 
vatthusmim soeanti?, sokam »a Jjahanti, paridevam na 
jahanti, maeehariyun na jahanti gedham па jahanti, 
n&-ppajahanti, па vinodenti, na byantikaronti, na ana- 
bhávam gamenti ti, sokaparidevamaccharumn na jahanti* 
giddhà шатауібе. 

Таята munayo partggahaiss са acarinsu? dilema- 
dassino ti. Таѕта ti tasmá tamkarana ° tamhetu tap- 
рассауа tamnidānà” etum adinavam sampassamàno ma- 
mattesü ti, tasma,  Manayo ti. Monam vuecati ñanam, 
уа раййа pajanana ... pe... amoho dhammavieayo 
sammiáditthi; tena nànena ѕашаппасаіа munayo monz- 
patta?. "Tini moneyyàni, kayamoneyyam хасішопеууат 


шапотопеууат ... pe... sañgajalam айеса so muni. 
Pauriggahā ti dve pariggahá, tanhapariggaho ca ditthi- 
pariggaho ca . . . pe . . . ayam fanhapariggaho . 


pe... ayam ditthipariggaho. Munayo? tanhüparigga- 
ham paháya 10 ditthipariggahamn patinissajjitvà acarimsu 11 
viearimsu iriyimsu vattimsu pilimsu yapimsu yápimsu. 


1 See abore, p. 122, п. 1. 2 Sre above, p. 192, п. 2. 
3 BP S on. 1 В” pajahanti. 

5 В? acarisu. 9 B? tamkáranam. 

7 B" tamnidànam ; 5 tamnidhanam. 8 ps ?ppattà. 
9 B? «d. pe. w Br S pariceajitvà. 

11 


S ad. eajitvà parleajitva pajahitvà vinodetvà Lbyanti- 
karitvà anabhávam gametvà: B" £e same, omitting parica- 
jitvà and reading byantim К and сатепіта. 


130 Atthakaragngo. [ S.N. 809 


Khemadassino ti. Khemam vuccati amatam nibhánam, 
yo so sabbasamkharasamatho | sabbüpadhipatinissaggo 
tanhakkhayo virago nirodho nibbànam.  khemadassino 
ti khemadassino tánadassino lenadassino saranadassino 
abhayadassino aceutadassino amatadassino nibbanadassino 
ti, tasmà munayo pariggaham hitvà acarimsu khemadassino. 
Тел’ aha Bhagavá : 


Sokaparidevamaecharam 

па jahanti! giddha mamüyite 
tasmā munayo pariggaham hitvà 
acarimsu? khemadassino ii. 


Patilinaearassa? bhikkhuno 
bhajamanassa vivittam* авапат 
samaggiyam àhu tassa lam, 

yo attánam? bhavane na dassaye. 7. 


Patilinacerassa | bhikkhuno ti. Patiliuacarà | vuecanti 
satta sekhà ; агаһа райпо. 

Kimkarana patilinacarà vueeanti satta sekhà? Те tato 
tato eittam patilinentà ^ patikujjenta? pativattenta 8 sanni- 
ruüddhantà sannigganhantà sannivarentà rakhkhantà go- 
pentà earantl viharanti inyanti vattenti palenti yapenti 
yapenti. Cakkhudvire сбат patilinenta $ patikujientà * 
pativattentà 8  sanniruddhantà sannigganhanta? sanni- 
varentá rakkhanta gopentà сатапі 10 viharanti iriyanli 
vattenti репы vapenti yàpenti .  Sotadvüre cittam. 
ghànadvare eittam, Jivhàdvàre сат, kāyudvāre !! eittam, 
manodvare eittam patilinenta patikujjentà pativattentà 
sanniruddhantaà sannigganhDania? sannivàrentà rakkhantà 


1 p? pajahanti. > Š carimsu. 

3 B" patilinna? throughont. 

* S vivitiamanasam («s P. T.S.). 

5 Below, in the quotations of tle pada and stanze, 
B” reads attam. 

6 5 patilinanto. 7 De patikuttenta : S patikotento. 

5 S?ento. — ? Si sanuigauhantà. 10 B? «d. vicaranti. 

п Som. kāyadvāre eittam end ad. pe. 


S.N. 810] Jarásuttauiddeso, 131 


gopentà caranti! viharanti iriyanti vattenti pālenti yapenti 
yapenti. Yathá kukkutapattam và nahàrugadduhun? và 
aggimhi pakkhittam hoti? patiliyati patikujjati* pati- 
'attati na sampasariyati; cvam eva te? tuto? tato cittam 
patilinentà patikujjentà  pativattenta  sanniruddhantà 
sannigganhantà sannivirenti rakkhanta тореп caranti 
viharanti iriyanti vattenti palenti yapenti yipenti. Cak- 
khudvüre cittam, sotadváre cittam, ghánadvàre cittam, 
jivhàdvàre cittam, kāyadvāre cittam, manodvāre eittam 
patilinentà  patikujjentà 9  pativattentà | sanniruddhantàa 
sannigganhantà ѕаппіхагепіа ? rakkhantà gopentà carunti 
viharanii iripanti vattenti pàlenti vapenti yápenti; tam- 
karana patilinacarà vnecanti satta sekha. 

Dhikkhuno ti kalyanaputhujjanassa và bhikkhuno 
sekhassa và bhikkhuno ti, patilinaearassa bhikkhuno. 

Bhajamünassa — vivilttam ' азанап ti. Asanam  vuceati 
yattha nisidanti, mañeo pitham 11181 tattilà eammakhando 
tiņasanthāro pannasantháro palàlasantháro ; tam àsanam 
asappüyarüpadassanena vittam vivittam pavivittam, asap- 
pàyasaddasavanena vittam 1 vivittàm pavivittam, asappa- 
yagandhagháyanena  asappáyarasa-Ayanena !! аѕаргауа- 
photthabbaphusanena, asappàyehi pancahi kàmagunehi 
vittam 10 vivittam pavivittam : tam авапат bhajato saw- 
bhajato sevato nisevato samsevato patisevato ti, bhaja- 
тапазѕа vivittam авай. 

Saàmadggiyam āhu tassa taii yo attanain bhavane na dassaue 
ti. Sümaggiyà ti tisso samaggilyo, ganasamaggi dhamma- 
samaggi anabhiniblattisàmaggi. 

Katamà ganasümaggi? Dahu се pi bhikkhü samagga 


1 В» ad. vienranti. 
2 B" nhàru?; S паһага: В" ?daddulam; Si S *dad- 
dalam? (gaddula, S. iii, 150). 


3 В» on. 4 p" patikattati; S Каап. 

5 P?” Š от. 5 D? patikuttenta; S patikotentā. 
? Si om. 8 Br S puthujjanakalyāņakassa 

9 8 vivittamānasam. ) pr S rittam. 

11 


S °rasayanena. 


138 Afthakavaggo. (S.N. 810 


sammodamānā avivadamánaà  khirodakibhütà аййашай- 
ñam pliyacakkhühi sampassantà viharanti, ayam сапаѕӣ- 
maggi. 

Katamā dhammasámaggi?  Cattàro satipatthánà, cat- 
taro sammappadhana, cattaro 1ddhippadà, pañe' indriyàni, 
padca balàni, satta bojjhaünga, ariyo atthaügiko maggo. 
Te ekato pakkhandanti pasidanti sampatitthanti! vimue- 
canti, na tesam dhammánam vivádo vippavado atthi. 
Ayam dhammasamaggi. 

Кайаша anabhinibbatüsimaggr? Ваһа се pi bhikkhü 
anupádisesiya nibbanadhatuya parinibbàyanti, na tena? 
nibbànadhatuya апаат và punnattam và раййауай. 
Ayam anabhinibbattistmaggr. 

Dharane ti. Neraylkànam ? nirayo bhavanam, tiraechá- 
nayonikanam tiracehánayoni bhavanam, pittivisayilkànam? 
pittivisayo bhavanam, manussinam manussaloko bhava- 
nam, devànam devaloko bhavanam 5. 

Sümagqigam Gli tassa tam yo attin bhavane na dassaye 
ti. 9 Tass’ еза  samaggl, etam channam 7, etam patirüpam, 
etam anuechavikiun, etam anulomam, yo evam patipanno? 
niraye attanam па dasseyya, tiraechànayoniyà attánam na 
dasseyya, pittivisaye attānam na dasseyya, manussaloke 
attànam па dasseyya, devaloke attànam na dasseyya ti 
evam” àhu, evam àhamsu, evam kathenti, evam bhanant, 
етл dipayanti, evam  voharanti ti, sàmaggiyam ahu 
tassu tam yo attanam bhavane na dassaye. Теп’ аһа 
Bhagavā : 


Patilinaearassa. bhikkhuno 
bhajamanassa vivittam авалат 
simnggiyam ahu tassa tam, 

yo attánam bhavane па dassaye ti. 


! p" sanditthanti ; S santitthanti. 2 B" tesam. 

з Br nerayyikanum. t B petti’. 

5 pr bhavanan ti. 5679 S tass' eva sa. 
7 S ehundum. * Dv paticelianne, Š patiechanne ti. 


9? BP Som. 


S.N. 811] Jarásuttauiddeso. 133 


Sabbattha muni anissito 

na piyam kubbati no pi appiyam, 
tasmim paridevamaccharam 

panpe vàri yathā na limpati. 8. 


Sabbattha muni anissito ti. Барат vuccati dvadasa- 
yatanāni, cakkhu! e'eva rupa са sotañ са sadda ca ghanan 
са gaudhà са jivhà ca rasa са kayo ea photthablà ca 
mano са dhammàá са. Muni ü торат vuecati папа, 


уа paünà рајапапа 2... pe... зайаа]йһип aticca so 
muni Anissito ti dve nissayá, tanhánissayo ca ditthi- 
nissayo ел... pe... ayam tauhanissayo . . . pe. 


ayam ditthinissayo. Muni tanhánissayam pahaya, ыта 
nissayam patinissajjitva?, cakkhum anissito, sotam anissito, 
gbànam anissito, Jivham anissito, kàyam anissito, manam 
&nissito, rüpe sadde gandhe rase photthabbe dhamme 
kulam ganam àávásam libham yasam pasamsam sukhain 
civarapindapátasenasanagilànapaecayabhesa]japariklharam 
kamadhàtum — rüpadhátam arūpadhātum — kámabhavam 
rüpabhavam arüpabhavam sanüaábhavam asannabhavam 
nevasaüBá-nisannabhavam ekavokarabhavam catuvokàra- 
bhavam paneavokàrabhavam  atitam anagatam — paceup- 
pannum  ditthasutamutaviüBàtabbe * dhamme  anissito 
asannissito? anallino? anupagato anajjhosito anadhimutto 
nikkhanto nissattho ? vippamutto visamyutto vimariyàdi- 
katena eetasà viharati ti, sabbattha muni anissito. 

Ха piyam kubbati no pi appiyan U Piya? ti dve piya, 
sattà và samlkhàra và. 

Katame sattà piya? ?Idha yassa? te honti atthakama 
hitakama phásukama yogakkhemakánmà, mata và ра và 


1 D? S cakkhun. 22 BP S on. 
3 В" S patinisajjitvà ; but below, p. 136. -ss-. 
+ В” S dittham sutam mutam viññanam (S viünatam) 
sabhe. 
5 B" $ от. S p" anallinno. 
! Be S nissato. > p? S piyo. 
979 S idh’ assa. 


134 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 811 


bhàtà và bhagini và робо? ха аА? và mittà và amacea 
và йай và salohità? và, ime sattazpiyà. 

Katame samkhara piya?  Manàpikà тара, тапара 
вайда, manàápika gandhà, manápika таза, manapikà 
photthabbà ; ime samkhárà piya. 

Appiyà tà dve appiya, sattà và samkhara va. 

Katame заа appiyi? Idha yassa te honti anattha- 
kama ahitakamà aphasukamà ayogakkhemakámaà jività 
voropetukáma, ime satia арріуа. 

Katame smnkhárà appiyà?  Amanapiká rupa, amana- 
pika saddà, amanapikáà gandhá, amanapika тава, amana- 
ріка photthabbà; ime вашКһага appiyà. 

Na piyam kubbati no pi appiyan М. Ayam me satto piyo, 
ime са me samkhara тапара ti bhangavasena* piyam па 
karoti. Ayam me satio арріуо, ime са те samkhàrà 
amanapa ti patighavasena applyam па karoti na janeti 
па saüjaneti na nibbatteii nàbhinibbatteti ti, na руат 
kubbaü no pi appiyam. 

Tasmim рагіегатаесћатазн ранне vàri yathā na limpati 
ti.  Tasmin ti tasmim? puggale arahante khinásave. 
Paridero? ti Bàtibyasanena và phutthassa, bhogabyasa- 
nena và phutthassa, rogabyasanena và phutthassu, sila- 
byasanena và phutthassa, ditthibyasanena và phutthassa, 
alihatarannatarena và byasanena samannágatassa, айћа- 
taranhatarena và dukkhadhammena phutthassa àdevo 
paridevo iüdevaná paridevanà àdevitaitam paridevitattam 
хасарааро vippalapo làlappo làlappayaná lalappáyitattaim. 
Macchariyan ti раћса maechariyani, àvásamaechariyain 
kulamacebariyam lábhamacehariyam vaunimaechariyun 
dhammamaechariyam ; yam — evarüpam — macehariyam 
maechariyani  maecharáyitattun — veviecham | kadariyam 
katukaneakatà? aggahitattam cittassa ; idam vuecati mac- 
ehariymn. Арі ea khandhamacchariyam pi maechariyam, 


ә 


1 урии. D? S dhitarà. 
3—3 S nàtisaloliità. В»? 8 raga’. 
5 Si om. See above, p. 194. 


7 Drkutukañjukata; 8 katukaneutà, see abore, p. 198, n. 7. 


© A 


S.N. 812] Jarüsuttaniddeso. 185 


dhàtuümaechariyam pi maechariyam, àyataninaechariyam 
рі macchariyam. Әаһо vuceati maechariyam. 

Panne йу уаћа na limpatīi ti. Рапат vuccati paduma- 
pattam. Tari vuecati udakam.  Yathà vüri padumapatte 
па трай ! na samlimpati! n' upalimpati ?, alittam asum- 
littam ? anupalittam ; evam eva tagmim puggale arahante 
khinasave paridevo ca maeehariyaü са na lünpati !na 
samlimpati! n' upalimpati?, айба asamlittà? алараа ; 
so cà puggalo? tehi kilesehi na limpati ! па samlimpati! 
п’ upalimpati?, alitto asamlitto? anupalitto  nikkhanto 
nissattho 6 vippamuito visamyutto vimariyadikatena 7 
eetas& viharati ti, tasmim paridevamaeeharam panne väri 
yatha na linpati. Ten’ аһа Bhagava : 

Sabbattha muni anissito 

na руат kabbati no pi appiyam, 

iasmim paridevamaceharam, 

panne väri yathà na Парай ti. 

Udabindu* yathà pi pokkhare, 
padume улгі yathà na limpati, 

evam muni nopalimpati? 

yadidam ditthasutammutesu!? vali 9. 


Udabindu. yathā pi pokkhare ti. Udabindū ti vuccati 
udakathevo. Ро ага, vuecati padumapattam. Гаа 
udakabindu  pndumapatte na limpati, na samlimpati, 
n’ upalimpati, alitum asamlittam anupalittan ti, udabindu 
yathà pi pokkhare. 

Padume vāri рађа na lünpati tì. Padumaim vuecati 
padumapuppham. Vari vuccati udakam. VFathāvaāri padu- 
mapupphe на limpati, na samlimpati, n' upalimpati, alittam 
asamlittam anupalittan ti, padume väri уаіћа na limpati. 


17! Br na palimpati; 5 om. 2 pr S na upa’. 
3 В» apal? here and below. 3 Son. 
5 Br 8 ad. arahanto. 5 S nisato always. 
7 pr S vipariyadi? as usual, 8 Si udavindu always. 
" 8 nopalippati. 1? S ditthasutimutesu. 


ll Siad. ti. 


186 Atthakavagqgo. [S.N. 812 


Eran muni nopalimpati yadidain diffhasutammutesu та 
ы. Eran ti opanmasampatipidanü! Минт ti опат 


vueeati Bànam, уа pannà рајапапа 2, .. pe , . . sanga- 
jàlam айсса so muni. Дера ti dve lepa, tanhàlepo са 
ditthilepo cà . . . pe... ayam tanbálepo . . . ре. 


ayam ditthilepo. Muni tanhàlepam раһауа, перец 
patinissajJitva, ditthe na limpati, sute na ора, mute 
па limpati, viññate na limpaü, na samlimpati, п” upalim- 
pati, alitto asamlitto anupalitto nikkhanto nissattho vip- 
pamuito visamyutto vimarlyádikatena eetasü viharati t, 
evam muni nopalimpati yadidam ditihasutammutesu va. 
Теп’ аһа Bhagavà : 


Udabindu yathà pi pokkhare, 
padume vàri yathà na limpati, 
evam muni nopalimpati 

yadidam ditthasutammutesu và ti. 


Dhono na hi tena maññati 

yadidam ditthasutammutesu và, 
naàühena visuddhim 1echati, 

na hi so rajjati no virajjati. 11. 


Dhono na hi tena тайпан уа Чар ditthasitapimutesu 
та М. j Dhono ії. Dbhona? уцссай раћћа, уа panna 
рајапапа .. . pe . . . amoho dhammavicayo samma- 
ditthi. 

Kimkaranà dhonà* vuceati paa? Тауа panBàya Кауа- 
dueearitam dhutaü ca dhotan са sandhotaü ea niddhotan 
са, vaciduccaritam ?dhutan са dhotan ea sandhotaü са 
niddhotan ca, manodueearitum dhutan са dhotan ca 
sandhotan са niddhotan са, rago dhuto са dhoto са 
sandhoto ca niddhoto са, doso moho kodho upanàáho 
mukkho palāso issà macchariyam maya  sàtheyyam 
thambho s&rambho mano aiimüno mado pamido, sabbe 
kilesi, sabbe dueearità, sabbe daratha, sabbe parilàhà 


1 p" ?padanaamn, see abore, ?-? Dv» S om, see above. 


Вк om. Sec Hl, p. 77 
! 8S dhono. 55 рь є ор. 


e 
ыз 


S.N. 813] Jarasuttaniddeso, 187 


sabbe ѕапіара, sabbakusalábhisumkhára dhutā ea dhotà ca 
sandhotà ca niddhotà са.  Tamkaranà dhoná! vuccati 
panna. 

Аата sammüditthiyà miechaditthi dhutà са dhotà ea 
sandhotà ea mniddhotà ca; sammasumkappena miechà- 
samkappo dhuto ea dhoto са sandhoto са niddhoto ea, 
sammivüeiya miechávüeü dhuta ea, sammiükammantena 
miechàkammanto dhuto са, sammic-üjivena micchá-àjivo 
dhuto ea, sammavayamena  mieehaváyiümo dhuto ca. 
sammiüsatiya miechásati dhutà ea, sammasamadhina mic- 
chasamádhi dhuto ea, sammañanena mieehànanam dhutan 
ca, sammüàvimutiiyà mieeháàvimutti dhutà ca dhota са 
sandhotà ea niddhotà са. Ааа ariyena atthangikena 
maggena sabbe kilesi, sabbe duecariti, sabbe darathà, 
sabbe parilàha, sabbe sant&pà, sabbákusalabhisamlkhàarà 
dhutà ca dhotà ea sandhotà ea niddhota ea. 

Атаһа imehi dhoneyyeli? dhammehi upeto samupeto 
upagato samupagato upapanno samupapanno? samanna- 
gato; tasma arahà dhono. бо dhutaràgo dhutapápo 
dhutakileso dhutaparilàho ti, dhono. 

Dhono na hi tena maññati quidam: dillhasutammutesu та 
ti dhono dittham na mannati, ditthasmim na manüali, 
ditthato na maññati, dittham me ti na шаййай; sutam па 
maniati,sutasmim ра mannati, sututo na mannati, sutam 
me tj па шайлай; mutam na maünatü, mutasmim na 
mainati, mutato па mannati, mutam me ti na mannati: 
viññatam па mannati, vinnàtasmim na manñati, vinnàtato 
na mannati, vinnatam me ti na шаййай. 

Vuttam h' etam DBhagavatü: *AÀsmi ti bhikkhave mañ- 
піар etam, ayam? aham? asmi? ti manhitam etam, 
bhavissan ti maünitam etam, na bbhavissan ti mannitam 
etam, rupi bhavissan ti maDnüitam etam, arüpi bhavissan 


* S: 31: 202. 


t 


1 pr S dhono. D? dhonehi. 
3 Pr 8 sampanno. + Si S on. 
5 Siom. 9 Si anasmi. 


188 Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 813 


ti maiüitam etam, sanüi bhavissan ti manhüitam etam, 
asahüi bhavissan ti maññitam etam, nevasaBni-nàsanni 
bhavissan ti maññitam etam; mannitam bhikkhave rogo, 
maññitam gando, manüitam sallam, maññitam upaddavo; 
tasma ti ha bhikkhave amaññamanena cetasá viharissama 
ti evam hi vo bhikkhave sikkhitabban ti, dhono na hi 
tena maññati yadidam ditthasutammutesu và. 

Хайћена visuddhim ieeha ti. Dhono aññena asuddhi- 
maggena miechàpatipadàya aniyyanikapathena, annatra 
satipatthanehi, аййаіта sammappadbanehi, aññatra iddhip- 
pidehi, айдата indriyehi, aññatra balehi, aññatra boj- 
jhangehi, aññatra ariyà atthahgikà тасса, suddhim 
visuddhii parisuddhim muttim vimutiim parimuttim na 
icchati, na assadiyati!, na pattheti, na piheti, èna samij- 
jhati?, nábhijappati ti, naññena visuddhim iechati. 

Ха dd so rajjati uo virajjati ti. Sabbe bàlaputhujjanà 
rajjanti ; kalyanaputhujjanam 3 upadaya satta sekhà viraj- 
janti; arahā п’ eva rajjati, no virajjati, virato* 80°, 
khaya rágassa vitarügattà, khayá dosassa vitadosatta, 
khayà mohassa vitamohatià. So vutthavàso cinnaea- 
гаро... pe... m atthi tassa punabbhavo ti, na hi 
во rajjati no virajjati. Теп’ аһа DBhagavà: 


Dhono na hi tena maññati 
yadidam ditthasutammutesu va, 
паћпепа visuddhim ieehati, 
па hi so rajjati no virajjati ti 


"ÜHATTHO JÀRASUTTANIDDESO NITTHITO. 


1 D? 8 sádiyati. 2-? DP S oin. 

* B? puihujjanà kalyànakam ; Š puthunakalyanakam, 
see above, p. 181. 

4 D" $ viratto. 5 Sion. 

6 pr S «d. jatijnurümaranasamsáro. 
7—7 p? S jarüsuttaniddeso ehattho samatto. 


'SATTAMO TISSAMETTEYYASUTTANIDDESO !. 


Methunam anuyuttassa 
iec-àyasmà& Tisso Metteyyo 
vighàtam brühi màrisa, 
sutvàna tava sasanam viveke sikkhi- 
simase. 1. 


Methunam anuyuttassá tì. Methunadhammo паша yo 
so asaddhammo gümadhammo vasaladhammo dutthullo 
odakantiko rahasso dvayadvayasamüpatti?. Kimkāranā 
vuceati methunadhammo? Ubhinnam rattánam  sárat- 
апаш avassutànam pariyutthitànam pariyüdinnaeittànaim 
ubhinnam sadisinam dhammo ti; tamkàáranà vuceati 
methunadhammo?.  Yatha ubho kalahakaraka 4 methu- 
пака ti vuceanti, ubho bhandanakárakau? methunaka ti 
vuecanti, ubho bhassakàrakà methunakià ti vuecanti, ubho 
vivàdakáraka * methunakà ti vuecanti, ubho adhikarana- 
Кагака methunakàü ti vuccanti, ubho vadino methunakà 
ti vuecanti, ubho ѕаПарака methunakà ti vuceanti, evam 
eva ubhinnam rattànam ѕагайапаш avassutànam pari- 
yutthitànam  pariyüdinnaeittànam  ubhinnam sadisanam 
dhammo ti tamkàáranà vuceati methunadhammo. Methu- 
nam anuyuttassà ti methunadhamme yuttassa рауп 55% 
üyuttassa samáayuttassu tacearitassa tabbahulassa tagga- 
rukassa? tanninnassa tapponassa tappabbhárassa tadadhi- 
muttassa tadadhipateyyassa ti, methunam anuyuttassa. 

Iec-üyasmüà Tisso Metteyyo ti. Гесса ? ti padasandhi 
padasamsaggo padapáripüri akkharasumavàyo byanjana- 


1-1 BP Š atha metteyyasutti-anukkati (B mitteyyasutta ). 


2 Br S dvayam dvayam 5°. 3 S ad. ti. 
а S karana, 5 S ad. ea. $ S iceha. 


139 


140 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 814 


silitthatà padànupubbata-m-etam iec&! ti. Ayasmā ti 
piyavacanam garuvaeanam sagàravavacanam 2 sappatissa- 
vacanam etam, ayasma ti. — T'isso ti tassa therassa пашат 
samkhaà samanBà pahnatti vohüro патат nàümalkammam 
namadheyyam mnirntti byafijinam abhilapo. Metteyyo ti 
tassa therassa gottam samkbà samanna paññatti уораго 
ti, lec-àyasmà Tisso Metteyyo. 

Vighātam brühi mārisā ti vighātam 8 upaghātam pilanam 
ghattanam upaddavam upasaggam brāhi acikkha desehi 
panñapehi patthapehi* vivara vibhaja uttünikarohi pakä- 
sehi. Mārisã ti piyavacanam garuvacanam sagāravava- 
сапат 5 sappatissavacanam etain шагіѕа ti, vighātam brūhi 
márisa. 

Агапа tara ѕаѕапап ti tuyham vacanam byappatham 
desanam anusãsanam anusitthim sutvà sunitvà uggahitvà 
upadhàrayitvà upalakkhayitvà ti, sutvàna tava sásanam. 

Viveke sikkhisdmase ti. Vireko ti tayo viveka, kaya- 
viveko ceittaviveko upadhiviveko. 

Katamo kayaviveko? Idha bhnikkhu vivittam senásanam 
bhajati arannam rukkhamülun pabbatam kandaram giri- 
guham snsünam vanapattham ” abbhokásam yalalapunjam. 
Кауепа ea? vivitto viharati: so еко gacchati, еко titthati, 
еко nisidati, eko seyyam kappeti, еко gàmam pindàya 
pavisati, oko patikkamati, eko raho nisidati, еко сапкатат 
adhitthati, eko carati, eko viharati iriyati vattati paleti 
уарей yāpeti. Ayam kàyaviveko. 

BKatamo eittaviveko ? Pathamam? jhànam samapan- 
nassa nivaranehi cittam vivittam hoti, dutiyam )һарат 
samàápannassa vitalkkavieirehi eittam vivittam hoti, tatiyam 
jhànam samiápannassa руя ettam vivittam hoti, catut- 
tham jhànam samápannassa sukbadukkhehi cittam vivit- 
tam hoti, akasananeayatanam samápannassa rüpasafinaya 
patichasaññaya manattasaññaya сал — vivittam hoti, 


1 S iccha. ? В” sagaravacanam; 9 om. 
> B” ad. vighatan ti. 4 No В”; Siom.; 5 jappehi. 
"Bon. 5 Бі от. T В" 8 vanapattam. 


° pr S om. 9 S pathamajh? «nd below dutiyajk?, ete. 


S.N. 814] "T'issamettegyasuttaniddeso. 141 


vinüánancayatanam samapannassa alasananeayatanasiul- 
пауа cittan vivittam hoti, akineanñayatanani samaápannassa 
vibinànaBcáyatanasannáyu cittam vivittai hoti, nevasanna- 
nasaññayatanam samapannassa Aalkincannayatanasannasa 
cittam vivittam hoti, sotapannassa sakkayaditthiyà vici- 
kiechàya silabbataparáàmása ditthanusayà vielkiceliànusayà 
tadekatthehi ea kilesehi cittam vivittam hoti, sakadápa- 
missa olarikha Кататасаѕашуојапа  pațtighasamyojanā 
ојагка kámaráganusayà patighanusaya tadekatthehi са 
kilesehi cittam vivittam hoti, anāgāmissa augusaliagatà 
kàmarügasamyojanà patigliasamyojana auusahagatà kàma- 
riganusayà patighanusuyà tadekatthehi ea kilesehi cittaim 
vivittam hoti, arahato rüparága aruparügà mana uddhacca 
avijjiya шапапиѕауа bhavaráganusaya! avijjanusayà tade- 
katthehi ea kilesehi bahiddhà ca sabbanimittehi cittain 
vivittam hoti. Ayam cittaviveko. 

KRatamo upadhiviveko? | Upadhi vuecanti kilesà ca 
khandha са abhisamkhàrà са.  Upadhiviveko vuccati 
amatam nibbànam, yo so sabbasamkhàárasamatho sabbn- 
padhipatinissaggo tanhakkhayo viràgo nirodho nibbánam. 
Ayam upadhiviveko. 

Kayaviveko ea vüpakatthakayáànam ° nekkhammaábhira- 
tanam 3, cittaviveko ea pavisuddhacittànam paramavodána- 
pattanam, upadhiviveko са nirüpadhinam  puggalinam 
visamkhàragatànam. 

Viveke sikkhisàmase ti. So* thero pakatiyà sikkhi- 
tasikkho; api ва dhammadesanam? yàceanto evam аһа 
viveke sikkhisimase tl. Тет аһа thero Tisso Metteyyo : 

Methunam anuyuttassa 
iee-àyasmà Tisso Mettevvo 
vighátam bruhi шагіѕа, 
sutvàna tava  sásanam — viveke — sikliliisá- 
mase. 1. 


! Si om. (Dr ?unusàya). 

B” S vivekatthakàyànam as elsewhere. 
3 pr S mikkhamma” í 5 Tisso. 
5 B" S ad. upadaya dhammadesanam. 


142 Athakaragqo. [S.N. 815 


Methunam anuyuttassa 
Metteyya ti В пасата 
mussat' evàpi sásanam, 
miechà ca patipajjati, etam tasmim 
апатіуат. 2. 

Methunam anuguttassa tì. — Methunadhammo nama yo 
so asaddhammo gàmadhammo vasaladhammo dutthullo 
odakantiko rahasso dvayadvayasamaàpatti!, Kimkāranā 
vuceati methunadhammo?  Ubhinnam rattànam saratta- 
nam avassutànam parlyutthitànam partyádinuacittanam 
ubhinnam sadisànam dhammo ti tunkáranà  vuceati 
methunadbammo.  Yathà ubho Каіаһакагака methunakà 
ti vuecauti, ubho bhaudanakárakà methunakà ti vuccanti, 
ubho bhhassakáraka methunakàá ti vueeauti, nbho vivà- 
dakaraka methunakà ti vuecanti, ubho adhikaranakáraka 
methunakà ti vueeanti, ubho vádino methunaká ti vuc- 
canti, ubho sallàpakà methunakàá ti vuecanti; evam eva 
ubhinnam rattánam sárattànam avassutánam paurlyutthi- 
tànam pariyadinnacittànam ubhinnam sadisinam dhammo 
ti tamkáranà vuecati methunadhammo. Ме ишип anu- 
yuttassà ti methunadhamme yuttassa payuttassa iyuttassa 
samàyuttassa taccaritassa tabbahulassa taggarukassa tau- 
ninnassa (tapponassa  tappabbharassa  tadadhimuttassu 
tadadhipateyyassa tj, methunam anuyuttassa. 

Metteyya ti Dhagaca tam theram gottena # арайы. Bha- 
garā ti güravàdhivaeanam ; api ea bhaggarago ti Dhagavá, 
bhaggadoso ti Bhagava, bhaggamoho ti Bhagavà, bhagga- 
ditthà ti Bhagavà, bhaggakantako? ti Bhagava, bhagga- 
kileso ti Bhagavà ; bhaji vibhaji patibhaji? dhammaratanan 
ti Bhagavá; bhavanam antakaro ti Dhagava ; bhávitakayo 
ti bhávitasilo bhávitacitto bhaàvitapañño ti Bhagavà: bhaji 
và Bhagavā araññavanapatthāni* pantani senásanüni 
ap|asnddani appanigghosàni vijanavátàni manussaraha- 
seyyalani? patisallanasarupàni ti Вһасата ; Барт và 


1 See abore, p. 139. 2 S *kanthako. 
з p" pavibhaji. 4 pr S ?pattant, here and below. 
^ B? manussarahass?. 


S.N. 815] T'issametteyyasuttaniddeso. 143 


Bhagavà —eivarapindapatasenasanagilanapaceayabhesajja- 
parikkharanan tà Bhagavà ; bhāgī và Вћһасата attharasassa 
dhammarasassa vimuttirasassa  adhisilassa adhicittassa 
adhipannaya ti Bhagava; bhàgr và Bhagaváà catunnaimn 
jhánanam catunnam appamannánam catunnam arüpasamá- 
pattnan ti Вһадауа; bhági và Bhagavā atthannam 
vimokkhànam atthannam abhibháyatananam пахаппаш 
anupubbavihàrasamàpattinan ti Bhagava ; bhāgī vā Bha- 
gavà dasannam sannabhávananam dasannaim kasiņnasamā- 
pattinam апарапаѕайвашараіиуа! asubhasamápattiyá ti 
Bhagava; bhagi và DBhagava eatunnam satipatthünanaimn 
eatuunam sammappadhanánam eatunnam iddhippádánam 
paücannam indriyünam paneannam balànam sattannim 
bojjhangánam uriyassa atthaügikassa maggassa ti Bhaga- 
và; bhági và Bhagavà dasannam tathacatabalanam eatun- 
nam vesarajjainam eatunnam patisambhidànam channam 
&bhinnànam? channam buddhadhummánan ti Bhugava ; 
Bhagavā ti n’ etam пашаш matara katam, па pitarā 
katam, na bhatara katam, na bhaginiyā katam, na mitta- 
maccehi katam, na ñatisalohitehi katam, na samana- 
brahmanehi katam, na devatàhi katam; vimokkhantikam 
etam Buddhinam Bhagavantānam Dbodhiyà шше saha 
sabbaññutaññanassa patilàbhà saechika pannatti yadidam 
Bhagavà ti, Metteyya ti Bhagavà. 

Mussat' evápi ѕдѕапап ti. — Dyihi kárauehi sásanain 
mussati: pariyattisisanam рі mussati, patipattisisunam 
pi mussati. 

Кайышып pariyattisisanam ? Yam tassa pariyüputam 
suttam geyyam veyyäkaraņam баа udanam itivuttalum 
jàtakam abbhutadhbammam  vedallun, idam pariyatti- 
süsanam ; ќат pi mussati parinussati? paribáhiro hoti 
ti, evam рі mussat' evapi ѕаѕапат. 

Ratamam  patipattisisanam ? Sammüpatipadà, anulo- 


1 Вт ?gatienmádhissa. 
? B? abhinnanunam ; S abhinnanánam. 
3-3 Вр tam pi mussati sammussati pamaussati sampa- 
mussati; S vimussati sammussati pamussati. 


144 Afthakaragqo. [S.N. 815 


mapatipadà, apaeeapntkapatipadà, anvatthapatipadà, dham- 
manudhammapatipada, !kusalesu paripurikarita 1, indri- 
yesu guitadvarata, bhojane mattannuta, jagariyanuyogo, 
satisampajaññam, eattàro ваба дпа, eattàro sammappa- 
dhàuà, eittàro iddhippádá, pane' indriyáni, рапса balàni, 
satta bojjhanga, ariyo atthangiko maggo; idam patipatti- 
sásanam ; ?tam рі mussati parimussati?, paribáhiro hoti 
ti, evam pi massat’ evàpi sásanam. 

Miechü ca pafipajjat ti. Pànam pi hanati, adinnam 
pi ādiyati, sandhim pi ehindati, nillopam рі harati, 
ekāgārikam pi karoti, paripanthe pi titthati, paradaram рі 
gaechati, musa pi bhanati ti, miechà ca patipajjati. 

Etam tasinlin anarigan ti etam tasmim puggale anariya- 
dhammo  baladhammo  mülhadhammo  annánadhammo 
amarivikkhepadhammo yadidam micchā райрада ti, etam 
tasmim апатуат. Ten’ аһа Bhagavá: 


Methunam anuynttassa 
Metteyya ti Dhagavà 
mussat' evapi sasanam, 
miechá са patipajjati, etam tasmim апагіуап ti. 


Eko pubbe caritvaàna methunam yo 
nisevat?, 

yàánam bhantam va tam loko hinam 
аһа puthujjanam. i 


Iko рте caritraná ti. Dvihi kàranehi еко pubbe cari- 
ітапа, раррајјаѕат Кһаќепа và ganavavassaggatthena và. 

Капап  pabbajjisamkhátena еко  pubbe caritvàna ? 
Sabbam  gharavasapalibiodham  ehinditva, puttadarapali- 
bodham chinditva, nàtipalibodham ehinditvà, nmittimacca- 
palibodham — ehinditvà,  sannidhipalibodham — chinditva, 
kesumassum oharetva, kasayani vatthani acchādetvā, agà- 
rasma anapariyam pabbajitva, akiñeanabhavam upagantvà, 

11 В” S sillesu puripürakarità. 

2023 харосе eccept that S has tam pi mussiti instead of 
vimnssali, 


S.N. 816] T'issametteuyasuttaniddeso. 145 


eko carati viharati iriyati vattati pāleti yapeti yápeti; 
evam pabbajjàsamkhiátena, еко рие caritvana. 

Katham ganávavassaggatthena еко pubbe caritvàna ? 
So evam pabbajito samàno еко araünnavanapatthani pan- 
tani senásanàni patisevati appasaddani appanigghosani 
vijanavátàni manussarühaseyyakàáni patisallànasaruppani !. 
So eko gaecbati, eko titthati, eko nisidati: eko sevyam 
kappeti еко батат pindàya pavisati, eko patikkamati, 
eko raho nisidati, еко eatikamam adhittháti, еко carati, еко 
viharati iriyati vattati pàleti vapeti yàpeti; evam ganava- 
vassaggatthena, еко pubbe caritvána. 

Methunam yo niserati ti. Methunadhammo лата yo so 
asaddhammo . . . ре... фашКатапа vueeati methuna- 
dhammo. Methunam yo nisevati ti so aparena samayena 
Buddham dhammam samgham  sikkham —paeeakkhàya 
himàyávattitvà methunadhammam sevati nisevati sam- 
sevati patisevati ti, methunani yo nisevati. 

Yanam bhantam va tam loke ti. Yanan ti hatthiyanam 
assayanam govünam ajayanam mendakayanam?* ottha- 
уапат kharayanam bhantam adantam akaritam avinitam 
uppatham капай, visamam lháuum pi pàsanam pl abhi- 
ruhati, ?yànam pi? arohakam pi bhanjati, papáte pi 
papatati. Yatbà tam bhantam уапат adantam akaritam 
avinitam uppatham ganháti, evam eva so vibbbantako 
bhantayanapatibhàgo прраіћат ganhàáti: miechaditthim 
сапай... pe. . . nieehàsamádhim gaņhāti. Yathā 
tam bhantam уапат adantam akáritam avinitam visaman 
khànum pi pàsánam pl abhirubati, evam eva so vibbhan- 
tako bhantayaánapatibhago visamam kayakammam abhi- 
ruhati, visamam  vacihammam abhiruhati, visamam 
тапокаттат abhiruhati, visamam — pinatipatam abhi- 
ruhati, visamam  adinnàdànam  abhiruhati, visamain 
kàmesu micchācāram  abhiruhati, visamam musāvādam 
abhiruhati, visamam pisunam? vàeam abhiruhati, visamam 
рпатиѕат ? vaeam abhirühati, visamam samphappalapam 


1 Si rupani. ? В” S meudayanam. 2-3 бі om. 
4 B" ріѕппау?, ? Brpharusav°. 
10 


146 Afthakavaugo. [S.N. 816 


abhiruhati, visamam abhijjham abhiruhati, visamam Ъуа- 
padam abhiruhati, visamam  miechàditthim | abhiruhati, 
visame samkhàre abhiruhati, visame paüca Lkàmagune 
abhiruhati, visame 1nvarane abhiruhati. Yathà tam 
bhantam yàünam adantam akàritam avinitam !yànam рі! 
arohakam 2 pi bhanjati, evam eva so vibbhantako bhanta- 
yanapatibhàgo niraye attànam bhanjati, tiracchànayoni à * 
nttànam bhanjati, pittivisaye attànam bhañjati, manussa- 
loke attànam bhanjati, devaloke attaànam bhanjati. Yatba 
tam bhantam уапат adantam ahàritam avinitam ра} аїе 
pi рараќаб, evam eva so vibbhantako bhantayánapatibhago 
jàtipapàtamhi? pi papatati, jaràápapatamhi * рі papatati, 
byàdhipapaàtamhi?* pi papatati, maranapapātamhi 4 pi 
papatati, sokaparidevadukkhadomanassupāyāsapapātamhıi* 
pi papatati. Loke ti apāyaloke .. . pe.. . manussa- 
loke ti, yànam bhantam va tam loke. 

Hinam hu puthujjunan ti. Ријана ti ken! atthena 
puthujjianà? Pathu kilese janenti ti puthujjanà, puthu 
avihatasakkayaditthikaà ti puthujjanà, puthu sattharünam 
mukhulokikà*? ti puthujjana, puthu sabbagatihi àvuta ê 
ti pathujjana, puthu nànábhisamkhàürehi abhisamkharonti 
ti puthujjana, puthu nàná-oghehi vaybanti ti puthujjana, 
puthu папаѕапіарері santappanti ti puthujjanà, puthu 
nànáàparilàhehi paridayhanti? ti pathujjana, puthu райса- 
su? kamagunesu тайа giddhaà gadhità mucehità ajjho- 
sana laggā laggità palibuddha ti puthujjanà, puthu 
paBcahi mnivaranehi àvutà? nivutà  ophutà 19 ра 
Jatiechannà — patikujjità ti puthujjanā. Hinam аһа 
puthujanan ti puthujjianam hinam nihinam omakam 


1 Si om. 2 p» S àrohanakam. 
3 p" S tiraechànayoniyum. 
+ pr S ?papátam. 

B? S mukhamullokika. 

D" ауп аа ; S àvutthita. 

Si pacivaylianti : S pavieeayhanti. 

Si pafieak?. 

Si avuta; B" бу. " B" ovutà ; S ори. 


© o м o Gc 
_ 


ГА 


S.N. 817] T'issametteyyasuttaniddeso. 147 


làmakam jatukkam ) parittan ti evam? али 2 evam 
ahamsu evam kathenti evam bhananti evam dipayanti 
evam vobaranti ti, hinam ahn puthujjanam. “Ten iha 
Bhagavā : 
Eko pubbe caritvina methunam yo nisevati, 
хапат bhantam va tam loke lhinam ара puthuj- 
janan ti. 


Yaso kittī са уа pubbe һауа етарі 
tassa sa, 

etiam pi disvà sikkhetha methunam 
vippaháàtnave. 1. 


Faso kitti ca уй pubbe hüyat evàpi tassa să ti. Katamo 
yaso? Katama? kitti?? Idh’ ekaeco pubbe samanabhave 
sukkato hoti! garukato? mánito puūjito apacito labhi 
civarapindapàátasenáasanagilànapaecayabhesajjapariklihara - 
пат ; ayam yaso. 

Katama kitti? Idh’ екассо pubbe samanabhiáve kitti- 
vannabhato? hoti pandito viyatto medhüvi bahus:suto 
cittakathi kalyünapatibhano suttantiko ti và vinayadhoro 
tiva dhammakathiko ti và агапшко ti và piņdapātiko ti 
và pamsukuüliko ti và, tecivariko ti và sapadánacariko* ti 
va khalupacehabhattiko ti và nesajpko ti và vathásan- 
thatiko ti và pathamassa jhanassa làbhi ti và dutiyassa 
jhánassa làbhi ti và tatiyassa jhaànassa labhi ti va 
eatutthassa jhànassa libhi ti va akasanañešayatanasania- 
раф уа lübhi ti và vinnánaneàyatanasamápattiya làbhi ti 
ха Akiüeinnayatanasamápattiyi làbhr ti và nevasanná- 
náàsannayatanasamipattiyà labbi ti vā; ayam kitti. 

Yaso kitti ca yä рие hyat егарі tassa ^а ti. Tassa 
aparena samayena Buddham dhamman samgham sikkham 
paccakkhāya hinayavattassa 8 so ca yaso ва ea kitti Aidyati 


t B? ehatukkam ; S cheguccham (jeguecham ?). 
? DP $ on. š DP om. 4 DP Siom. 
6 Sad. hoti. 9 B^?gato. — ? Sisappadana as ostin. 


Si?issa; D?Shiniya ivattassa (S Сева). Sec pp. TIS, 
189, 156. 


148 Aff hakavaggo. (S.N. 817 


parihayati paridhamsati paripatati antaradhayati vip- 
palujjati ti, yaso kitti са ya pubbe һауа етар tassa sā. 

Etam pi dise sikhhotha 2 тена vippaháatave tì. 
Ілан di pabbe sumanabháve yaso kitti ea, aparabhàge 
Buddhun dhammam samgham  sikkhaim — paecakkhàya 
hinàyávattassa ayaso en акы са!; etum sampattivi- 
pattim (зг? passitvà tulayitva tirayitva vibhàvayitvà 
vibhütam katva ti etam pi disva. Aikkhetha ti tisso sikkhà, 
adhisilasikkhà adhieittasikkha adhipannàsikkbi. 

Кайаша adhisilasikkha ? Idha bhikkhu silava hoti, 
páàtimokkhasamvarasumvuto — viharali — ücáragoenrasam- 
panno, anumattesu vajjesu bhajadassávi samadāya sik- 
khati sikkhapadesu ; khuddako  silakkhando, mahanto 
slakkhandho, ваш patitthi ádiearanam samyamo sam- 
varo mukham pamukham kusalanam dbanmanam sama- 
рата. Ayam adhisilasikkha. 

Katamà adhicittasikkha ? [Ша Lbhikkhu vivice eva 
kamehi, vivicea skusalehi dhimuehi, savitakkam savieiram 
vivekajun pitisukham — pathamam? Jhanam upasampajja 
viharati, *vitakkavicarünam управата ajjhattam sam- 
pasadanum cetaso ekodibhávam avitakkam avieàram sami- 
dhijam * dutiyam jhanam, tatiyam jhànam, catuttham 
jhánam upasampajja уати. Ayam adhieittasikkha. 

Katamā adhipaünáàsikkhaà 2 Idha bhikkhu раййауа holi, 
udayattliagaminiya ралпауа samannágato arlyiüya nibbe- 
dhikaya sammadukkhakkhivagaminiya; so idam dukkhan 
tà yathàbhütam pajanati, ayam dukkhasamudayo ti yathā- 
bhütam pajanati, ayam  dukkhapirodho ti yathabhütam 
pajanati, ayam dukkhanirodhuginmini райрада ti хаіћа- 
bhutam pajānāti, ime asavà ti yathabhütam pajánati, ayam 
двауивашифауо ti yathabhutam pajanati, ayam  isava- 
nirodho ti yathabhutam  pajanati, ayam asavanirodha- 
gāmim райрада ti yathabhuüun pajānāti. Ayam adhi- 
раппав Кра. 


1-1 Si om. ? B? 8 ad. ti. 
з S pathumajh and below dutiyajh?, ete. 
4—4 Hh» 4 pe. 


S.N. 818] T'issemetteyyasuttaniddeso, 149 


Methunadhammo пата уо во asaddhamiio . . . ре 
tamkáraua vuecati nethunadhammo. 

Etam pi disvi sikkhetha methunam rippahütere ti 
methunadhammassa! pahánáya vüpasumáya patinissag- 
сауа patipassaddhiya ? adhisilam pi sikkheyya, adhicittam 
pi sikkheyya, adhipannam pi sikkheyya. Ima? tisso 
sikkha* àvajjento? sikkheyya, jananto sikkheyyu, passauto 
sikkheyya, paccavekkhauto sikkheyya, cittam | adhittlia- 
hanto sikkheyya, saddhaya * adhimueeanto sikkhevya, 
viriyam — pagganhanio sikkheyya, satim — upatthapento 
sikkheyya, cittam samadahanto sikkheyya, pannàya раја- 
nanto sikkheyya, abhinneyyam  abhijananto sikkhevya, 
parihneyyam  parljinanto sikkheyya, pahatabbam paja- 
hanto sikkheyya, bhavetabbiun bhávento sikkheyya, sac- 
ehikatabbam  sacchikaronto sikkheyya асагеууа sama- 
сагеууз samadaya vatteyya ti, etam pi disvà sikkhetha 
methunam vippahatave?. Теп’ аһа Bhagavā: 


Yaso Кі са уй pubbe háyat' evapi tassa sa, 
etam pi disvà sikkhetha methunam vippahatave ti. 


Samkappehi pareto so kapano viya 
jhàyati, 

sutvà? paresam nigghosam maüku hoti 
tathavidho. 5. 


S«inkappehi pareto so kapano гіа jhāyati t. Kümasam- 
каррепа byàpàdasamkappena vihimsaásanikappena ditthi- 
samkappena phuttho? pareto samohito sumannágato pi- 
hito? kapano riya mando viya momüho viya jhayati 
рајјһауаи nijhayati avajjhàyati V. Yathā ulüko rukkha- 
sàkháyam  müsikaun magayamāno!! јһауаы рајјһауай 
nijhüyati avajjháyati!/?: yathà kotthu!? naditire maeche 
magayamáno l jháyati pajjhayati nijjhayati avajjhayati!; 

! $i methunassa аһ. 2 Si ?passaddhàsa. 
Si om. + В" sikkhayo; S sikkha so. 
В? àvajjanto. 9 S saddha. 7 S ad. ti. 
$i sutvàna, below sutvà. 9 5 puttho. 

В” S apa?. H Si gumayamano. 12 Si kotthu. 


о c «© 


m 
Ф 


150 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 818 


уай vilàro' sandhisamalasapankatire ? mūsikam maga- 
yamàno? jhàyati pajjhayati nijjhàyati avajjhayati?; yathà 
gadrabho vahaeehinno sandhisamalasapankatire 2 јһауай 
pajjhàyati nijjháyati avajjhàyati; evam eva so vibbhantako 
kamasamkappena byapadasamkappena vihimsàsamkappena? 
ditthisamkappena phuttho* pareto samohito samannágato 
pihito? kapano viya mando viya momüho viya jhàyati 
pajjhayati nijhàyati avajjhayati? ti, samkappehl pareto 
so kapano viya Jhayati. 

Sutra paresam nigghosam. таги hoti tathüvidho ti. 
Daresan ti upa]jhayaka 5 và áeariyakà 9 và samánupajjhà- 
yaka và ватапасагіуака và miità và sanditthaà và sam- 
bhattā và sabāyā và codenti: Tassa te Lho!? àvuso 
ааһа, tassa te dulladdham : yam хаш evarnpam шагат 
sattharam labhitvà, evam svükkhate dhammavinaye pabba- 
jivà, evarüpam ariyaganam Јата, hinassa methuna- 
dhainmassa karana Buddham dhammam samgham eikkham 
paceakkháya hinàyavatto 'si!!; saddhà рі nama te nàhosi 
kusalesu dhammesu, hiri pi паша te nāhosi kusalesu 
dhammesu, ottappam рі паша te mnihosi kusalesu 
dliammesu, viriyam pi nama te n&hosi kusalesu dhammesu, 
sati pi nama te n&hosi kusalesu dhammesu, pahnà pi 
nima te nāhosi kusalesu dhammesü ti tesam vacanam 
byappatham?? desanam anusisanam? anusitthim sufra 
suuitva uggahetva 19 upadhirayitva upalakkhayitva wanka 
hoti, pilito ghattito!? byatthito!? domanassito hoti. Tuthā- 


1 BP bilaro ; S bilaro. 
2 B" sandhisamalasamka?; S samdhim amalasamka? and 
sandhim samalasamka". 


3 $i gamayamaàno. 4 B» S apa?. 
S ў 1 

^ S ad. puttho. 6 Son. 

7 Siom. 8 S upajjhaya. 


B? S áeariya, see p. 151, н. 4. 1? Br S on. 

] S 'smi, see p. š 

Si byapatham ; B? byappatum. 

D* S uggahitvà. 

N S опао. 15 B? byüdhito; 5 руауцо. 


S.N. 819] "T'issametteyyasuttaniddeso. 151 


vidho ti tathàvidho tadiso tassanthito! tappakāro tappati- 
Браво, yo so vibbhantako ti, sutvà paresam nigghosam 
manku hoti tathàvidho. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà: 

Sunlappehi pareto so kapano viya jhàyati, 

sutvà paresam nigghosam manku hoti tathàvidho ti. 


Atha satthàni kurute paravadehi co- 


dito, 
esa khv-assa mahagedho, mosavajjam 
pagahati. 6. 


Atha satthüni kurute pavavadehi codito ti. Аа ti 
padasandhi padasamsaggo padapāripūri akkharasamaváyo 
byañjanasilitthatà padanupubbata-m-etam atha ti. Sat- 
апт ti tini satthani, kāyasattham vacīsattham mano- 
sattham; tividham kayaudueearitam kāyasattham, eatub- 
bidham vaeiduecaritam vacisattham, tividham manodne- 
сагаш manosattham. — Paravádehi codito ti upajjhaya- 
kehi? vā aecariyakehi? và  samànupajjihayakehi? vā 
samaānācariyakehi và mittehi va sanditthehl và sambhat- 
te'i và sahàyehi và сойо, sampajanamusa bhāsati: 
Abhirato aham bhante ahosim pabbajjaya, mātā me 
posetabba, tena 'mhi vibbhanto ti bhanati; pita me 
posetabbo tena "bi vibbhanto ti bhanati; bhátà me 
posetabbo, bhagini me posetabbi, putto me posetabbo, 
аһа me posetabbà, mittā me  posetabbà, amaeeà ше 
posetabbà, nàatakà me posetabbà, nàtisülohitaà? me pose- 
барра, tena "mhi vibbhanto ti bhanati vaeisattham karoti 
samkaroti? janeti saüjaneti nibbatteti abhinibbatteti ti, 
atha satthani kurute paravadehi codito. 

Esa khe8-assa? mahdágedho ti. Eso kho? assa? mahá- 

! Si elsewhere tamsanthito ; S tassakkhito. 

? В” вайдаһай. š Br S upajjhayehi. 

+ Br 8 üeariyehi. 

5 В? samàánupaceavakehi : S samanupajjhayehi. 

$ Б" S от. пай. T Si ow. 5 BP S om. 

? В» 5 tassa. 


152 Atthakavagqo. [S.N. 819 


gedho mahāvanam mahāgahanan makakantàro таһа- 
visamo mahaákutilo mahápanko mahapalipo? mahápali- 
bodho mahábandhanam yadidam sampajánamusávado ti, 
esa khsy-assa mahagedho. 

Mosavajjem pagahati? tì. Mosavajjam vuccati musavádo. 
Idh’ ekaeco sabhaggato và parisaggato và ñatimajjhagato ° 
và pügamajjhagato và ràjakulamajjhagato và abhinito 
sakkhiputtho: *ehi bho* purisa yam јапаѕі tam vadehi 
ti. бо ajànam và aha janami ti, janam và аһа na 
jàánàmi ti  apassam va аһа passāmī ti, passam và аһа па 
passümi ti, iti attahetu vā parahetu và àmisakineikkha- 
hetu và sampajanamusá bhāsati; idam vuccati mosa- 
vajjam. 

Арі ea 6” àkarehi musāvādđo hoti; pubb’ еу’ assa hoti 
musa bhanissan ti, bhanantassa hoti musa bhanami ti, 
bhanitassa hoti musà maya bhanitan ti; imehi tīh’ akarehi 
musāvādo hoti. Api ea eatüh' àkarehi? pañcal? ākārehi 
chah’ akàrehi sattah' äkarehi atthah' ākärehi musavado 
hoti: pubb’ ev' assa hoti musa bhanissan ti, bhanantassa 
hoti musa bhanüm: ti, hhanitassa hoti musa тауа 
bhanitan ti, vinidhaya ditthim, vinidhaya khantim, vini- 
dhàya гас, vinidhàya sannam, vinidhaya һауа, imehi 
atthah' ākārehi musävādo hoti.  Mosavajjam ридала" 
ti mosavajam рабаһай 7 og&hati ajjhogahati pavisati ti, 
mosavajjam pagahati". Теп’ аһа Bhagavi : 


= 


S ?palapo ; cf. palipatha (miry road). 
Б” 5 sangàáhati. 

Si ^majjhaggato here and below. 

B” eh' ambho; S evam bho. 

5 Bv $ aham here and below. 

9 Б” S ad. musuvado hoti: pubb’ еу’ assa hoti musa 
bhanissan ti; bhanantassa hoti тива bhanaáami ti; bhani- 
tassa hoti musā mayā bhanitan ti vinidhāya ditthim ; 
imehi eatüh' akarehi musāvāđo hoti. Api ca. (Š kas 
bhantassa for bhanauntassa.) 

* P" sangàhati. 


19 


3 


4—4 


S.N. 820] T'issametteyyasuttaniddeso. 153 


Atha sattháni kurute paravadehi сойо, 

esa khv.assa maligedho, mosavajjun pagāhati ti 

Pandito ti samannáato ekacarlyarn 
adhitthito, 

athàápi! methune? yutto mando va 
parikissati. ТУ 

Pandito ti samaññato ti idh' ekaeeo pubbe samanabhave 
kittivanuabhato? hoti pandito viyatto medhavi baluissuto 
cittakathi kalyapapatibhano suttantiko ti và vinayadharo 
ti và dhammakathiko ti vā... pe .. . петаѕапћапа- 
saňňāyatanasamāpattiyā lābhī ti vā evam  nàto hoti 
* sañňāto samaünàto ti*, pandito ti samanBàto. 

Ekacuriyam «ШЧО ti аут kāraņehi ckacariyum 
adhitthito pabbajjisamkhaütena và ganavavassaggatthena 
va. 

Katham? pabbajjissunkhatena ekacariyam adhitthito? 
Sabbam gharávásapalibodham chinditvà . . . pe 
evam pabbajjasamkhatena ekaeariyam adhitthito. 

Katham ganávavassaggatthena ekaceariyain adhitthito ? 
So evam pabbajito samāno еко arannavanapatthani pan- 
tant... pe... evam ganüvavassaggatthena ekacariyam 
adhitthito ti, ekacariyam adhitthito. 

Athapi 9 methune уно ti. Methanadhammo nama yo 
so asaddhammo? . . . pe . . . tamkáraua — vuccati 
methunadhammo. АШарі ё methuue yutto ti so aparena 
вашауепа Buddham dhimmam samgham sikkham pac- 
eakkháya hináyàávattitvà? methunadhamme yutto payutto? 
ауто samäyutto ti, айар” methune yutto. 

Mando va parikissati'? ti kapauo viya momulio!! viya 


1 В" $ ва сарі. ? S methuna. 
? В” %аппасаќо as p. 147, н. б; Š kittitevauna. 
1-4 B? paññato samannáto hott ti; S pannàáto. 
5 See above, p. 144. 6 B? S us abore, п. 1. 
* B? ad. gàmadhammo ; S «d. gàmadhammo са sala- 
dhammo (vasala?). 
8 pr S ad. và. ° B> S samyutto. 
10 S parilissati. п pr Saud. mando viya. 


154 Afthakavaggo. (S.N. 820 


kissati! parikissati*  parikilissati?, pànam рі hanati, 
adinnam pi адіуай, sandhim рі chindati, nillopam pi 
harati, ekāgārikam рі karoti, paripanthe pi Пай, para- 
Чагат pi gacehati, musà pi bhanati, evam pi kissati 
parikissati parikilissati. Tam enam гајапо gahetva 
vividhà kammakàranà karenti*: kasahi pi talenti, vettehi 
pi tálenti, addhadaudakehi pi tàlenti, hattham pi chindanti, 
pādam pi ehindanti, hattbapadam pi ehindanti, kannam 
pi echindanti, násam pi ehindanti, kannanàsam рі chin- 
danti, vilaügathálikam 5 pi karonti, sumkhamundikam рі 
karonti, ráhumukham рі karonti, jotimálikum pi karonti. 
hatthapajjotikam pi karonti, erakavattikam pi karonti, 
cirakavüsikum 5 pi karonti, eneyyakam pi karonti, bali- 
samamsikam pi karonti, kahápanakam? pi karonti, khàra- 
pataechikam? pi? Кагопії, palighaparivattikam pi karonti, 
palalapithakam !9 pi karonti, tattena pi telena osineanti, 
sunakbehi pi khàádapenti, jivantam pi sule uttasenti ®, 
asina рі sisam chindanti; evam pi kissati parikissati 
paurikilissati?.  Athavà  kümatauh&ya  abhibhüto pari- 
yüdinnaeitto bhoge pariyesanto пауйуа maháàsamuddum 
pakkhandati, sitassa  purakkhato, unhassa purakkhato, 
damsumakasavátatapasirimsapasamphassehi — "rissamáno 
khuppipásaya pilipamáno!? Gumbam P? gaccbati, Tak- 
kolam  gaechati, Takkasilam  gacchati, Kalamukham 
gacchatij Maranapüram?!* gaechati, Vesungam сасеһай, 
Verapathain  gaechati, Javam gaeehati, Талай 16 gac- 
chati, Vaüngam !$ gaeebati, Elavaddanam 7 — gaechati 


| S lilissati. 2 S pakirissati. 9 S om. — * 8 karonti. 
`В” Шалка ; S bilanga^. 9 Codd. сі. * Bkahápanikam. 
5 В” kháràpatiechakam ; S khàrüpatacehikacchi. 
?OS om. pi. » Br ?pitthakam. п 8 vuttasenti. 
1271? B» S piliyamàno khuppipásàya miyyamáno ti. 
7 S gumbhium ; with this list of places cf. the lists in 
Mil. P. 331, 359, and below on v. 939. 
M Be püraparam ; Š purammukham. 
15 Si kamalim ; В” tammalim ; S tammuni. 
16 Si vañkam. U Br elabandhanam ; S jalavanam. 


S.N. 890] T'issametteyyasuttaniddeso. 155 


Suvannakütam gaechati, Suvannabhümim gacchati, Tam- 
bapauuim gaechati, Suppiram! gaechati, Bharukaecham 2 
gacchati, Surattham З gacchati, * Añeganekam gacchati *, 
Gaüganam? gaechati, Paramagaütganam * gacchati, Yonain? 
gacehati, Paramayonum? gacehati, ?Allasandam gucchati?, 
10 Marukantàram gaechati, Jannupatham gacchati, Aja- 
patham eaechati, Mendapatham gaechati, Saükupatham 
gacehati, Chattapatham gaechati, Vamsapatham ?! gaechati, 
Sakunapathim 12 gaechati, Müsikapatham gaecbati, Dari- 
patham gaechati, УеМадһагат ?? gaechati; evam pi kissati 
parikissati parikilissati. Pariyesanto!* na labhati!?, ali- 
bhamülakam рі dukkhadomanassam '?  patisamvedeti ; 
evam pi kissati!? parikissati!? parikilissati. Pariyesanto!? 
labhati!5, laddhà ea ürakkbamüulukam рі dukkha- 
domanassam  patisamvedeti: Kin ti me bhoge n’ eva 
ràjano hareyyum, na сога hareyyum, па aggi daheyya 2, 
22 na udaküm vaheyya????, na арріуа dàyadà hareyyun 
ti: tassa evam rakkhato?* gopayato te? bhogà vippa- 
lujjanti, so 25 vippayogamuülakam pi dukkhadomanassam 1% 
patisamvedeti; evam pi kissati parikissati parikilissati 


! D? suppadakam; S supparakam. 
2 Bv vhürugaecham (2); Si bharukam ; 5 bharakae- 
chim. 
3 Si suraddham ; S surarattham. 
4-1 Br bhaügalokam g?; Š om. 
5 Br bhaüganam ; S naganam. 
9 B" saramatamganam (2); S padapanaünganam. 


T § sotam (—-yonam). 9 Sipinam. ° ° В" S om. 

0 B» qd. vinakam g? mülapadam g?; Š ad. navakam 
g? mulapaddam e°. 

n Siamsa’. 12 S sanku°. 

13 Si eettà? ; В” 5 vettācāram. ÜM В? gavesanto. 

15 B» vindati. 16 Dp dukkhiun d°. 

17 $ kilissaüi. 18 S от. 

9 ВР gavesanto. ^ B»Sp. 

a Br S daheyyum. 7? 9 от. 


23 В» vaheyyum. 2 Dr ürakkhato. ?5 Si om. 


156 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 820 


ti, аћарі methune yutto mando va parikissati. Теп’ aha 
Bhagavá : 


Pandito ti samarinato ekacariyam adhitthilo, 
athapi methune yutto mando va parikissati ti. 


Etam àadinavam Batvà muni pubbà- 
pare idha, 

ekaeariyam dalham kayirà!, па nise- 
vetha methunam. 8. 


Etam йййнасаль паса muni pubbapare idhà tìi. Etan ti 
pubbe samanabhave yaso са kitti ca, aparabhāge Buddham 
dhapimam samgham sikkham  paccakkhàya Dinayavat- 
tassa ayaso са akitti ca, etam sampattivipattim? ñatrā 
Janitva tulayitvà trayitva? vibhāvayitvā vibhūtam katvā. 
Muni tì. Monam vuecati* парат, ya paññā pajānanā... 
pe .. . sangnjalam aticca so muni. Јана ti imissā 
ditthiya, imisså khantiya, imissà ruciyā, imasmim айлуе, 
imasmim dhamme, imasmim vinaye, imasmim dhamma- 
vinaye, imasmim pavacane, imasmim brahmacariye, 
imasmim satthusásane, imasmim attabhāve, imasmim 
manussuloke ti, etam adinavam natvaà muni риррараге 
idha. 

Ekacariygaus dalhane гатта ti dvihi karanehi eka- 
сатіуат даат kareyya, pabbajjàsumkhátena và ganà- 
vavassaggatthena và. 

Каар  pabbajjisamkhatena ekacariyam dalham ka- 
reyya? Sabbam gharüvasapalibodham chiuditvà, putta- 
dárapalibodham — ehinditvà,  nàtipalibodham — chinditv, 
mittàmaecapalibodham — chinditvà, ^ sannidhipalibodham 
chinditvà, kesamassum ohāretvā, Кавауарі vatthàni ассһа- 
detvà, àgàrasmà anagáriyam pabbajitvà, akiBeanabhávam 9 
upaganivi, еко careyya vihareyya iriyeyya  vatteyya 


| Dr kariya, here and below. 
? p» S sampattif[m] vipattii ca. ? Codd. U. 
* Dr ad. аба. 5 В” Капуа; 5 kayirathá. 


$ Codd. akinc?. 


S.N. 822] JT'isscanetteyyasuttan iddeso. To. 


paleyya yapeyya уареууа; evam pabbajjasaiikhátena eka- 
cariyam dalham kareyya. 

Katham ganàvavassaggatthena ekaeariyumn dalhim ka- 
reyya? So evan pabbajito! samáno еко arannavana- 
pattháni? pantani вепаѕапапі patiseveyya uppasaddani 
appanigghosani vijanavátani manussarahaseyyalni pati- 
sallanasaàruppáni?; so еко gaecheyya, eko tittheyya, еко 
nisideyya, еко seyyam kappeyya, еко gàmam playa 
paviseyya, еко patikkameyyua, еко raho nisideyya, еко 
euükamam audhittheyya, еко сагеууа vihareyya irlyeyya 
vatteyy& pileyya yapevys уареууа; evam guuavavaissag- 
gatthena ekaeariyam dalam kareyya ti. 

Ekaeariyam «е karevya, Шпил? hareyya, dalha- 
samādāno 5 assa avatthitasamadano? kusulesu dhummesü 
ti, ekaeartyam dulham Кауїга 7. 

5 Na. nisevetha methunan t. Methunadhammo паша уо 
so asaddhammo gāmadhammo ... pe... tamkárana ? 
vuecabli methunadhammo. Methunadhammam U na se- 
veyya, na niseveyya, па П sanmseveyya, na patiseveyyu, 
па eareyya, Pna samacareyya 2, na samádáya vatteya ti^, 
na nisevetha methunam, Теп’ iha Bhagava : 

Etam adinavam natvà muni pubbapare idha, 

ekaeariyum dalham kayirā, na nisevetha methunan 
ti. 

Vivekañ ñeva sikkhetha, etad ariya- 
nam uttamam; 

tena settho na mañhñethu, sa ve nib- 
baánasantike. 9. 

Vivekaf fiera sikhhetha а. Viveko t tayo viveka, Кауа- 
viveko eittaviveko upadhivivoko. 


! В" pabbajjito orten. ? 8 рабап. 

5 Si ?rüpaui. * Bithinam ; D" S tiram. 
5 В» 5 dalham 5°. 9 Вр «d. assa. 

7 D? kariya ; S kayirütha. 8 3 Sin. 

9? PB? karana, w B*S methunam dh?. 


n Š ad. tam. 12-12 S om. 


158 Afthakavaggo. (S.N. 899 


Katamo káyaviveko? . . . pe... ayam upadhiviveko. 
KRàyaviveko са vnüupakatthakáàyánam ! nekkhammābhira- 
tānam ; eittaviveko ca parisuddhaeittànam paramavodana- 
pattànam 2; upadhiveveko ea nirupadhiuam puggalànam 
visumkháragatànam. 

Sikkhā ti tisso sikkhà, adhisilasikkhà adhieittasikkhà 
adhipaünasikbkhà . . . pe . . . ayam adhipannasikkha. 

Vivekas пега sikkhethā ti vivekañ Deva sikkheyya 
ácareyya samácareyya samadaya vatteyyà ti, vivekan neva 
sikkhetha. 

Etad ariyanam uttaman ti. Aria vuceanti Buddha ca 
buddhas&vakà са paecekabuddhà ea. Ariyānam etam 
aggam settham visettham? pāmokkham uttamam pavaram, 
yadidam vivekaeariya ti, etad ariyanam uttamam. 

Tenat setthó па maññethā ti ° taya  vivekacariyiya ê 
unnatim па Кагеууа, unnamam na? Кагеууа, manam na 
kareyya?, thambhanı na kareyya, na? tena manam janeyya, 
$Shandham na kareyya?, na? tena thaddho assa pat- 
tbaddho? paggahitasiro ti. tena settho na mannetha. 

Na ve nibbanasautike 9 ti so nibbanassa 10 santike 
sámantà аѕаппе avidüre upakatthe ti, sa ve nibbanasantike. 
Теп’ aha Bhagavā : 

Vivekan пета sikkhetha, etad ariyanam uttamam; 
tena ѕе о na maüinetha, sa ve nibbünasantike ti. 


tittassa munino carato kaàmesu ara- 


pekkhino 
oghatinnassa pihayanti kāmesu ga- 
dhità! раја. 10. 


Rittassa munino carato ti. Iittassa!9? 111% rittassa vivit- 


| DU vivekattha?; S vivekakayanam. 

? Br 8 paramavodáànapp*. ? S ad, vimolikham. 
5 В” na tena. 5-5 pr 6 káyaviveka?. $ Son. 
7 Br ad. ашат na kareyya ; S ad. атат na kare. 
5 pr S on. " S tthaddho. ^ 8 niddhana?. 
U Kie Codd.—P.T.S. gathita. 

ТАИ 13 BP от, 


S.N. 823] T'iss«inetteyyasuttaniddeso. 159 


tassa pavivittassa, káyadueearitena rittassa vivittassa pavi- 
vittassa, vaeidueearitena. manodueecaritena rāgena dosena 
mohena kodhena upanáhena makkhena palāsena issàya 
maeehariyena таулула satheyyena thambhena saramllieng 
mānena atimànena madena pamādena sübbakilesehi sabba- 
duccaritehi sabbadarathehi sabbaparilàhehi sabbasantápehi 
sabbákusalübhisamkharehi rittassa vivittassa pavivittasra 1. 
Mnnino ti топат vuceati Dànam, ? уа pannà pajanana? 
... pe... sangajilam atieea so muni’. Carato ti 
carato viharato iriyato vattato* palayato yapayato уарауаіо 
ti, rittassa munino carato. 

Kámesu auapekklino ti. Ката ti uddanato? dve kama, 
vatthukāmā ea kilesakàma cea .. . pe... ime vuccanti 
vatihukàmà . . . pe . . . ime vuccanti lLilesakama. 
Vatthuküme parijānitvā $, kilesakāme pahàya pajahitvà 
vinoditvaà hyantikaritva anabhàvam gamitvà, kàniesu. ana- 
pekkhavà 7, cattakamo vantakamo muttakàmo palhimalámo 
patinissatthakamo vitarago? vantaràgo muttarāge palina- 
тасо patinissattharágo niechato? nibbuto sitibhuto sukha- 
patisainvedi brahmabhütena айапа vibarati ti, kamesu 
anapekkhino. 

Oghatiunassa. pihayanti kàmesu gadhita раја ti. Раја ti 
sattadhivaeanzm. Paja kāmesu rattà giddhà дат muc- 
chità ajjhopanna Јасра laggita palibuddha, ta!? kamo- 
gham M tinnassa, !?bhavogham tinnassa?, ditthogham 
tinnassa,  avijogham  tionnassa, sabbasamkhàrapathiun 
tinnassa uttinnassa ?  nitinnassa !* atikkantassa sama- 
ükkantassa — vitivattassa — páragatassi 15  pàrappattassa 16 


1 S ad. vivittassa. ? B9 S on. 3 Sad. ti. 

+ 5 ad. pavattato. 5 Br Si udànato. 

6 8 pariecajitvà. * B? anapelkkhano. 

8 В" «d. cattaràgo ; S «d. mattarigo. 

9 Š nissato. 10 В’ 8 te, 

n S kamoghatiuuassa, and below ditthoghatinnassa, ete. 
12 12 M oy, 1 Si utinnassa. 

м B» S nittinnassa (better). 15 S parim g*. 


16 B? parapattassa, and below antapattassa, ete; S om. 


160 Affhakavanggo. (S.N. 828 


lantagatassa antappattassa! kotigatassa kotippattassa 2 
3 pariyantagatassa — pariyantappaitassa З — vosanagatnassa 
vosànappattassa tünagatassa tànappattassa lenagatassa 
lenappattassa  saranagatassa saranappattassa abhayaga- 
tassa  abhayappattassa  aceutagatassa  aeentappattassa 4 
amatagatassa amatappattassa nibbanagatassa nibbanap- 
pattassa iechanti sádiyanti patthayanti piheyanti abhi- 
jappanti Yathā inàylkà ánanyam patthenti pihuyanti, 
yatha abadhika arogyam patthenti pihayanti, yathà ban- 
dhanabandha ? bandhanamokkham  patthenti pihayanti, 
yathà даға bhujissam ë patthenti pihbayanti, yathā ? Капіа- 
raddhànam pakkhanna ? khemantabhuümim patthenti piha- 
vanti: evam eva paja kàmesu тайа giddhà gadhità 
muechità ajjhopanna? lagga laggitaà palibuddha, tā? 
kamoghatinnassa bhavoghatinnassa . . . pe . . . nibbàna- 
gatassa nibbanappattassa iechanti sádiyantl patthayanti 
pihayanti abhijappanti ti. ochatinuassa pihayanti kàmesu 
gadhita раја 10. Теп’ аһа Вһавата: 
Rittassa munino carato kamesu anapekkhino 
oghaiinuassa pihayanti kamesu gadhità раја ti. 


П SATTAMO TIBSAMETTEYYASUTTANIDDESO МІТТНІТО 11, 


1—1 8 antam gatassa antam passattassa. 


2 Š kotipattassa, ete. 73 Som. 4 Som, 
5 p? ?baddha. 6 Si bhujjissam. 
77: Be kantaraddhanapakkhandha ; 5 kantaraddhana- 
pakkhanna. 
8 p? ajjhosanná. ° p" 8 te. 10 pr S ad. ti. 


1-1 Be tissametteyyasuttam вабила ; S tissametteyyn- 
sutti sattami. 


АТТНАМО PASURASUTTANIDDESO 


Idh’ eva suddhim?! iti vadiyanti?, 
nünnesu dhammesu visuddh!m ahu, 
уаш nissità, tattha subhaà? vadānā 
paecekusacecesu puthü nivitthà. I: 


Idb eva suddhiis? га апі ti. 9 Ilt eva? зийан 
visuddhim parisuddhin ши ш vimuttim  parimuttim 
vadanti kathenti? bhananti? dipayanti voharanti: sassato 
loko, idam eva saceam, moghanm аййап ti suddhim vi- 
suddhin parisuddhnn muttin vimuttim parimuttim va- 
danti kathenti bhananti dipayanti voharanti, asassato^ 
loko. antavà loko, anantava loko, tam jivam tam sariram, 
aññam jivam anBam sariram, hoti tathagato param- 
marana, na hoti tathágato parammaranà, hoti са na ea 
hoti tathàgato parammarani, n’ eva hoti па па hoti tatha- 
gato рагаттагапа, idam eva saecam, mogham annan ti 
suddhim" visuddhim parisuddhim muttim vimuttim pari- 
muttim vadanti kathenti bhananti dipayanti voharanti ti, 
idh’ eva suddhim iti vàdiyanti. 

Nànnesu dhammesu cisuddhim айй ti. Attano sattharam 
dhammakkhánam сапат ditthim райрада magga 
thapetvi sabbe paravade khipanti ukkhipanti parikkhi- 
panti: so satthà na sabbhannu, dbammo na svākkhāto 29, 
gano na supatipanno !!, ditthi па bhaddikà 12, patipada na 


! $ suddhi. 2 Š vadayanti. * Be S subham. 
+ S suddhi and below suddhi . . . parimutti. 

5—5 Si idha. 9 S om. 
7 5 bhanenti, often. 8 Si assass°, often. 
? S suddhi, . . . parimutti. 10 D? svakhato. 


_ 


n B" S suppatipanno. 2 Ssanditthika. 


161 11 


163 Atthakavaggo. [8.N. 824 


supahhatià, maggo na niyyàniko ; n’ atih' ettha suddhi 
vá visuddhi và parisuddhi và шиі va vimutti và pari- 
mutti và: !n' аі ettha! sujjhanti và visujjhanti và 
parisujhanti và muccanti và vimuecanti và parimue- 
canti va hma nihma omaka 1атака jatukka parità ti 
evam àhamsu evam kathenti evam bhananti evam dipa- 
yanti evam voharanür ti, naññesu dhammesu visuddhim 
ahu. 

Fam піка tattha иа adana ti. 2 Yam nissita ùi? 
Уч satthàram dhammakkhánaim ganam ditthim pati- 
padam maggam »issita sannissità? ата upagata ajjhosità 
adhimutta*. Тана ii sakaàya ауа sakaya khantüyà 
saküya rueiyü вакауа laddhiya. Sabha vadana ti subha- 
vada ° sobhanavádà panditavàda dhiravada © ñanavada 7 
hetuvada lakkhanavadà karanavada thanavada вакала 
laddhiya ti, yam nissita tattha subha vadana. 

Paceekasaccesu puthā пі а ti. Puthū samanabrah- 
mana puthuypeccekasaccesu ніг та patitthita allina upa- 
gata ajjhosita adhimutta : sassato loko, idam eva saccam, 
mogham annan ti nivittha patitthita айтпа upagatà 
ajjhosità adhimuttà, assassato loko . . . pe... n’ eva 
hoti па na hoti tathàgato раташтагапа, idam eva вассал, 
mogham annan ti nivitthà patitthità ара upagatā 
ajjhosità adhimuttà t» paecekasaecesu puthü nivittha. 
Ten' аһа Dhagavà : 


Idh’ eva suddhim iti vàdiyanti, 
nànnesu dhammesu visuddhim аһа, 
yam nissitā, tattha subhà vadana 
paccekasaccesu puthu nivitthà ti. 


! 1 Be na tattha ; S n’ аш. 
? ? Spon. 
5 prànissità ; 5 em. + Sal. ti. 
> 5 sonavàda (sobhana?2) «ud om. subhavádà 
panditavada. 
* В” thiravādā here and p. 164,4. 1. 
* D" nàyavadà kere and р. 164, /. 1. 


S.N. 825] Pasirasuttaniddeso. 163 


Te vàdakama! parisam vigayha 
раТат dahauti mithu annamnannam. 
vadanti te annasità kathojjum 
pasamsakami kusalà vadàna. 2. 


Te vādaąkāmā parisam cigaghü ti. Te rūdakāmā 711 ө 
vādakāmā 2 хадаа vadadhippaya — vàdapurekkhàiá 
vadapariyesananm сагапіа. Parisam rigagha ti khattiya- 
parisam bràhmanaparisam gahapatiparisam samanapari- 
sum З vigayha ogayha ajjhogahetvà pavisivà ti", te 
vadakamà! parisam vigayha. 

Dalam Чайан mithu аййатаййан ti. Мп ti dee 
Jana dve kalahakarakà dve bhandanakárakà dve bhassa- 
karaka dve vivadakaraka dve adhikaranakaraka dve vadino 
dve sallāpakā, te айљатейат ао hinato nihinato 
omakato ТатаКкабо jatukkato parittato deant? passanti 
dakkhanti? olokenti nigehayanti° upaparikkhanti ti, balam 
dahanti mithu aünamannam. 

Vadanti te annasit&?. kathojjau ti. Amir sattharam 
dhammakkhaünam  ganam ditthim — patipadam maggam 
nissita  sannissità? allinà upagatà ajjhosita adhimutta. 
Као хосса kalaho. bhandanam viggaho? vivido 
medhagam ; athavà kathojjan ti anojavanti 10 sā Каћа 20. 
kathojjam vadanti, kalaham vadanti, bhandanam vadanti, 
viggaham vadanti, vivàdam vadanti, medhagam vadanti !! 
bhananti dipayanti voharanti ti, vadanti te annasita !2 
lathojjam. 

Pasaiusaküià kusala adana 9 ti. Dasainisakaáma ti 
pasamsakama 11 pasamsatthikà pasamsadhippáyà pasansa- 
purekkhàra pasamsapariyesanam caranta”. Kusalā гайн 


1 S vadaka. ?-? Si om.: S ti te vàdakà. 

3 S on. + 5 jahanti. 5 S dakkhinti. 

* Š nijjhayanti. ? S aünumannasità. 

5 В” ànasità ; S anissità ( = anissita). 9 Si om. 
10 9 В» піѕакаа; S nis&takà; p. 168, н. 8, both nisākathā. 

u B? Sad. kathenti. 12 S naññasitā. 


13 S vadānan. 14 S pasamsaikämä. 15 S сата. 


1601 Afthakaraqgngo. [5.Х. 825 


ti kusalavada panditavada dhiravada l nanavada? hetuvada 
lakkhanavüdà kāranavādā thanavada 3 sakaya laddhiyà ti, 
pasamsakámsa kusala vadàna. Теп’ aha Вһасаха : 


Te vadakama parisam vigayha 
bilam dahanti mithu annamannam, 
vadanti te anüasità kathojjam 
pasamsakama kusala vadana ti. 


Yutto katháàyam parisáya majjhe 
pasamsam iecham vinighàti hoti, 
apahatasmim pana manku hoti, 
nindaya so kuppati гар аһатевт. 3. 


Yutto kathāyan parisaáya majjhe ti. Khattiyaparisaya và 
bráhmanaparisüya và gahapatiparisaya và samanaparisiya 
vā majjhe attano kathayan yutto payutto ayutto sama- 
yutto sampayutto kathetun ti, yutto kathayam parisáya 
majjhe. 

Pasanmsam lechanÓ vinigháti hoti ti. ^ Pasamsam iechan 
tit pasumis thomanam ?kittim. vannaharlyam? ;eehanto 
sādiyanto patthayanto pihayanto abhijappanto.  Vinighüti 
hoti ti pubb’ eva sallàpà kathamkathi vinigháti hoti: Jayo 
nu kho me bhavissati, paràjayo nu kho me bhavissati ? 
katham  niggaham karissimi?  katham — patikaumam © 
karissami? katham  visesam karissimi? katham pati- 
visesam karissimi ? katham  avedhiyam ? karissimi ? 
Ка Шаш nibbedhiyam? karissàmi? katham chedanm karis- 
sami? katham mandalam karissimi? ti. Evam pubb' eva 
sallapa kathamkathi vinigháti hoti ti, pasamsam iecham 
vinighati hoti. 

Apáhatasmiin рапа manku hot: ti. Ye? te paühavimam- 


і B” thira’. ? p" haya. 
? S atthàna?. 5 4 Siom. 
5-5 $i kittiv?. 6 p" patikammam always. 


7 B" avetthiyam ; S avettiya; see p. 165, L 7 and 
p. 166, /. 16. 
8 Š nibbetthiyam. 9 Ser below p. 166, 1. 9. 


S.N. 820] Pasárasuttautddeso, 105 


saka? рагіѕајја pásanika? te apaharanti, atthápagatam 
bhauitan ti atthato apaharanti, byanjanipugatam bhauitan 
ti byahnjanato apaharanti, atthabyañjanāpagatam ашат 
ti atthabyanjanato apaharanti; attho te dunnito, byan- 
Janan te duropitam, atthabyanjanan te dunnitam duro- 
pitam, niggaho te akato, patikamman? te dukkatum, 
viseso te akato, pativiseso te dukkato, avedhiyà? te akata, 
nibbedhiya te dukkata, chedo te akato, maudalan 5 te 
dukkatam dukkathitam? dubbhanitam dullapitam duruttam 
dubbhaásitan ti apaharanti. Apāhatasmim pana manku 
hoti ti apahatasmim wake hoti, pihto ghattito byat- 
thito Š domanassito hoti ti, apahatasmim pana тайки 
hoti. 

Хіпдауа so kuppati raudliemestii,. ? Niudāyä ti" ninday 
garahaya akittiyà avannaharikaya. 8 Мирра 115 kuppati 
byápajjati patitthiyati Кораћ ea dosan са apaecayan са 
patukaroti ti nindāya so kuppat. 7 Randhamesīi ti? 
randhamesi? virandhamesi aparandhamesi? khalitaumesi 
galitamesi? vivaramesi?? ti, nindàya so kuppati ran- 
dhamesi ti. Теп’ аһа Bhagava: 


Yutto kathayam parisaya majjhe 
pasamsam iecham vinigháti hoti, 
apühatasmim рапа шайки hoti, 
nindaya so kuppati randhamesi ti. 


1 S ad. pariyà (—parisa «as written p. 166, lL 10 ix 
B" and б). 

? В” S pasarika; Бебир. 166, L 10 S pasanita and 
В”, apparently, pasanika. 

3 S patikkaman : below p. 166, 7. 15 patikkammam. 

4 B" avetthiya : 5 avatthiya. 
= 5 Br te dukkatam dukkathitam visamakatham; S te 
kathitam visamakatham dukkatam. Sve p. 166, 1.17. 

9 Br S byádhito. ] Bh Som, 

8-8 S om. ; B? om. ti. 9 Son. 
10 Bion. 


106 Л аагадо. [S.N. 827 


Yam assa vadam parihinam àhu 
apáhatam !paühavimamsakaà yet. 
paridevati socati hinavàado, 
upaceaga man ti anutthunaàti*. 4. 


Yam assa cüdajs parihinem ähū ti. Yam tassa габан 
hinam nihmam parikinaw, parihàpitam na paripüritam 
evam ihamsu evam kathenti evam bhananti evam dipa- 
yanti evam v oharanti ti, yam assa vādam parihinam ahu. 

Араа pathacinaiisakü ye ti. Ye te palihavimam- 
зака? рагіѕајја раѕапіка te apaharanti, atthapagatam 
bhanitan ti atthato apaharanti, byanjanapagatam bhanitan 
ti byahjanato apaharanti, atthabyanjanápagatam bhanitan 
ti attbabyanjanato apaharanti, attho te dunnito, byanjanam 
te duropitam, atthabyatjanam te dunnitam duropitam, 
niggaho te akato, patikamman ie dukkatam, viseso te 
akato, pativiseso te dukkato, àvedhiyà te akata, nibbe- 
dhiya te dulikata, chedo te akato, mandalam te dukkatam 
dukkathitam dubbhanitam dullapitam duruttam dubbhá- 
sitan ti apaharanti ti, apāhatam pañhavimamsakā ye. 

Paridevati socati hinavádo ti. Paridevati ti aññam тауа 
āvajjitam, айбаш cintitam, айдаш upadharitam, айбат 
upalakkhitam; so mabāpakkho mahapariso mahāparivāro 
рагіва càyam vagga na samaggā, samaggāya* *hotu kathā- 
sallàpo?, puna bhaüjissàmi ti буо evarūpo® vācāpalāpo vip- 
palàpo lālappo” lālappāyanā lālappāyitattan ti, paridevati. 
Socati ti tassa jayo ti socati, mayham parajayo ti socati, 
tassa làbho ti socati, inayhain alābho ti socati, tassa yaso 
ti socati, mayham ayaso ti socati, tassa pasamsã ti socati, 
mayham nindā ti socati, tassa sukhan ti socati, mayham 
dukkhan ti socati; so sakkato garukato maānito püjito 
apacito labhi civarapiundapatasenasainaeilapapaeeayalbhe- 
sajjaparikkhārānam, aham asmi asakkato agarukato 


Ц 


1 t Be 8 vimamsakase here and below. 

2 Sen anuttanati; see p. 167, n. б. 

В” S ad. parisa; see p. 165. n. 1. 

B" 8 «d. parisaya. ° 5 p" $ hetukathà*. 
5 уа evarüpa. T 5 Карра. 


es 


S.N. 828] Pastrasuttauiddeso. 167 


amánito apujito anapacito! па läbhi eivarapindapütasená- 
sanagilànapaecayabhesajjaparikkhiarinan ti socati kilamati 
paridevati urattālim kandati sammoham àpajjati ti pari- 
devaii socati. Hīuerādo ti hinaváàdo nihinavado pari- 
hīnavādo parihāņpitavādo na paripūrivādo ti, paridevati 
socati hlnavudo. 

Upaecaqā тан t anntthunáti? ti. So mane vàdena vàdam 
accagā upaccaga atikkanto samatikkanto vitivatto ti evam 
pi spaceugt man ti; athavà vàdena улдап abhibhavitvà 
ajjhottharitvà pariyaditvà madditvā” carati vibarati iriyati 
vabtuti pàleti vapeti yàpeli ti, evam рі upaecaga man ti. 
Anutthiuid?: vaecati vacapalapo vippalipo арро? làlap- 
payana làlappayitattan ti, арассаса man ti anutthunáati. 
Ten аһа Dhagavà : 


Yam assa vàdam paribinain àhu 

apahatam panhavimamsaka ye, 

paridevati socati hinavado, 

upaceagá man ti anutthunáti? ti. 

Ete vivada samanesu јаса, 

etesu ugghàatinighàti hoti, 

etiam pi disva virame kathojjam, 

па” b? annad-atth' «atthi pausamsa- 


labha. 5. 
Еле siráda ѕатанеѕн jātā ti. Samanà ti уе keci? ito 
bahiddhà paribbajupagatà? paribbajokasamapanna?. Ete 
ditthikalahà ditthibhandanà ditthivigsgahà ditthirirada. 
ditthimedhagà sume nesi jit sanjata nibbabta  abhinib- 
раба 10 pātubhūtā ti, ete vivada samanesu jàátà. 
Etesu ngghätinighāti hot? ti. Jayaparàjayo hoti, labhà- 
lābho hoti, yasayaso hoti, nindāpasamsā !! hoti, sakhaduk- 


1 Si appacito. ? S canuttanáti. 
5 pr S maddavitvà. 5 S anuttana. 
> B^ on. ; S lalappa. $ S catutthanati. 
T Bi S na: see below pp. 165, 169. 

^ 5 8 kecito. 9 Som. 


= 
© 


S paribbajasamapauna. п б nindapasanso. 


168 Atthalkavaggo. [ S.N. 828 


kham hoti, somanassadomanassam hoti, Инин ат hoti, 
lanunayapatigham hoti, ?ugghatinighàti hoti?, anuro- 
dhavirodho hoti?; jayena cittam ugghatitam hoti, para- 
jayena eittam nighàtitam? hoti, làbhena cittam ugghatitam 
hoti, alabhena cittam  nighatitam hoti, yasena cittam 
ugghatitam hoti, ayasena cittam nighàtitam hoti, pasam- 
sāya cittam ugghatitam hoti, nindāya cittam nighātitam 
hoti, sukhena cittam ugghātitąam hoti, dukkhena cittam 
nighatitam hoti, somanassena cittam ugghátitam hoti, 
domanassena cittam nighātitam hoti, unnatiya cittam 
ugghatitam hoti, oņatiyā eittam nighatitam hoti ti, etesu 
ugghatinighati* hoti. 

Etam pi discà cirame kathojjan ti. 5Etam pi disvü t1? 
etam &dinavam disvà passitvà tulayitva tirayitva vibháva- 
ууа vibhütam katva ditthikalahesu  ditthibhandanesu 
ditthiviggahesu ditthivivadesu ditthimedhagesü ti. litam? 
pi disvà rirame kathojjen ti.  Kathojjam vucceati kalaho 
bhaudanam viggaho vivado medhagam " ; athavà kathojjan 
ti anojavanü sa? Капа. Kathojjam na kareyya, kalaham 
na kareyya, bhandanam na kareyya, viggaham na kareyya, 
vivàdam па kareyya, medhagam na kareyya, kalahabhan- 
danaviggahavivàdamedhagam pajaheyya vinodeyya byan- 
tikareyya anabhàvam  gameyya, kalahabhandanavigga- 
havivàdamedhagà àrato assa, virato pativirato nikkhanto 
nissattho? vippayutto visamyutto vimariyadikatena!? ce- 
{ава vihareyyà ti, etam pi disvà virame kathojjam. 

Na 'aññad-atth' atthi pasansaläbhaā ti. Pasamsalabha '? 
аййо attho n'atthi attattho và parattho và ubhayattho và, 
ditthadhammiko va attho sampar&yiko và attho, uttàno và 


Д1 


hoti. 


2 2 


Si anunayapatighatinighati hoti anurodhavirodho 


D" ugghatitanigghatitam ; Š na ugghatinigghatitam. 
S nigghatitam here and below. ‚ * S ?nigghati. 
5 Siom.: S evam pi. 9 S evam. 

7 S medhakam, often. 8 See above, p. 163, 7. 22. 
? pri nissato. 19 D" S vipariyadikatena, throughout. 
Ser above, p. 167, и. Т. 12 Sion. 


S.N. 899] Pasürasuttauiddeso. 169 


attho gambhiro và ао, gülho! va attho paticchanno vi 
attho, neyyo và attho nito và attho, anavajjo và attho, 
nikkileso và attho, vodàno va attho, paramattho và attho 
?n'atthi na samvijjati n'upalabbhati? ti, na h'annad-atth' 
atthi pasamsalàbhà. Teraha Bhagavà : 


Ete vivàdà samanesu jàtà, 

etesu ugghatinighati hoti, 

etam pi disva virame kathojjam, 

na? h'ainad-atth' а pasamsalàbhà ti. 


Pasamsito và pana tattha hoti 

аккһауа vādam рагіѕауа majjhe, 

so hassati* unnamati-eea tena 

pappuyya? tam attham yathaà mano 
ahu. 6. 


Pasamsito rà pana tattha hot ti. Tuttha ti sakaya 
ditthiyà sukaya khantiya saküya rueiya sakiya laddhiya. 
Pasamsito .thomito kittito vannito hot? ti, pasamsito và 
pana tattha hoti. 

Дауа садат parisaya. шарне ti. Ihattiyaparisaye 
уй bráhmanaparisaya và gahapatiparisayà và samanapari- 
siya уй тае attano гаа аара acikkhitvaà anuva- 
dam akkhaya ācikkhitvā thambhayitvà brühayitvà dipa- 
yitva jotayitvà voharitvà parigganhitvà ti, akkhaya хадат 
parisaya majjhe. 

No hassati unnamati-eca tenā ti. So tena jayatthena 
tuttho hoti hattho pahattho attamano paripunnasan- 
kappo; athavi dantavidamsakanm hasamàno ti, so hassati. 
Uunamati-eca tenā ti so tena jayatthena unnato hoti 


! Codd. gulho. 
2-2 D" 5 п айы na santi na samvijjanti п upalab- 
bhanti. 
3 Si S (and В" apparently) па. 
3 Si hassati always: Br hasati always; Š bhāseti юг 
so hassati. 
° B" sampuyya always. 


170 Atthakavaqgqo. (S.N. 829 


unnamo dhajo sampaggáho ketukamyata cit(assa ti, so 
hassati unnamati-eca tena. 

Pappuyya tam аат yathämano айй tì. Tun jayat- 
tham? рарриуа pāpunitvā adhigantvā vinditvà patilab- 
hitvà yathāmano айй ti yathāmano ahu, yathācitto 
ahu. yathāsamkappo ahu,  yathàvihhano? аһа ti, 
pappuyya tam attham yathāmano ahu. Ten’ аһа 
Bhagavā : 


Pasamsito và pana tattha hoti 

akkhāya vadam purisàya majjhe, 

so hassati unnamati-cca tena 

pappuyya tam attham yathaümano аһпӣ ti. 


Yà unnati, sā `ssa vighatabhumi, 
manatimanam vadate? pan i eso, 
etam pi disvà nu vivadayetha, 

na hi tena suddhim kusala vadanti. 7. 


Yë ниро ха Issa vighātabhūwi ti. Ya инна unnamo 
dhajo sampaggāho ketukamyata ?eittassa së tassa righüta- 
bli? ugghátabhimi pilanabhümi ghattanabhümi upad- 
divabhümi upasaggabhümi ti, và ошай ва 'ssa vighàta- 
bhūmi. 

Mauaátindnaii radate paw eso ti. So puggalo manañ 
са vadati? atimánaB са vadati? ti, mánatimánam vadate® 
pan’ eso. 

Etam pi dise na virādayethā? ti. Etam àdinavam 
disrā passitvà tulayitvā tiravitvaà vibhāvayitvā vibhütam 
katva, ditthikalahesu ditthibhandanesu ditthiviggahesu 
ditthivividesu ditthimedhagesü? ti, etam pi disvà. Na 


і Баһ. 2 2 $ atitayattam. 
3 В" ?cinnàko. * S carate always; see n. б. 


5-5 Dr S cittassati уа unnati sā tassa vighatabhunud ti 
ва tassa vighatabhumi. 
9 D" carate (thece times); but carati ti; S has carate, 
carati, carati ti, carase. 
7 Be $ vivaädiyetha. 8 5 ?medhakesu. 


Б.Х. 831] Pusürasuttaniddeso. 171 


rirüdeyetha? ti па kalaham kareyya, па Dbhandanam 
kareyya, па vigguham Кагеууа, na vivādamı karevya, 
na medhagam Кагеууа, kalahabhaudanaviggahavivada- 
medhaganm pajaheyya vinodeyya byantikareyya anabhaáviun 
gameyya, kalahabhaudanaviggahavivàdamedlniagà — àrato 
assa, virato pativirato nikkhanto patinissattho 2 vippa- 
mutto? visamyutto vimariyaádikatena cetasà vihareyyà ti, 
etam pi disva na vivàdayetha 1. 

Ха hi teua ўпа kasalà сайдан ti. Kusata ti ye te 
khandhakusalà dhàtukusalà àyatanakusulà patiecasamup- 
püdakusalà  satipatthànakusalà 5 sammappadhànakusalá 
iddhippadakusalà? indriyakusali balakusalà bojjhanga- 
kusala maggakusalà phalakusalā — nibbánakusalà. Те 
kusala ditthikalahena ditthibhandanena ditthiviggahena 
ditthivivádena ditthimedhagena suddhiw 9 visuddhim pari- 
suddhim muttim vimuttim  parimuttim na vadauti nu 
kathenti па? bhananti? па dipayauti na voharanti ti, 
па hi tena suddhim kusala vadanti. Ten’ аһа Bhagavàá: 


Yà unnati, sà 'ssa vighatabhümi, 
manatimanam vadate pan’ eso, 

etam pi disva na vivadayetha, 

na hi tena suddhim kusala vadant ti. 


Suro yathà raja khadàya puttho 
abhigajjam eti patisuram iccham. 
уеп’ eva so tena palehi sūras, | 
pubb’ eva n’ atthi yadidam vyu- 
dhaya. | М. 


Süro риа таја hedàys рио U. Süro ti suro viro 
vikkanto abhirü* achambhi anutrāsi арајахі Ла 
бара puttho ti ràjakhadaniyena, rüjabhojanivena рио 


1 S vivàadiyethà. ? D" S nissato. 

3 Be vippayutto. 4 D" vivàdiyethia : S dayetha. 
5—5 S om. 6 S suddhi . . . parimutti. 

7 D" om. 8 В" süram abrags. 


9 Codd. abhirü. 


172 Aftlakaraggo. [S.N. 832 


posito àpadito patipadito! vaddhito U, süro yathà ràja- 
khadàya puttho. 

-Lbhigajjam eti patisüram. ісећан ti, So gajjanto uggaj- 
janto «bhigajjento eti upeti upagaechati patisūram pati- 
pürisam patisattum patimallam ¿cehanto sádiyanto pattha- 
yanto pihayanto abhijappanto ti, abhigajJam eti patisnram 
iecham. 

Ven! era so tena palehi sūrā? tì. Yew еса so ditthi- 
gatiko ? tena palchi”: ten eva vajat, tena gaccha. tena 
abhikkama?; so tuyham pațisūro pațipūriso patisattu 
patimallo ti, yen’ eva so tena palehi sūra 9. 

Publ! ceva w от yadidam yudhāyā ti. Pubb eva 
bodhiyà mule ye? patisenikarā kilesà patilomakará pati- 
kantakakara  patipakkhakará, te w «ttj па santi па 
samvijanti n' араар, pahina samucehinna vüpa- 
santa patipassaddha abhabbuppattika nanagginà daddhà. 
Уа ат ун ауа ti yadidam yuddhatthaya kalahatthàya ? 
bhandanatthàya viggabatthàya  vivadatthàya  medhagat- 
thàyà t? pabb' eva n`atthi yadidam yudhays. Теп’ аһа 
Dhagawvà : 


Suro yatha rajahbadàya puttho 
abhigajjam eti patisüram iccham, 

уеп’ eva so tena palelhni sura, 

pubb’ eva п’ айт yadidam yudhaya ti. 


Ye ditthim uggayha vivadiyantiiP, 
idam eva ѕассап ti ca váàdiyantl, 
te tivum vadassū™ na hi te “Па atthi 


vidamhi Jate patisenikatta?. 9. 
1 Dr Som. ? J> S süran ti. 

3 3 4 na paleti. 4 Si vajja. 
^ p" atikkama. 9 p" suram. 7 Š ye 'va. 
`В" S pațtikandakarā. 9 Sion. 
0 Be S vivada?. п Codd. vadassu. 


12 S katta ; В” Кама: Š Кабуд. 


S.N. 832] Poasüvasuttauiddeso. 178 


Ye Фп падара  riradiyanti! tìi. Ye 2 атаѕан уа 
ditthiratanam? annatarannataram  ditthigat:m — gahetva 
3uggahitvà ganhitvà ? paràmasitvà abhinivisitvà eira- 
diganti!, kalaham karonti, bhandanam karonti, viggaham 
karonti, vivàdam karonti, medhagam karonti: na {хаш 
imam dhammavinayam ајапаѕі. abam imam dhamma- 
vinayum àjànàmi?; kim tvam imam dhammavinayanm 
ājānissasi? miechapatipanno tvam asi, aham asmi samma- 
patipanno; sahitam me, asahitan te; pure vacaniyani, 
рассһа a&vaca; pacelià vaeanivam, pure атаса; adhi- 
cinnan te viparavattam, aropito te vado, niegahito si, cata, 
vàdappamokkháya mnibbedhehi? và sace pahosi ti, ye 
ditthim uggayha vivádiyanti. 

Idam era saecan. ti ca vidigauti ti. Sassato loko, idam 
era ѕхассат, mogham aññan (0 vädiyauti kathenti^ bhananti? 
dipayanti voharanti. Asassato? loko . . . ре... n' eva 
hoti na na hoti tathagato parammaranàa, idam eva saecam. 
mogham aüBan ti vadiyanti kathenti bhananti dipayanti 
voharanti ti, idam eva saccan ti са vádiyanti. 

Te tram vadassi, na hi te dha? atthi vadamhi jāte pati- 
senikatta ti. Te tram ditthigatike radassñ 1? vàdena 
хадат 19 niggahena niggaham, patikkammena  patik- 
kammam, visesena visesam, pativisesena  pativisesam. 
àvedhiyaya àvedhiyam, nibbedhiyaya nibbedhiyam, ehedena 
chedam, mandalena mandalam ; te tuyham райѕата pati- 
purisà patisattn patimallà ti te tvam vadassu. Na hi te 
'dha!! atthi vàdlamhi jàte patisenikattà ti: rade jate sanjáte 
nibbatte abhinibbatte pàtubhüte ve!? pafisenikatta 13 pati- 


1 B? S vivada?. 


?-? В» dvàsatthiditthi? ; S хава паш ditthi?. 
3 з p» S ganhitvà ugganhitvà. + 5 jànàmi. 
5 S nipajjehi. 6 S om. 
T S bhanenti here and below. 
8 Si assassato as often. 9 D" ca. 
10-10 Si ai. ll Si om.: B^ 8 са. 


12 Br Š ye 'va. 
13 Br kata; S Кака. 


174 Aithakaragqo. [S.N. 832 


lomakattà* patikautakakattà? patipakkhakattà? kalaham 
kareyyun, bhandanam kareyyum, viggaham kareyyum, 
vivádam kareyyum, medhagam kareyyum, te wm «thi na 
santi па samvijjanti n` upalabbhanti, pahinà samuechinnà 
vüpasanta — patipassaddhà ^ abhabbuppattika ñānagginī 
daddha ti, te tvam vadassū na hi te 'dha atthi vadamhi 
јаіе patisenikatta?. Ten’ аһа Bhagavā : 

Ye ditthim uggayha vivádiyanti, 

idam eva ѕассап ti са vādiyanti, 

ie tvam vadassu na hi te 'dha? абі 

vidamhi jàte patisenikatta? ti. 

Visenikatvà рапа ye caraníil 

ditthibi ditthim a&virujjhamaàna, 

tesu tvam "kim labhetho? Pasüra, 

yesidha n atthi param uggahitam. 10. 


Visenikated pana ge caranti ti. Senā упесай шагаѕепа ; 
kàyaduecaritam máraseni, vaeiduecaritam marasena, mano- 
ducearitum шагаѕепа, ràgo? marasena, doso тагаѕепа, 
moho тагаѕепа, kodho upanīho makkho рајаѕо iss 
maechariyum maya sátheyyam thambho sárambho mano 
айшапо mado pamüdo ?sabbe kilesa sabbe duccaritā ” 
sabbe daratha sabke parilaha sabbe santàpà sabbàkusala- 
bhisamkhàr& márasena. 

Vuttam h’ etam Bhagavati : 

* Kama te pathamā sena, dutiyarati vueeati 
ре... jetvà ca labhate sukhan ti. 

Yato са arivimaggehi sabbà са marasena sabbe са 
patisenikara kilesà jità ea parájità са! bhaggà vippa- 


* Sn. 436-439, 


3" ?kata ; S patilomam katvà. 
kati; S patikkantam katva. 
5 B" kata; S patipaklhium Кабул. 


"ре ?katà ; S Каа. 5 p" S ca. 
^ p? айа: S ^katvà. 7 ? pr kieea labhetha. 
8 pr 5 Iobho. 9? 9 S gibbalilesa, sabbaducearità. 
РД 
1) 10 


S от. 


S.N. 894] Pasürasuttuniddeso, 175 


luggà! parammukhà ; tena vuceanti? riseuibatrü? ye 
ti arahanto khinásaváà. (аган ti earanti viharanti iri- 
yanti vattenti pälenti yapenti уарепії ti, visenikatvā pana 
ye caranti. 

рипа dittliy avirujjtamana ti Yesam?. dvasatthi 
ditthigatàni pahinanl samuccehinnàni vüpasantáni patipas- 
saddhani  abhabbuppattikàni mnànaggina daddhàni: te 
ditt hihi ditthim avirujjhamana? aghattiyamànà? appatihan- 
liamánà appatihatamànà ti, ditthihi ditthin avirujjbamānā. 

Tesu tram " kü labhetho?  Pasüra? ti; tesu aru hantesu 
khinàsavesu kim labhetho patisüra" patipurisa patisattu 
patimallà ti, tesa tvam kim labhetho Pasüra ™. 

Yesidha w atti param uggaliitan tì yesam araliantànam 
khigásavànam idam paramam aggam setth;m visettham 
pàmokkham uttamam pavaran ti gahitam parümattham 1 
ajjhositam adhimut&un n'atthi na samvijiati ? n? upalam- 
bhati!?; pahinam samuechinnam vüpasantam patipassad- 
dham abhabbuppattikam nànagginà daddhan ti, yesidha 
п’ atthi param uggahitam. 'Теп'апа Вһасаха: 

Visenikatvà pana ye caranti 
ditthihi ditthim avirujjhamànà, 
tesu tvam kim labhetbo Pasüra, 
yesidha n'atthi param uggahilan ti. 


àtha tvam pavitakkam? agama 
manasa ditthigatáni eintayanto, 
dhonena yugam? samiügami, 

na hi {уаш sakkhasi sampayátave"'. 11. 


1 Si ака; 5 ^lagga. 2 B" vuccati. 
3 S visenimkatvà ti. + 51 S tesam. 
5 Br S ad. ap(p)ativirujjhamana. 

Š B" aghati?; S on. 

T В" kieea labhetha here and below ; S ki lebhetha. 


5 5 pamsurā. 9 D" S patisüram . . . patünallan ti. 
10 B" pasüram. и Be S ad. abhinivittham. 
12 Dv S Santi. 13 Be savitakkam àgama, always. 


^ S sugam mügamma. 
1? Š sampasatave, below ?passatave «nd ?passátave. 


170 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 834 


Atha tram pavitakkam аата tì. ha ti padasandhi 
padasamsaggo padapàripüri akkharasamavayo byanjana- 
silitthatà padānupubbatā-m-etam, atha ti. Pavitakkam 
йлата ii takkento! vitakkento! samkappento!: Jayo nu 
kho me bhavissat, рагајауо nu kho me bhavissati? ka- 
tham niggaham karissàmi? katham patikamman karis- 
simi? ?katham visesam karissàmi? katham pativisesam 
karissimi? katham avedhiyam karissimi? katham nibbe- 
dhiyam karissámi ? katham ehedam karissimi? Каат 
mandalam karissámi? ii evam takkento vitakkento sam- 
kappento agato 'si upàgato 'si sampatto 'si maya saddhim 
sumiügato `si ti, atha tvam pavitakkam āgamā. 

Manasā ditthiyatāni cintayanto ti. Mano? ti yam cittain 
mano mānasam hadayam pandaram mano manayatanam 
manindrivam vinnànam vinhànakkhandho, tajjà mano- 
viliànadhàtu. Cittena diffhigatüni* eintento vicintento; 
sassato loko ti và, asassato loko ti và .. . pe . . . n'eva 
hoti na na hoti tathagato paranimaranà ti và t, manasa 
ditthigatàni cintayanto. 

Dhonena радан samāgamā, na hi tram вааз sampa- 
yātave ti. Dhona ° vuccati раййа; уа panna рајапапа 

. ре... amoho dhammavicayo sammādițthi. Kim- 
kka dhonà vuceati panna? Taya pannáya kayaduc- 
caritam dhutañ ca dhotañ са sandhotan ea niddhotah са 
2.2. pe... sabbákusalàbhisamkhara арша ca  dhotà 
ca sandhotà ca niddhotà ca.  Athavà sammaditthiya 
mieehaditthi? "dhutà са dhota са sandhotà са niddhotà 
€&7 ... pe... sammávimuttiya miechávimutti dhutà 
ca dhotà са sandhotà ea niddhotaà ea: аіаға ariyena 
atthangikena maggenua sabbe akusala?, sabbe duccarità, 
sabbe darathà, sabbe parilāhā, sabbe вапёара, sabbaku- 
ealàbhisiunkhàrà dhutá ca dhota са sandhotà ca niddhotà 
et.  Bhagavà imehi dhoneyyehi dhammehi upeto samu- 


1 Si anto. ? ? Bilan * See above. 
4 D" S ditthim 5 See abore, p. TT. 


6 B" S ad. sammasankappena mieehisañkappo. 
77 B" Som. 5 B" kilesa. 


S.N. 834] Dasürasuttauiddesao, 177 


peto upagato samupagato upapanno samupapaunno! saman- 
nágato: tasmà Bhagavà dhono. So dhutarágo dhutapápo 
dhutakileso dhutaparilàho ti ?dhouo ti”. Dhonena уйпа 
samigama na hi tvam sakkhasi sampayátave ti. Pasūro 
paribbàjako na-ppatibalo dhonena Duddhena Bhagavata 
saddhim  yugam  samágamá? ѕатарапіта yugaggaüham 
ganhitum? sákaechetum sallapitum ѕакассћаш samaàpajji- 
tum. Tam kissa hetu?  Pasüro paribbüjako hino nihino 
omako làmako jatukko? paritto. So hi Bhagavà aggo са 
settho ca visettho ca pümokkho ca pavaro ea.  Yatha 
saso na-ppatibalo mattena mátaügena saddhim  yugam 
samagama samnganiva yugaegaham  ganhitum ; уай 
kotthako na-ppatibalo sihena migaranüa saddhim yugam 
samágamà samágantvà yugaggaham ganhitum; yatha 
vacehako tarunako dhenupako  na-ppatibalo usabhena 
balakkakuná? saddhim yugam samagama samügantvà 
yugaggāham ganhitum ; yathà dhamko na-ppatibalo бага. 
lena venatevyena saddhim yugam saümágamá samāgantvā 
yugaggiham ganbitum; yathà candalo na-ppatibalo тайпа 
eakkavattinà saddhim  yugam ватасата  samàgantvà 
yugaggáham ganhitum ; yathà pamsupisaenko na-ppatibalo 
Indena devaranna saddhim yugam samágama samágantvá 
yugaggiham ganhitum; evam eva Pasüro paribbájako 
na-ppatibalo dhonena Duddhena  Bhagavata saddhim 
yugam младата samagantva yugaggāham ganhitum 
Sükaechetum sallapitum sākaccham samápajjtum. Tam 
kissa hetu?  Pasüro panbbajako hinapaünno nihinapanno 
omakapanno làmakapanno  jatukkapanno  parittapanno. 
Зо hi Bhagavà mahapanno puthupaüno hàsapaüno javana- 
palüo? tikkhapattüo nibbedhikapanto? paünnáppabheda- 
kusalo pabhinnatüàno adhigatapatisambhido catuvesaraj- 
jappatto dasabaladhàri purisàsabho purisasiho purisanago 


t В” 8 sampanno. ? Si on. 
3 Be 8 samigamam. 5 S masitvi. 
^ B» S ehatukko «s изи, 
6 Nic B" Si: S ealukkakunà (balakkatunā 2. 
5 on. 8 S ad. javanapunüo. 
12 


178 Affhakavagqo. [5.N. 834 


purisájaüno purisadhorsyho anantanàno anantatejo anan- 
tayaso addho! muhaddhano dhanava neta? vinelà anunetà 
suüápetà ? mnijjhapetà pekkhatā * pasáretà *. So hi 
bhagavi anuppannassa maggassa uppadeta, usanjatassa 
maggassa вайјапеіа, anakkhátassa maggassa akkhata, 
maceannü maggavidu maggakovido; magganugá са 9pan' 
assa elarahi? savakáà viharanti расесһа saümannágatà. So 
hi Bhagavà jànam jānāti, passam passati, cakkhubhüto 
Bnànabhüto dhammabhüuto brahmabhüto таба pavatta, 
atthassa піппе?а, amatassa data, dhammasami* tathagato. 
№ atthi tassa Dhagavato aññātam 8 adittham aviditam 
asaechikatam  aphusitam? pannaya; atiam  anágatam 
paecuppannam  upadaya варре dhamma  sabbákarena 
Buddhassa Bhagavato nànamukhe apàátham agaechanti: 
yam kiüci neyyam!? nama atthi? janitabbam, attattho 
và parattho và ubhayattho và, ditthadhammiko уа attho 
samparāyiko và ао, uttano và attho gambhiro và attho, 
gūlho?? va attho patieehanno va attho, neyyo và attho nito 
уа attho, anavajio và attho, nikkileso và або, vodàno và 
attho, paramattho và attho!?, sabban tam anto buddhanáue 
parivattati. ™ Sabbam kayakammain 3 Duddhassa Bhaga- 
vato hànanuparivattati P^, sabbum vacikammam nànànupari- 
vattat, sabbam manokammam náànànupartvattatl. Atīte 
Buddhassa Bhagavato appatihat:m ñānam, anagate Bud- 
dhassa Bhagavato appatilatam nanam,  paccuppanne 
Duddhassa Bhagavato appatihatam ñanam. 

Yavatakam  neyyam taāavatakam йарат, vavatakani 
Dànam tavatakam neyyum; neyyapariyantikam manam, 
nànapariyantikam neyyam. Neyyam atikkamitvà папа 


l Codd. addho. 5 ninneta. 


3 p" pañnapeta. 1 S upekkheta. 

° В" 5 pasādeti. “t Mi pana etarahi. 
7 8 dhammassimi. ^ Sb anatam. 
"pr S aphussitam. 10 S neyyam, лемен. 
no pe S ad. dhammam. 12 Codd. gulho. 

7 Si onm. 14 11 6 sabbakaya?. 
15 


pr» давати, 


S.N. 834 | Dusitrasuttaniddeso, 179 


na-pparivattati!, nànam atikkamitva neyyapatho n’ atthi, 
alnamahiüapariyantatthayino te dhammi. Yatha dvinnam 
samuggapatalànam sanmáphusitànam ? hetthiniun samng- 
gapatalam uparimam nátivattati, uparimam sanuggeapa- 
talam hetthimam  nàtivattatt, annamannaparlivantatthà- 
yino; evam eva DBuddhassa Bhagavato neyyan са nanan 
са nhnamannaparyantatthayino :  yàvatakun — neyyam 
tivatakam nünam, yavatakam йапаш tavatakam neyyanmı ; 
neyyaparlyantlham nanam, nànapariyantikam neyyamn, 
neyyam  atikkamitvà Dànam  na-pparivattati ^, nanam 
atikkamitvà neyyapatlio n' atthi; annamaünapariyan- 
tatthàyino te dhanima. 

Sabbadhaminesu Buddhassa Dhagavato ñanam pavattati, 
sabbe dhammàa Duddhassa Dhagavato àvajjanapatibaddha 
akamkhapatibaddhaà | manasikarapatibaddhà — cittuppáda- 
patibaddhà, sabbasattesu Duddhassa DBhagavato nàmun 
pavattati; sabbesam * sattanam Dhagavà? āsayun © jānūi 
anusayam jànàti caritam }апай adhimuttim jànàáti, appaia- 
jakkhe mahàrajakkhe tikkhindrive mudindrive svákare 
dvàkàre suvinnipaye duvinnàpaye bhabbábhabbe satte 
pajanáti. Sadevako loko ѕатагако sabrahmako* sassa- 
munabrühmani? paja sadevamanussi anto buddhanàáne 
parivattati, Yathā ye keci macechakaechapa antamaso 
timitimingalam upadaya anto mahásamudde? parivattanti: 
evam eva sadevako loko samürako? sabrihniako* sassa- 
inanabrahimani? pajà!? sadevamanussà anto buddhanàne 
parivattati. Yathà ye keei pakkhi antamaso garulam 
venateyyam  upüdaya! акаѕаѕѕа padese parivattanti !?, 
evan eva ye pl te S^àrputtasamàpannaya!? te! pi 


! B" па pavattati; S na-ppaxattati. 
2 p" sammáphuss? ; 5 sammávass?. 


з Be S na-ppavattati. 3 S od. ca. 

5 Son. 9 B" anusayam. * S a. loko. 
° D" sasamana’. 9 5 «d. udakim. 
? $ рајата. и pro anto. 
1? Dr $ parivattati. 13 Si °дыпдраййа. 


u 5 уара. 


180 Afthakaraquo. [ S.N. 884 


Duddhañanassa padese parivattanti. Duddhananam deva- 
manussinam painam pharitvà abhibhavitva! titthati?. 
Ye pi te khattiyapaudità bráhmanapandita gahapati- 
paudità samanapandità nipunà kataparappavada vàlave- 
dhirüpà vobhindantà? шаййе caranti pannágatena ditthi- 
galàni, te pañhe abhisamkharitvà abhisamkharitvà tatha- 
gatam upasamkamitvà pucchanti * gülháni са patiechannàni 
cat, Баа Sea visajjità са te paüha Bhagavata? honti 
nidditthakarana © upakkhittaka" ea. Те? Bhagavato sam- 
pajjanti. Atha kho Bhagava? tattha atirocati 1° yadidum 
pannáya ti, dhonena yugam 1! samágamà na™ hi tvam 
sakkhasi sampayátave. Теп’ aha Bhagavà : 

Atha tvam pavitakkam 12 адата 

manasa ditthigatani cintayanto, 

dhonena yugam samagama, 

na hi tvam sakkhasi sampayàtave ti. 


АттнАмо!% PasUnasuTTANIDDESO! wrTIHiTO. 


1 б ad. abhibhavitvà. 2 B? ad. yeva. 

3 B" S te bhindantà. 44 бі ор. 

^ S vajjikà са dho panca bhagavato. 

$ S karaka. 7 S ?khittata. 

E S tena (tena 2). 9 B" ad. va; Š ad. ca. 
10 S агосай. 1—11 S samàgamauam. 
1? Ву sa? (as before). 13 Br Š om. 


H S pasurasutti atthamo niddeso. 
1 В" S samatto. 


NAVAMO! MAGANDIYASUTTANIDDESO?. 


Disvàna Tanham Aratin ea? hagami 
nàhosi chando api methunasumim; 
kim’ ev? idam muttakarisapunnum, 
рада pi nam samplusitum na ieche. 1. 

Discana Taulun Arati са? Науат. nühosi chando api 
methunasimin ti Tanhan са 5 Aratiñ са Касал ca máradhitaro 
disvà passitvà?, methunadhamme chando ха rágo và 
решат và nàhosi ti, disvàna Tauham Aratin ca Ragam 
náhosi chando арі methunasmim. 

Kiw ev idan muttakurtsepuuuais pada pi nam sam- 
риш na ieche ti kim’ ev’ idam sariram? muttapunnam 
karisapunnam semhapunnam rudhirapunnam* atthisam- 
ghàtam — nhàrusambandham? — rudhiramamsavalepanam 
cammávaniddham 9  chaviyà  patiechannam — ehiddáva- 
chiddam uggharim !? maggharim !! kimisamghanisevitam 12 
nanákalimalaparipürum | pàdena akkamitum na iechey- 
уат 8 Kuto pana samváso và samügamo và ti, kim ev' 


| B? Б on. 

2 B" mágandikasutti anukkati; Š  maggandiyasutta 
ti anukkati. 

3 бош. * $ «d. ca. 

? 5 5 arapunnam karisapunnam semhapunuam. 

б Si om. ; Š «ad. some words from the jollowing 
seutence. 

* B? 8 ruhirap?. > S nahàrus?. 

? Sie Si c.l; Si canmavinaddham : B" cammāvinan- 
dham; 8 eammavanandam. 

1 p" $ uggharantam. п В'8 paggharantam. 

12 S ?saghanisevitain. 13 p» S iecheyya. 

151 


1:2 Atthakaragyo. [S.N. 835 


idam muttakarisapunnam pada pi nam samphusitum na 
icche. 
lAnaechariyañ 2 œ etam manusso? yam 4 dibbe kāme 
patthayanto màánussake Кате na iecheyya, manussake 
và kame patthayanto dibbe Кате na iecheyya: yam tvam 
ubho pi na iechasi, na sádiyasi na patthesi na pihesi 
nübhijappasi, kin te dassanam, katamàya tvam ê ditthiya 
samannagato? ti pucchati? til. 
Ten’ аһа Bhagavà: 
Disvàna Tanham Arati ea Ràgam 
nàhosi chando api methunasmim : 
kim! ev! idam muttakarisapunnam, 
pada pi nam samphusitum na ieche ti. 
Eiüdisan ce ratanam па icechasi? 
пагїт nàrindehi bahüuhi patthitam, 
ditthigatam silavatànujivitam? 
bhavüpapattin ca vadesi kidisam. 2. 


Idam vadàmi ti na tassa hoti 
Màgandiyà ti Bhagavā 
dhammesu? niecheyya samuggahitam, 
passan!? ca ditthisu anuzgahaáya 
ajjhattasantim расіпат adassam. 3. 


Idan vadàmz ti na tassa hoti ti. Idam гадар? ti idam 
vadāmi, etam vadami, ettakam vadāmi, ettāvatā vadāmi, 
H idam ditthigatam vadāmi”, sassato loko ii vā. 
pe... w eva hoti па na hoti tathāgato parammarana 
ti vā 022, Na tassa hot? ti na mayham !? !* hoti ettāvatā 
vadāmi ti na tassa 4 holi ti, idam vadāmi ti na tassa hoti. 


11 Sion. 2 D" anieeariyan: Š aniccayañ. 
3 p" mānusso. 4 В” ош. 5 В” två. 
9 S vuceati. 7 B" iechati. 
E B" silavatam nujivitaum ; Š silabbatam nujivitam. 
°З 5 na ea dh°. w p" $ sayan. 
How So, 12 B" S om. 
12 


8 ad. na mayham. 11-11 Si om. 


S.N. 887] Maásidigasuttauiddeso. 153 


Mágandiya ti Dhagaci tam brahinanan namena alapati. 
Dhagurá ti güruvadhivacanam! . . . pe. . . васса 
райћайі; yadidam Bhagavà ti, Magandiyà ti Bhaguva. 

Dhammesu? nicchegga sauuuggahitauti. Dhammesu? dvasat- 
шуа ditthigatesu. Niccheyyā ti niechinitva?  vinicchi- 
nitvà ^ vieinitvi б pavicinitvi © tulayitvà tirayitva 7 vibhà- 
vayltvà vibhütanm katva, odhiggaho? vilaggàho varaggülio " 
kotthásaggàho uecuyaggaho samuccayaggàho: idani васса 
taceham tatham bhütam yathavam aviparittan ti gahitam 
parimattham abhinivitthim  ajjhositun adbimuttam и” 
atthi?" na samvijati w upalabbhati; pahinam sumue- 
ehinnàm vüpasantam patipassiddham abhabbuppattikam 
папасоіпа daddhan tit, dhammesu niecheyya samug- 
gahitam. 


DPassan 12 


са diffhisu anuggahügà ti ditthisu. àdinavam 
раѕвапіо ditthiyo па ganhami na рагатазаті па P? 
abhinivisàmi. Athavà na ganhitabbà na paramasitabbà 
na? abhinivisitabbà ti9, eviun pi passan 12 ca ditthisu 
anuggahaya. Аата sassato loko, idam eva saceam 
mogham аййап ti ditthigatam etam,  ditthigahanam 
ditthikantàro ?  ditthivisükayikam — ditthivipphanditam 
ditthisamyojanam sadukkham savighátam sa-upáyásam ? 
saparililiam, na nibbidháya 1б, па viragàya, na nirodháya, 
na upasamiya, na abhiünaya, na sambodhaya, na nibba- 
naya sainvattati ti ditthisu adinavam passanto, ditthiyo 
па ganhümi, па paràmasàmi, па abhinivisami. Athava 
na ganhitabbà na pariümasitabbà, 1 па abhinivisitabba 1 
ti, evam pi passan 12 ca ditthisu anuggaháya. 


S ud. арі ca. ? D^ па са dh ; S nadh. 


1 

3 S ad. ti (°sü ti). 4 S nieehinditva. 
5 Si vinicchitvi; Š om. 9 Š om. 

7 Bi от. 8 5 odisaggáho. 9 S рага“. 
0 В» S ad. па santi. п S ad. па са. 

1? Dr S sayan. 13 В» S nabh?? here und below. 


14 S^kantàram, here and below, p. 6, 1. 
15 S upayasam. 
16 S nibbida. 17-1? Б anabhi*. 


184 Atthakavaqgo. [ S.N. 837 


Asassato! loko, antava loko, anantavà loko, tam jivəm 
tam sariram, aññam jivam anham sariram, hoti tathàgato 
parammarana, na hoti tathagato DU E hoti са 
na са hoti tathàágato parammaraná, n° eva hoti па na hoti 
tathagato parammarana, idam eva saecam, mogham 
айпап ii ditthigatam etam ditthigahanam ditthikantàro 
ditzhivisükaylkam 2 ditthivipphanditam ditthisamyojanam 
sadukkham  savighatam  sa-npàyasam sapariláaham, па 
nibbidhàya?, na virágàya, na nirodhüya, na upasamáya, 
na abhinnaya, na sambodbàya, na nibbànàya samvattati 
ti ditthisu + àdinavam passanto, ditthiyo na gauhàmi, па 
parámasümi, na abhinivisàmi. Athavā na ganhitabbà, 
па paràmasitabbà, na abhinivisitabbà tj, evam pi passañ 5 
са ditthisu anuggaháya. Athava ima ditthiyo evam- 
galiità evam-paramatthà evam-gatika? bhavissanti* evam- 
abhisamparàyà ti ditthisu adinavam раѕѕвапіо, ditthiyo 
па ganhàmi, na paramasami, na abhinivisàmi. Аф ауп 
na ganhitabbà, na parámasitabbà, па abhinivisitabbà ti, 
evam pl passah? ea ditthisu anuggaháya. S9AÀthavà ima 
ditthiyo nirayasamvattanikà?? tiracchánayonisamvattanikà 
pittivisayasamvattanikaà ti ditthisu ádinavam  passanto 
ditthiyo na ganhāmi, па paramasümi, nübhinivisami. 
Athavà па ganhitabbà, na parámasitabbà, nàbhinivisitabba 
ti, evam рі passaii? са ditthisu anuggaháya. 

Athavà ima ditthiyo anieeà samkhatà patiecasamup- 
panna khayadhammáà vayadhammá viragadhamma niro- 
dhadhamma ti ditthisu ádinavam passanto ditthiyo na 
ganhami, na paràmasámi, nàbhinivisami.  Athavà na 

ganhitabbà, na paràmasitabbà, nàbhinivisitabbà ti 1, evam 
pi раѕвай 10 ea ditthisu anuggaháya. 


! Be S гейш athava sassato loko. 


2 pr S ?cisukam. 3 5 nibbidaya. 
5 idam. 5 p" S savah. 
"Op? N "galntà. 
7 Bi bhavanti ; S vasanti. 
8 8 BS ош. down to the second Jollowing athavà. 
5i nirlya?. 10 p" вауай. n Som. 


9 


S.N. 838] Magandiyasuttaniddeso., 185 


Ajjlattasantin pacinan adassan ti ?ajjhattun santim 2, 
ajjhattam rágassa santim, dosassa santim, mohassa santin, 
kodhassa прапаһаѕѕа makkhassa palàsassa iss&ya mac- 
ehariyassa màyüya sütheyyassa? thambhassa saramblassa 
mánassa atimánassa madassa! pamadassa sabbakilesinam 
sabbadueearitanam — sabbadarathanam — sabbaparilalhianam 
sabbasantüpinam —sabbákusalabhisamkhárànam — sautim? 
vüpasantim nibbutim patipassaddhim. 

Pacinan? ti pacinanto vieinanto? pavieinanto? tula- 
yanto tirayanto vibhàvayanto vibhütam karonto. Sabbe 
samkhārā апеей ti pacinanto? vicinanto paviemanto * 
tulayanto tirayanto vibhavayanto vibbūtam — karonto. 
Sabbe samkhára dukkhà ti, sabbe dhammà апама ti? 
pe... yam kinei samudayadhammam sabban tam niro- 
dhadhamman ti расіпапіо vieinanto pavieinanto? tula- 
yanto tirayanto vibhávayanto vibhütam karonto. 

Adassan ti adassam adakkhim ! passim 1° pativijjhin '* 
ti, ajjhattasantim расіпаш adassam?. Теп аһа Bhagava: 

Idam vadāmi ti na tassa hoti 
Magandiya ti Bhagava 
dhammesu P? niecheyya samuggahitam, 
passaü!? ea ditthisu аписсаһауа 
ajjhattasantim paeinum adassam ti. 
Vinieehayà yani pakappitàni. 
iti Maàgandiyo 
te ve" muni brüsi anuggahava, 
ajjhattasanti ti yam etam attham 
katham nu dhirehi paveditan tam. 4. 


1 8 ?sandhi bere and below. 2 ? Sion. 

3 В” sádheyyassa. * Si sadassa. 

5 Sad. upasandhi (= upasantim). $ D" santim p°. 
T Som. 8 5 pacinanto. 9 Бі от. 

1? B" Sad. pacinanto vieinanto pavicinanto «ud on. pe. 
n S adukkhi. 12 Br apassim: S om. 
13 nog 


S pativijjhan. S ad. và. 
1? В” 8 па ea dh*. 16 pr 6 sayan. y Sce. 


186 Atthakavagqgo. [ S.N. 888 


Vinicchagá манї pakappitànz ti. Vinicchaya vuceanti 
dvàsatthi ditthigatàni ditthiviniechaya ?. — Pakappitami ti 
Карра ? abhisamkhatà  santhapita ti pi pakappità. 
Athavà anicea sumkhata patieeasamuppanna khayadhamma 
vayadhammā virüigadhamma * nirodhadhamma vipariná- 
madhammà ti pi pakappità ti. vinicehayá yani pakap- 
pitaui. 

Iti Méágaudiyo tì. Iit ti /padasandhi? . . . pe 
padanupubbata-m-etam, iti ti. 

Те ce nao brüsi anwjgalaya ajjttasauti ti * jam ctam 
айан А". Te ce ti dvásatthi ditthigatàni. Manī ti 
топат vueeati nanam . .. pe... sangajülam atieca so 
muni ti Anuggahãyä ti. Ditthisu àdinavam  passanto 
ditthiyo na ganhámi, na parámasàmi, nübhinivisami? ti 
pagganhasi?. jjkattasanti ti ca bhanasi. Yam etam 
atta» ti уаш paramatthan ti, te? ve? mum brūsi 
anuggahiaya, ajjhattasanti!? ti yam etam attham. 

Каат nu drehi pavedituu tun ti. КаПо Упа ti” 
samsayapuecha!? vimatipucchā dvelhakapuecha anekam- 
sapuecha??, Evam nu kho, !*na nu kho, kin nu kho ", 
katham nu kho ti, katham nu. 

Dhürehi ti? panditehi paünavantehi buddhimantehi 
ñanihi vibhàvihi medhaàvihi. Paveditan ti veditam pave- 
ditam !9 eikkhitam desitam  pannhapitam patthapitam 


1 Si viniechayáni. 2 Si от. 
3 B" S ad. pakappita. а B? ?dhammani. 


5 Б> S om. pe and ad. padasamsaggo padapàripuri 
akkliarasamaviyo byanjanasilitthata. 

9 B" Б «ad. Mágaudiyo ti tassa bráhmanassa патат 
samkhàá samaünatti voháro. Iii Mágaudiyo ti. 


qer S ө. 8 S oni. 
9 D” S ош. and ad. са bhanasi. 10 S ud, ti. 
"noH py, 1? B? padasam. 
15 S ad. kim nu kho. 14—14 S от. 


5 S ad. dhirehi. 
lÚ S om. 


S.N. 889] Mäāgandiyasuttaniddeso. 157 


vivaritam 1 vibhajitam ? uttanikatam pakāsitan ti, kathan 
nu dhirehi paveditan tam. Ten аһа Dhagava?: 


Viniechayà yani pakappitāni, 

iti Magandlyo 
te ve muni brüsi anuggahīya, 
ajjhattasanti ti yam etam attham 
katham nu dhirehi ' paveditan tam 42 


Na ditthiyáà na sutiyà na йапепа, 
Magandiyà ti bhagava 

silabbatena рі па suddhim аһ 

aditthiyaà assutiyàá? ahani? 

asilata abbatà?* no pi tena, 

ete ca nissajJu anuggubhaya 

santo anissiyu bhavam na jappe?^ 9. 


Хи «уа uu sutiyā na їапеиа ti. Ditthen& pi 
suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim muttim vimutthn pari- 
шибит n' aha, na kathesi, na bhanasi, na dipayasi, na 
voharasi. Sutena pi suddhim visuddhin  parisuddhim 
mattin vimuttim parinuttim n’ аһа, па kathesi, na 
bhanasi, na dipayasi, na voharasi. " Ditthasutena pi 
suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim muttim vimuttiur pari- 
muttin n’ aha, na kathesi, na bhanasi, na dipayasi na 
voharasi?. Хапепа pi suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim 
muttim vimuttim parimuttim n’ аһа, na kathesi. na 
Һһаџаѕі 10, na dipayasi, na voharasi ti, na ditthiyà na 
suliyà na nanuena. 

Májandiyà ti Bhagará tam brihmannm nàmena ülapati. 
Bhagavá ti gāravādhivacanam . . . pe . . . васса 
palnatü, yadidam Bhagavà ti, Màgandiyá ti Bhagavī. 


1 В" vivaratam ; 5 vivatam. 


2 Bv S vibhattam. 3 pr ad. brahmano. 
4-4 В” paveditatam ; S paveditan ti. 
5 5 asutiyà. 9 S alinana. 


* S abhabbatà here «ud below. 5 S jappeyya. 
9-9 5 om. 10 S bhunesl их optou. 


188 Affhakavagqo. (S.N. 839 


Süabbateut pi na suddhim ана ti silena pi suddhim 
visuddhim parisuddhim muttim vimuttim parimuttim n' 
аһа, na kathesi, na bhanasi!, na dipayasi ?na voharasi*. 
Vattena? pi suddhim visuddhim  parisuddhim  muttim 
vimuttim parimuttüm n’ aha, na kathesi, na bhanasi, na 
dipayasi,na voharasi. Silabbatenà? pi suddhim visuddhim 
parisuddhim muitim vimuitun parimuitim n’ aha, па 
kathesi, na bhanasi, na dipayasi, па voharası ti, silab- 
batena pi па suddhim ара. 

Adiffhiyü assutigà? añānā® asiluta ablata? no pi tenā ti. 
Ditthi pi iechitabbá, даѕауа ака sammáàditthi: ай 
dinnam, atthi yittham, attbi hutam, atthi sukatadukka- 
{апаш kammánam phalam уірако, atthi ayam loko, atthi 
paro loko, atthi mata, atthi pitā, atthi sattà opapatihà, 
atthi loke samanabrahmanà sammaggataà? sammapati- 
pannā, ye imañ ea? lokam paran ca lokam sayam ? 
abhinBbà sacchikatvà pavedenti ti. 

Savanam pi iechitabbam : parato ghoso, suttam geyyam 
veyyakaranam gāthā udànam itivuttakam !! jatakam abbhu- 
tadhammam 2° vedallam. 

Sanam pi iechitabbam : kammassakatam !? ñanam saccá- 
nulomikam P ñamam abhinna лапат samápattinànam 5. 

Silam pi iechitabbam: patimokkhasamvaro 1б, 

Vattam pi iechitabbam : аа dhutangàni, arannikaüngam 
pindapatikaügam pamsukülikahgam tecivarihkahgam sapa- 
dànaearikaügam khalupacehábhattikangam nesajjikangam 
yathasanthatikangam. 

ithiy assutija!* апана asiluta «аа? по pi tenā 


1 S bhanasi ti. 2-2 S om. 

3 Sj уаМепа, + p" S silabbatena. 
5 B asutiyà. "5 аћпара. 

7 S abhabbataà. 5 B" samaggatà; 5 sammagata. 
9 Son. 10 Spon. DOS dt пака. 

12 Codd. Ааа. 7 Si S ?kata?. 

1% Si Sannlomika” . 15 S samapattiyu n^. 
186 S al. yi. 7 Dr $ asutiya. 
18 


5 annana. 


S.N. 839] Magandiyasuttaniddeso. 155 


ti na рі !sammaditthimattena, na pi! *savanamattena, 
па рі“ nánumattena, na 3 pi? silamattena, па? pi* vatta- 
iuattena ajjliattasautipatto hoti, па pi vina etehi dham- 
шећі ajjhattasantim pāpnnāti; api са sambhàrà ime 
dhammà honti* ajjhattasantim  papunitum adhigantum 
phusitum 5 saechihatun ti aditthiyà assutiya? айапа? 
asllata abbatà no pi tena. 

Ete ca nissajja8 anuggahaja ti ete? kanhapakkhikanum 10 
dhammánam samugghatato pahánam icchitabbam. Tedha- 
tukesu kusalesu? dhammesu utammayata M ijechitabba. 
Yato kanhapakkhiki?? dhammà samusghatapahánena 
pahimaà honti nechinnammula tülàvatthukatà anabhàvam- 
паа àyatim anuppaádadhammià, tedhatukesu ea kusalesu 
dhammesu абашшауа 18 hoti. Ettávatà рі na ganhāti, 
na parámasati, nabhinivisati. Аата na? ganhitabbà, na 
pwáànmasitabbà, nabhinivisitabbà ti, evam pi ete ca" 
nissajja anuggaháya. Yato?! tanhà са ditthi са 19 mano 
са pahina honti, uechinnamnlà tàlàvatthukatà anabhavam- 
gati ayatim anuppàdadhamma", ейахаіа pi па gauhati, 
па paramasati, nabhinivisati ti, evam pi ete са nissajja 
anuggahàya. Yato puünabhisamkhàro ca apunnàabhisam- 
khàro ea 18 ánenjábhisamkharo ea? pahina honti, ucchin- 
пама tàlàvatthukatà anabhavamgata āyatim anuppada- 
dhanmmáà, ettàvatà рі na ganhati,na parimasati, nübhini- 
visati ti, evam pl ete ca nissajja anuggahàya. 

Santo anissdya bharam па jappe ti. Santo ti rügassa 
santattà 9 santo, dosassa santattà santo, mohassa santattà 


t$ 


1 1 S ?matenàpi. ? S sevanamattenapi. 


3 бот. 3 S hoti. 

5 B" phassitam; S assitum. 5 5 asutiyà. 

? S aniiana. 8 5 nisajja. 

9 B" ete ti; S etehi. 10 $ *pakkhiyánam. 
1 5 akampakamyathà. 12 S бракка. 

3 Be ukammayata : S akammakam yathà. 

N S na. 5 B" S ad. са. 

16 B» S on. U Sd. ti. 13 -18 Š om. 


19 B" S samitattà throughout. 


190 Attlalavaqngo. [5.N. 839 


sunto, kodhassa upanàáhassa makkhassa palásassa іѕвауа 
maceeharlyassa inüyüya sàtheyyassa thambhassa süáram- 
bhhassi manassa atimánassa madassa pamàádassa sabba- 
kilesanam sabbaduecaritànam sabbadarathanam sabbapari- 
làhànum sabbasantipànam — sabbaükasalàbhisamkhàrànam 
santattà samitattà vüpasanntatta vijjhütatta  nibbutattà 
vigatattà patipassaddhattà santo!  vüpasanto nibbuto 
patipassaddho ti, santo. 

-nuissayá ti dve nissaya, tanhünissayo ca ditthinissuyo 
ва... pe... ayam tubanissayo .. s ре... ayam 
ditthinissayo.  Tanhánissayam  pahàya, ditthinissayam 
patinissajjitvà, eakkhum anissáya, sotam anissaya, ghànam 
апіѕѕауа, ]Ivham anissaya, kayam anissiya, manam anis- 
siya, rupe sadde gandhe rase photthabbe kulam ganam 
avasam lübham yasam pasamsam sukham civaram pinda- 
pàtam — senasanam — gilànapaccayabhesajjaparikkhàram 
kàmadhatum  rupadhatum — arüpadhütum — kámabhavam 
rüpabhavam arnpabhavam  sannaàbhavam  asannabhavium 
nevasabhánásannabhavam  ekavokarabhavam | eatuvokàára- 
hhavam pancavokárabhavam айт anaágatam  paecup- 
pannam  ditthasutamutavinnatabbe dhamme? anissaya 
aganhitva aparamasitva abhimnivisitva ti, santo anissáyn. 

Bharam na juppe ti kümabhavam na jappeyya, rüpa- 
bhavam mna jappeyya, arüpabhavam па jappeyya, З па 
pajappeyya?, па abhijappeyyá ti, santo anissüya bhavam 
па јарре. Теп’ aha Bhagavà: 


Ха 4101 һуа па sutiya na дапепа, 

Magandiy& ti Bhagavā 
silabbatenà pi na suddhim àha 
aditthiya assutiyi? anànà? 
asilatā abbati no pi tena, 


ü 


ete" ca nigssa]]a anuggahiya 


santo anissaya bhavin na jappe ti. 


L DP qd. apasanto. ? S om. 33 бот, 
4 Susntlya as insu. " S annànà «s usual. 


96 S ad. na. 


S.N. 840] Māyqaudigasotlaniddeso. 191 


No ce kira ditthiya na sutiva na 
nanena 
iti Mágandiyo 
silabbatená pi tna suddhim! апа 
aditthiyà assutiva? aünána? 
asilatà abbata* no pi tena, 
mannám'? aham momuhim eva dham- 
mam, 
ditthiya еке paccent: suddhim. 6. 


No ce kira dit!liiy& na зна na йанена ti ditthiya pi 
suddhim visuddhim parisuddlim muttim vinutiiui pari- 
mnttim 9n' aha °, na kathesi, na bhagasi, na dipayasi, 
ла voharasi?. $Sutena pi suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim 
muttim vimuttim parimuttim ?n' aba, na kathesi, na 
bhanasi, na dīpayasi, na voharasi^.  Ditrhasutena pi 
suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim ?muitim vimuttim pari- 
ши т n' aha, na kathesi, па bhanasi па dipavasi, па 
voharasi?. Хапепа pi suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim 
ш ш vimuttim. parimuttin n’ aha, na kathesi, na 
bhanasi, na dipayasi, na voharasi ti, no ce kira ditthiya 
па sutiyà na nànena. 

Iti Mágandigo ti. Iti à padasandhi . .. ре... Sanu- 
pubbata-mn-etam, ity 15. Лаан уо ti tassa br&hmanassa 
naman ” ti, iti Magandiyo?. 

Хаана pi па хни Qha ti suena pi suddhim 
visuddhim parisuddhim??; vattena?! pi suddhim visuddhim 
parissuddhim 19° silabbatenà pi suddhim visuddhim pari- 
suddliimm muttim vimuttim parimuttin: m аһа, na. kathesi, 
ha bhanasi, па dipayasi, па voharasi ti, silabbatenà pi na 
suddhim àha. 


! 1 PTS visuddhim. 2 М ousutlyd as usual. 
3 S айпапа «s usual, + S арраШа. 
5 PTS mañhe-m-aham. 9 6 S o. 
7 Si ad. na. 5 3 риу ош. 
° 9 Dr S on. «nd ad. pe. 10 pr S «d. pe. 
n 


D" 5 vatena. 


192 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 810 


additthiyā assutia аана азаа abbataà? по pi tenā ti 
ditthi pi ieehitabba ti evam bhanasi, savanam pi ісећі- 
tabban ti evam bhanasi, бараш pi icehitabban ti evam 
bbanast, ?silam pi iechitabban ti evam bhanasi, vattam 
pi iechitabban ti evam bhamasi? Na sakkosi ekamsena 
anujinitum, па sakkosi ekamsena  patikkhipitun ti, 
aditthiyà assutiyà папа asilatà abbatà no pi tena. 

3 Майлан” aham? тотнрат eva dhamman ti momuha- 
dhammo ayam tuyham báladhammo? aüanadhammo? 
amaraüvikkhepadhammo © ti evam 7mañňāmi, evam” 
jànámi, evam ājānāmi, evam pativijjhāmī?’ ti, mañnñam” 
aham momuham eva dhammam. 

Ditthiyā eke paccenti suddhin Ai ауа eke samapa- 
Drahmana  suddhim visuddhim — parisuddhim muttim 
vimuttim parimuttim paecenti: sassato loko, idam eva 
saccam, mogham айпап ti, ditthiya eke sumauabrahmanà 
suddhim visuddhim parisuddhim muttim vimuttim pari- 
muttim paccenti; Pasassato loko... pe... m eva 
hou na па hoti tathāgato parammarana, idam eva saeeam, 
mogham аййап ti ditthiya еке samanabrahmanà suddhin 
visuddhun parisuddhim  muttin  vimuttim  parimuttim 
paecenti ti 10, ditthiya  eke paecenti suddhim. Теп’ аһа 
so bràhmuno : 

No се kira ditthiya na sutiya 2na nanena?? 
iti Māgandiyo 

silabbatenā pi na suddhim aha 

ditthiyü assutiyà ananà 

asllata abbatà no pi tena, 

inabnàm' aham momuham eva dhammam, 

ditthiyà еке paecenti suddhin ti. 


| Buppataà. 2 2 Б» 5 om. 

? 3 5 maññamanam (= manñe-m-alham 2). 
t p? ad. mulhadhammā. 5 S nnüanadh?. 
5 S amaravikkhedh?. 7T 7 Nom. 


8 pr ad. evam уіјапаші, evam райкама; Š ad. 
evan vijinailt. 
9 8i palivijjhanami; В”; S pativijjhami. 
0 10 Jiron, H Siom, 7? 12 Siaütànena; S annànena. 


S.N. 841] Mäāgyandiyasuttaniddeso. 193 


Ditthisu! nissáya anupucehamano 
Máaágandiyà ti Dhagavà& 

samuggahitesu pamoham? ара 

ifo са nàddakkhi anum pi saünam, 

tasmü tuvam momuhato dahàsi. (. 


Liffhisu nissãya anupucehamáno ti. Magandiyo brāh- 
mano ditthim nissáàya ditthim puechati, lagganam niss&ya 
laggagam — puechati, bandhanam  nissiya  bandhanuam 
puechati, palibodham nissàya palibodham pucchati. Anu- 
pueeh«ináno tài panappunam puechati ti, ditthisu nissáya 
anupucechamano. 

Magandiya ti Dhagara tam bráhmanam namena alapati 
Bhagarü ii gáravàdhivaeanam . . . pe . . . saeehika 
pamnñatti yadidam Bhagavà ti, Magandiyà ti Bhagavà. 

Samuggalitesu pamoham? ауа tì ya ditthi taya gahità 
paràmattha abhinivittha ajjhosità adhimuttà; tày'? eva 
tvam ditthiyà mülho 'si, pamülho? sammüllio?, moham 
agato 'si, pamoham gato 'si, sammoham асабо в], 
andhakaram pakkhanto 'si ti, sainuggahitesu pamoham? 
ада. 

Ito ca nüddakkhi anum pi sanian ti. Ito ajjhattasantito 
và patipattito ? và dhammadesanato và, yuttasannani 
10а pattasalüüam!? và! lakkhanasaüham và karana 
sannam và thànasaünam уа !?na patilabhasi!?; kuto 
hánan? ti, evam pi ito са náddakkhi anum pi sanam. 
А (һауа aniecam và anieeasaünaànulomam và, dukkham và Š 
dukkhasarnnanulomam và, anattam và anattasannànulomam 
và, saññuppadamattam và saüüànimittemn!? và пав patila- 


1 S ditthusu ; PTS ditthin ca. 2 S sammohamn. 


3 Samoham. * Dr ad. ва. 5 Si tass’. 
6 S от.; B" ad. 'si. 

r B" Š ad. sis 8 $ amoham. 

? B" patipadato; S patipadato. 10719. куй, 


и BP S om. here and below three times. 
12—12 Š nappatilabhati. 
? B" sañjānimittam; S sanj&uninamattam. 


194 Atthakavaggqo. [S.N. 841 


bhasi, kuto лапар ? ti, evam рі ito са náddakkhi apum 
pi sannam. 

Tasmā tuvam momuhato dahasi ti. Tasmā М tasma 
tamkāraņā tamhetu tampaecaya (tamnidana.  Д/ошййш- 
dhammato bāladhammato mülhadhammato añānadham- 
mato amaravikkhepadhammato d«ahàási passasi dakkhasi 
olokesi nijhàyasi upaparikkhasi ti, ќазша tuvam momu- 
hato dahási. Ten' аһа Bhagavà : 


Ditthisu nissàya anupucchamáno 
Máàgandiyà ti Вһарауй 

samuggahitesu pamoham аса 

ito ea nàddakkhi anum рі sannam, 

tasmaà tuvam momubhato dabhàsi ti. 


Samo visesi uda và nihino 

yo mannati, so viv&detha tena, 
tisu vidhàsu avikampamàno! 

samo visesi tl па tassa hoti. 8. 


Samo visest uda ra uihino yo mnantatt so vivadetha tena 
li. Sadiso "ham asmi ti và, seyyo 'ham asmi ti và, 
nibmo? һал! asm] ti và yo manhati, so tena manena, 
{ауа ditthiyà, tena? và puggalena, kalaham Кагеууа. 
bhandanam kareyya, viggaham kareyya, vividam kareyya, 
medhagam kareyya: Na ívam imam dhammavinayam 
ајапаѕі, aham imam dhammavinayam àjànami; kim tvam 
imam dhammavinayam ајапіѕѕаві 2 miecbápatipanno tvam 
asi, aham asmi sammapatipanno, sahitam * me, asahitan ê 
te, pure vacaniyan расеһа атаса, paeeha vacaniyam pure 
атаса, adhieinnan te viparāvattam, āropito te vādo, 
niggahito 9 tvam asi; eara vadappamokkhaya, nibbedhehi 
уй sace pahosi ti, samo vises! uda và nihino yo mañħati. 
зо vivadetha tena. 


1 5 adhikanimamano (= avikappamano). 
? Br S hino. 3 $ te. 
4 $ рашќат. 5 Б apahitan. 


9/9 Br?gi:; S om. 


S.N. 813] Mágaudiyasuttauidideso, 195 


1 samo visest ti na lasse Коб 


Tisu vidhāsu avikampanano 
ti. Yass’ età tisso vidhà pahinà samucchinná vůpasantā 
patipassaddhà abhabbuppattikà, nànagginà daddhā, so 
tisu vidhàsu па kampati?, па vikampati?; avikampamā- 
nassa! puggalassa sadiso ‘ип asmi ti và, seyyo hum 
asm] ti và, nihino? 'ham asmi ti ха, na tassa һом ti, nu 
mayham hoti ti, tisu vidhàsu avikampamano samo visesi 
ii na tassa hoti. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà : 

Samo visesi uda và nihino 

yo mannati, so vivadetha tena, 
tisu vidhásu avikampamano © 
samo үіѕеѕї ti na tassa hoti ti. 


Saecan ti so brahmano kim vadeyya? 

musa ti và so vivadetha kena? 

yasmim samam visamam và pi n 
atthi1, 

sa kena vádam patisamyujeyya? 9. 


, 


Зассап ti so brāhmano kün vadeyyā? ti. Bralinauo t 
sattannam dhammanam bàhitattà bràhmano . . . pe.. 
anissito? tādi pavuecati? ?sa bràhmà 19. ассан ti so 
brülinano kim vadeyya? ti. Sassato loko, idam eva saccam, 
moghamannan ti brahmano kim vadeyya, kim katheyya, 
kim bhaneyya, kim dipayeyya 9, kim уоһагеууа, asassato 
loko ...pe... n eva hoti па na hoti tathàgato param- 
marana, idam eva saecam, mogham annhan ti brahmano 
kim vadeyya, kim katheyya, kim bhaneyya, kim dipayevya, 
kim vohareyya? ti", saecan ti so bráhmano kim vadeyya? 

Миѕа t rà so vivadetha Гена? ti. Dráàhmauo mayham 
va saecam, tuyham musa ti kena manena, kaya ditthiya, 
kena và puggalena kalaham kareyya, bhandanam kareyya, 


1 Š avippamano (= ау1карратапо). 

? Š kappati. 3 S vikappati. 

1 5 avikappamáanassa. ° B" S hino. 

° S avikappamano. 7 Brasito; S àstto. 
8 B" S pavuceate. 9-9 DB" om. ; S sabbrahma. 


0 S dipeyya. п Som. 


196 Aflthakavanqo. [ S.N. $48 


viggaham Кагеууа, vivàdam kareyya. medhacam! kareyya: 
na? (vam imam dhammavinayam ájanasi. . . pe 
nibbedhehi? va sace pahosi? ti, musi ti và so ушей 
kena ? 

Jasmin samanı visamam са pi п atti ti. Yasmin? ti” 
yasnüm puggale* arahante khinasave. бадіѕо 'him asmi 
ti mano п’ atthi, seyyo ат asmi ti atimāno п’ atthi, 
hino 'ham asmi ti omàno n’ atthi?, na samvijjati, n' 
upalabbhati, pahinam samucehinnam vuüpasantam pati- 
passaddham abhabbuppattikam nanagginà daddhan ti, 
yasmin samam visamam và pi п’ atthi. 

Sa kena табал patisamyujeyyā? tù so kena maànena 
kàya ditthiya, kena vā puggalena vàdam patisamyujjeyya ê 
patiphareyya?, kalaham kareyya, bhandanam kareyya, 
viggaham kareyya, vivàdam kareyya, medhagam kareyya : 
па tvam imam dhammavinayam äjānāsi... pe.. 
nibbedhehi và sace pahosi? ti, sa kena vàdam patisamyu- 
јеууа ?? Теп’ aha Bhagavà : 


Saecan ti so brahmano kim vadeyya? 
musà ti và so vivadetha kena? 

yasmim samam visamam và рі n` atthi, 
sa kena vàdam patisamyujevyàá? ti. 


Okam pahaya aniketiasiür! 

паше? agkubbam muni santhavani? 
kàmehi ritto apurekkharàno! 

katham па 12 viggayha janena kayirá? 10. 


1 Š medhakam, always. ? S om. 
3 S nibbedhena (I. 17 nibbedhehi). 
+ Sion. 5 Be S «d. na santi. 


e p" 8 patisannojeyya. 

7 B" patibaleyya ; Š pativareyya. 

5 B" patisahnojeyya ; S patisamnejeyya. 

Si Кате here end below. 

B" sandavaüni; Š sandhavani. 

Si apurakkharāno. 1? $i nu. 


n 
o o 


S.N. 844] Mágaidiyasuttanuldeso. 197 


* Atha kho Halindakani! gahapati yen’ àyasma Маһа- 
Кассапо ten? upasamkaml; upasamkamitvà ayasmantam 
Маһакассапат  abhivàdetvà ekam antam 118141; ekam 
antam піѕіппо kho Halimdakani gahapati àyasmantam 
Mahákaccánam etad ахоса: Vuttam idam bhante Каесапа? 
Bhagavatà Atthakavaggike? Màgandiyapanhe! : 

Okam pahàya aniketasari 

game? akubbam muni santhaváni? 
kamehi ritto, apurekkharano 

katham na? viggayha janena kayira? ti. 

Imassa nu kho bhante Kaecana? Bhagavatà samkhittena 
bhàsitassa katham ??attho vitthàrena datthabbo!9? ti.— 
tüpadhàátu kho gahapati viññanassa oko, rüpadhàturága- 
vinibandhaü ! ea pana viüüünam okasári!? ti vuccati?*. 
Vedanádhatu kho gahapati, saünádhaátu kho gahapati, 
samkhàradhátu kho gahapati vinñanassa oko, samkhara- 
dháturügavinibandhan?* ea pana viünanam оКавап ti 
vuecati; evam kho gahapati okasárt hoti. 

Kathaü ca gahapati anokasári!? hoti?  Rüpadhàtuya 
kho gahapati yo ehando, yo ràgo, yà nandi, yà tanhà, ye 
upáyupadanàá!9 eetaso adhitthanabhinivesanusaya, te tathà- 
gatassa pahinà uechinnamiülà tālāvatthukatā anabhàvam 17 


* S. iii, 9. 


! pr Háliddakani, throughout; Sam. y, 9 has Haliddi- 
kani. 

2 S kaceayana, here and below. Wanting in Sam. 

3 Siatthavaggike. 

* B" mágandikapanha; 5 māgaudikapahena. 

5 8i 8 Кате. 6 B» S as abore. 
Si nu. 8 Dr karirà. 9 5 kaceayanam. 
10—10 р» Š Sam. vitthàrena attho. 


п $ ?vinividdhan. 

12 S okassari here and below twice. 13 S om. 

1 Bion. ?raga? ; S has ?уапа?. 

15 S akassári. 1 S npādānā. 
17 


B" anabhàvam kata throughout. 


198 Atfhakaraggo. [9.№. 844 


galà ayatim! anuppadadhamma; tasmá tathagato ano- 
kasári ti vuecati. Vedanádhátuyà kho gahapati, sañña- 
dhatuya kho gahapati, samkháàradhatuya kho gahapati, 
vinnànadhátuya kho gahapati yo chando, yo rāgo, уа 
nandi, уа tanha, ye ирауирайапа cetaso aditthanábhini- 
vesanusayü, te iathàgatassa pahina uechinnamuülà tālā- 
vatthukatà anabhàvam gatà àyatim anuppadadhamma; 
tasmià lathacato anokasàri ti vuceati; evam kho gahapati 
anokasarl hoti. 

Kathan са gahapati niketasari? hoti? Rüpanimitta- 
niketasaravinibandham? kho gahapati niketasari* ti vuc- 
eati. — Saddanimittagandhanimittarasanimittaphotthabba- 
nimittadhammanimittaniketasaravinibandham ? kho gaha- 
pati niketasári ti vuecati; evam kho gahapati niketasàri 
hoti. 

Kathan ca gahapati aniketasarr6 hoti? — Büpanimitta- 
niketasaravinibandha? kho gahapati tathagatassa pahina 
ucchinnamulà talavatthukatà anabhávam gatà àyatim anup- 
pidadhamma; tasmā tathāgato aniketasáàri ti vuceati. 
Saddanimittagandhanimittarasanimittaphotthahbanimitta- 
dhammaninittaniketasàravinibandhá? kho gahapati tathà- 
gatassa pahinà uechinnamulà tālāvatthugatā anabhávam 
саба àvatim * anuppádadhammà; tasma tathagato anike- 
tasari ti vuecati; evam kho gahapati aniketasam hoti. 

Rathah са  gahapati бате 10 santhavajáto!! hoti? 

1 S yall as offen. * 8 nigedas". 

3 Bi rüpanimittaketasaravinibandhà ; D" rüpanimitta- 
ketavisáravinibandhà ; 5 — rüpanimittaniketavisaravini- 
bundham.—/» Sam. В has ?niketavisára? always. 


3 S nigetas?. 

5 5 *uikesavisádavinibandham. 6 S aketas*?. 

7 S ?vinibandham ; B" seme reading as abore, n. З. 

$ p" CJ-miketavisáravinibandha : S —?niketavisarivini 


bandha. 
? B yall as often. 
Si кате, es abore and below. 
B" sandhavaj? ; Š santaj?, here and below. 


S.N. 844] Méspandigasuttauiddeso. 199 


idha gahapati ekaeco! gihihi? samsattho viharati, saha- 
nandi sahasoki, sukhitesu sukhito, dukkhitesu dukkhito, 
uppannesu kiecakaranīyesu attanà  vovogam āpajjati. 
Evam kho galiapati сате sanihavajáto hoti. 

Kathan ea gahapati game па santhavajāto hoti? Idha 
gahapati? bhikkhu gihihi? asamsattho? vibarati, па 
sahanandi, na sahasoki, na sulkhitesu dukkhito, na dukkhi- 
{еви dukkhito, uppannesu Кіссакагашуеѕи па attanà 
voyogam àpajjati. Evam kho gahapati сате па santha- 
vajáto hoti. 

Kathan ea gahapati kümehi9 aritio* hoti? Idha 
gahapati ekaeco? kàmesu avitaràgo? hoti avitaehando !? 
avitapemo!! avitapipáso!? avitaparilàho 18  avitatanho 18, 
evam kho gahapati kamehi aritto?* hoti. 

Kathan са gahapati kamehi ritto!9 hoti? Idha gaha- 
paíi!é bhikkhu kāmesu vitarigo hoti vitaehando " 18 
vitapemo 1? vitapipaso " vitaparilàho 7 vitatanho 17; evam 
kho gahapati kamehi ritto hoti. 

Kathan ea gahapati purekkharano 19 hoti? Idha gaha- 
pati ekaecassa 20 evam hoti: evamrüpo siyam ? anàgatam 
addhànan ti, tattha nandim samanvagameti?'; evamvedano 
siyam, evamsalüo siyam, evamsamkhāro siyam, evam- 
vinüáàno siyam anāgatam ađdhānan ti, tattha папі 
samanvagameti??: evam kho gahapati purekkharāno ? hoti. 


1 B* S ad. bhikkhu (oni. in Sam.). 

? S gihi (=gihī «s D in Sam.). 

3 D" S ad. екассо (om. in Sam.). t Š gihinàm. 
5 S samsattho. ° 8 ваше. 7 S aditto. 


з B? S «d. bhikkhu. 


9 B vitaràgo.—Sam. has avigata? throughout. 

10 5 avigatachando. u В” avigatapemo; Š от. 
1? В’ avigatapipáso ; 8 om. 13 p" S avizata". 
14 S ahitto. 15 S ditto, here aud below. 
16 В» S ad. ekaeco. U pv Š vigata’. 
13 S ad. hoti. 19 S sural? (= purak’). 

2 Br S ad, bhikkhuno. 21 б siya sometimes. 


2 D» 5 ѕатарпапей. 23 S purak?. 


200 Atfhakavagqo. [S.N. 844 


Kathaü са gahapati apurekkharano! hoti?  Idha gaha- 
pati ekaecassa? evam hoti: evinrüpo siyam anaraiam 
addhànan ti?, ^*tattha nandim* mna? samanvagameti ° 
evamvedano siyam, evamsañño siyam, evamsamkhāro 
siyam, evamvinhàno siyam anagatam айаһапап ti, tattha ? 
nandim? na? samanvagameti?; evam kho gahapati 
apurekkharāno hoti. 

Kathaù ea gahapati katham viggayha janena kattà hoti? 
Idha gahapati ekaeco evarüpim ° katham Кайа hoti: na 
tvam imam dhammavinayam ājānāsi . .. реп. 
nibbedhehi và sace pahosi ti; evam kho gahapati katham 
viggayha janena Кайа hoti. 

Kathaü са gahapati katham па viggayha janena katta 
hoti? Idha gahapati ekacco па evarüpim katham katta 
hoti: па tvam imam dhammavinayam àjànàsi...pe... 
nibbedhehi và sace pahosi ti: evam kho gahapati ү 
na viggayha janena katta hoti. Hi kho gahapati yan tam 
vuttam Bhagavatà Atthakavageike Magaudikapanhe : 

Okam pahàya aniketasari 

game akubbam muni santhavani !? 
kàmehi ritto!? apurekkharáno 

katham ра viggayha janena kayiri?* ti. 


Š apurak?. 
2 B" S ad. bhikkhuno.—Sam. (except S) has па evam 
hoti. 


з В” ad. na. 4-4 S om. 5 бот. 
б D» 5 samannaàneti. 7 B" ad. na. 8 S nandi. 
? B? бош. 19 D" § evarüpi here and below. 


п р’ aud Sam. ою. pe and hace the tert in full : aham 
imam dhammavinayum àjanàmi, kim tvam imam dhamma- 
vinayam ајапіѕваѕі? miechápatipanno {уаш азі, aham 
asmi sammapatipatino; sahitam mo, asahitam te; pure 
уасапіуат paecháà атаса; рассһа vacantyam pure ауаса ; 
adhicinnan te viparavattam ; àropito te vàdo, niggahito 'si; 
сага vàdapamokkhàya 

12 D sandhavani; Š santaváni, as above and below. 

13 S ditto. 14 p» kariyi. 


S.N. 845] Magciindiyasuttaniddeso. 201 


Imassa kho gahapati Bhagavatà samkhittena bhasitassa 
evam vitthàrena attho? datthabbo?. Теп’ àha Dhagava : 


Okam pahàya aniltetasári 

game akubbam muni santhavüni 

kimehi ritto apurekkharàno 

katham Sna viggayha? janena kayirà* ti. 


Yehi vivitto vicareyya loke, 

па tàni uggayha vadeyya? nàgo: 
elambujam? kautakavárijam? yathà 
jalena pankenau е’ anüpalittam, 
evam muni santivado? agiddho 

Кате са loke са anupalitto. li. 


Yeki vivitto vieareyya loke ti. Кет ti yehi? ditthi- 
gatehi. 'iritto ti küyaducearitena vitto?? vivitto!! pavi- 
vitto, vacidueearitena  manodueearitena  ràgena 
pe? . . . sabbàkusalübhisamkharehi? vitto?*  vivitto 
pavivitto ?. Vicareyyä ti careyya vihareyya iriyeyya 
vatteyya pàleyya yapeyya уареууа. Loke ti manussuloke 
ti, yehi vivitto viearevya loke. 

Na tüni uggagha vadeyya nügo ti. Naqa tà agum na 
karoti ti раво; na gaechati ti nàgo, mnàgaechati ti 
паро. 

Каа асат na karoti ti паво? Agu vueeanti рарака 
akusalá dhammà& samkilesikà ponobbhavikà sadarà dukkha- 
vipàkà ayatim jàtijarámarauniyà. 


і Ве 8 от. 2 Dr S «d. ti. 
3-3 S aviggaylia. 

5 Dr Ккатіуа; S kasira. 

5 5 careyya. 9 8 clampujan. 

7 D" kauthaka?: 5 kabbakarijam. 

8 PTS santivàádo. 9 Bl om. 

10 ]" ritto; Š ditto (= ritto). 

п 5 pavivitto ti. 12 S om. 


13 5 sabbakusalasamkhàra[b]hisamkàrena. 
“ D" 8 ritto. 


202 Alfhalavaquo. [8.N. 845 


*Agum na karoti ti kinei loke, 
Sabhiya ti Bhagavà, 
sabbasamyoge! visajja bandhanàni 

sabbatiha na sajjati vimutto, 
пато tādi vuecate? tatbatta 2 ti’ 


evam acum па karoti ti, пасо 5. 

Katham na g&echati ti nàgo?? Na chandágaüm gac- 
chati, na dosügatim gaechati, na mohàgatim gacchati, na 
bhayágatim gacchati; na ràagavasena gaechati, na dosa- 
vasena gacchati, na mohavasena gacchati, na mánavasena 
gacchati, па ditthivasena gaechati, na uddhaccavasena 
gaechati. na vieikiechàvasena gacchati, na anusayavasena 
gacelati, na vaggehi dhammehi yàyati niyyati vuyhati 
samhariyati; evam na gacchati ti пасо. 

katham nàgaechati ti пасо?  Sotapatümaggena ye 
kilesà pahinà, te kilese na puneti, na pacceti, na расса- 
gaechati: sakadagamimaggena anàgamimaggena arahatta- 
maggena ye kilesà pahina, te kilese na puneti, na pacceti, 
na paecagaechati; evam nügaechati ti пасо. 

Na tani uggayha cadeyya nāqo tì. Хасо па tani ditthi- 
gatàni? gahetvà uggahetvà ganhitva parámasitvà abbini- 
visitvà vadeyya katheyya bhaneyya dipayeyya vohareyya'*: 
sassato loko? asassato loko? .. . pe... n eva hoti 
na па hoti tathàgato parammarana, idam eva вассат, 
mogham aüüan ti vadeyya katheyya bhaneyya dipayeyya 
vohareyyà ti, na tani uggayha vadeyya пасо. 

FElainbujtin  kantakavarijai 9 gathü jalna paùkena c 
апра Нан М. Elon vuccatà adakam. 19 Атри vuccati 
udakam 20. [ин] vuccati ш Kantako 1 vue- 


* Sn. 522; cf. A. ni, 345. 


1 S sabbasannogavisajjananibbatanani. 


2 S pavuceato. 3 B шиви. + В? on. 

5 Bion. 9 B ad. naga ( 2nàgo ?). 
zd 

7 S ad, ti. D» S on. 


9 B" kanthaka?; S Карака". 
ín" pr S ом, п p. S kanthako. 


S.N. 845] Mäāgandiyasuttaniddeso. 203 


cati kharadando!. Vari vueeati uđakam. Vrijen? 
vuceati paduman varijamn ? vàrisambhavam 3, „Ле vuc- 
cati udakam. — ako vuccati kaddamo. — Yathà радити 
vürijam 5 vàrisambhavain jalena ea раћкепа са па limpati, 
Sna samlimpati?, 7w upalimpati?, айаш asamdittanm 
anupalittan ti, elambujum kantahavarijani yathā jalena 
patkena с’ anüpalittam. 

Evraue iunt santiredo agiddho Кате са loke ea anñpalitto 
ti. Eran ti opammasampatipàdanà ^. Manī ti monau 
vuceati ñanam . . . pe . . . ѕайсајаіа atieca so muni. 
Santirado ti santivàdo muni tànavádo lenavádo saranaviulo? 
aeeutavàdo — amatavàdo — nibbinavado tì evan muni 
santivado. 

Лоо ti. Gedho vuceati tanhà ; yo rāgo sarügo . 
pe . . . abhijha lobho akusalamülam. !°Үазза sot? 
gedho pahino samucchinno vüpasanto  patipassaddho 
abhabbuppattiko nànagginà daddho, so vuecati agiddho. 
So rüpe agiddho, sadde gandhe rase photthabbe kule" 
gane атаѕе labhe yase pasamsaya sukhe civare pindapáte 
senàsane gilànapaccayabhesajjaparikkháre kàmadhatuya 
rüpadhátuya arüpadhatuya kamabhave rüpabhave arüpa- 
bhave saühàbhave asaññabhave nevasannanasannábhave !® 
ekavokàrabhave catuvokarabhave parcavokarabhave atite 
anagate paeeuppanne ditthasutamutavinnátabbesu dham- 
mesu ayiddho agadhito amucehito ? anajjhopanno !* vita- 
gedho ? cattagedho vantagedho muttagedho?9 pahinagsedho 
patinissatthagedho vitarügo  eattarágo vantarágo mutta- 


1 S khara. 2 Š vàri. 3] S om. 
4 S vàrisabha. 5 Siom, 6-6 DP om. 
7—7 


D" na palimpati. 
B" opammampatipadanun. 
9 B" Sad. abhayavàádo. 


10-10 B" S vass' eso. и S kusale. 
1° S nevasatüinàbhave násaünnábhave. 
13 S samuechito. BON anajjhapanno. 
15 Bu S «d. vigatagedho. 16 Son. 
17 


7 pr S ad. vigatarago. 


204 Afthakavagqo. [S.N. 845 


rigo! palünarágo patinissattharàgo? niechato? nibbuto* 
sitibhüto sukhapatisamvedi brahmabhütena attanà viliarati 
ti, evam muni santivado agiddho. 

Кате са loke са auüpalitto? ti. Kama ti udanato dve 
kama, vatthukimàü ca kilesa Каша ca... pe... ime 
vuceanii? vatthukamàá .. . pe... ime vuceanti? kile- 
ѕаката. Loketiap&yaloke manussaloke devaloke khandha- 
loke dhatuloke ayatanaloke. Геро? ti dve lepa, tanhàlepo 
са ditthilepo са... pe... ayam tanhálepo... ре... 
ayam ditthilepo. Muni tanhàlepam pahāya, ditthilepam 
patinissajjitvà, kàme са loke са na limpati, na sam- 
limpati*, n'? upalimpati, alitto asamlitto  anupalitto 
nikkhanto ріѕѕа о 10 vippamutto visunyutto vimariyadi- 
katena cetasà viharati ti, evam muni santivado' agiddho 
Кате ea loke ca anuüpalitto. 

Теп’ aha Bhagavā : 


Yehi vivitto eareyya 2° loke, 

na tani uggayha vadeyya nàgo: 
elambujam kantakavárijam yathà 
jalena paükena с anüpalittum, 
evam muni santivado agiddho 
Каше ca loke ca anupalitto ti. 


Na vedagü ditthiya na muíiya 

sa manam eti, na hi tammayo?? so, 
na kammunà' no pi sutena neyyo 
anüpanito sa nivesanoesu. 12. 


Na redagü аиа na mutiy& за manam et; ti. Nā ti 
patikkhepo. Fedayā ti. Vedo 18 vuceati eatüsu maggesu 


1 S ad. vinnarago. ? S patippassaddharago. 
3 S nijjhato. í S uan. 

5 B" anuppalitto. " S vuecati. 

?* p" S lepa. 8 Be S palimpati. 

9? p" S па пра". 10 S nissato. 

П S santavado. 1? S vicareyya. 

13 9 kammayo. " S kammaná. 


^ 5 so. 16 Be $ vedà. 


S.N. 846] Máàgandiyasuttanildeso. 205 


ñānam, pannà pannindriyam panbàabalun dhimmavicava- 
sambojjihaügo vīmamsā  vipassana sammaditthi. Tehi 
vedehi játijaràmaranassa antagato 'antappatto kotigato 
kotippatto  pariyantagato  paripantappatto — vosánaguto 
уоѕапаррайо tāņagato tanappatto lenagato lenappatto 
saranagato saranappatto abhayagato abhayappatto aceuta- 
gato aeeutappatto ?amatagato! amatappatto nibbanagato 
nibbinappatto. Vedānam vā antam gato ti vedagu, 
! vedehi và antagato ti vedagü!, sattannam và dhammanam 
viditattà vedagu, sakkayaditthi vidità hoti, vielkiechà 
vidità hoti, silabbataparámaso? vidito hoti, 'rágo vidito 
hoti, doso vidito hoti, moho vidito hoti!, mano vidito 
hoti, vidit’ assa honti pàpakà akusalà dhamma samkile- 
sikà ponobbhavika sadarà dukkhavipaka ayatim jatijarà- 
marantya 4. 


"Vedàni vieeyya? kevalàni 
Sabhiyà ti Bhagava 
ѕашапапат ёуапі p` atthi bráhmanánam 
sabbavedanasu vitaràgo 
sabbam еда aticca vedagü so ti”. 


Na diffhiyà ii. Tassa dvàsatthi ditthigatani pahmani 
samuechinnüni vüpasantàni patipassaddhàni? abhabbup- 
pattikàni Banagginà daddháni: so ditthiya na yayati, na 
піууай, ng vuyhai na samhariyati?; па рі tam ditthi- 
gatam sarato pacceti, na paceagaechati ti, па vedagu 
ditthiya. 

Na matiyā V sa manam. eti? u”. Mutarüpena 12 và 
paraghosena vai? mahaájanasammutiyà và nal! manam 


* Sn. 529. 


1-1 S om. ? Br" onm. 3 Si eilabbatta?. 
а p» S jarāmaraniyä. 5 Š viniceyya. 
9-9 p» vàni-d-atthi?; S yàni vatti. 7 Si om. 
8 $ passaddhani. 9 p" samhariyvati. 
10-10 B? 5 oi, ; Si sa màneti. B S ons 


12 S шиі". 13 S ad. yo. 


206 Afthakavequgo. (S.N. 846 


etil, na upeti, na wupagaechati, na ganhati, na parà- 
masali, nibhinivisati ti, na vedagu ditthiyà na mutiyà 
sa шапат eti. 

Na hi tummago so ti na? tanhávasena ditthivasena 
tammayo hoti tapparamo? tappariyano?. Yato tanhà са 
ditthi са mano са“ pahina? honti? uechinnamulà tala- 
vatihukataà anabhavam gata? áyatim anuppadadhamma, 
ettavata na tammayo hoti, na tapparamo?, na tappara- 
yano ti’, па hi tammayo so. 

Ха Катина no pi sutena neyyo М. Na lammunia ti 
puühabhisamkhárena và apunnàbhisamkharena và āņeňjā- 
bhisamkhàrena va па уауай, na niyyati!!, na vuyhati, па 
samhariyati!? tij na kammuna. No pi sutena перо ti 
sutasuddhiya và paraghosena và  mahájanasammutiya 
và na yüyati, na піууай 18, 4 па vuyhati!*, па sambhari- 
узі! ti, na kammunáà по pi sutena neyyo. 

Jnüpautto19 sa 19 и{сезвицева ti. Upayo! ti dve upaya, 


tanhupayo са ditthupayoca . .. pe.. . ayam tanhupayo 
pe... ayam ditthupayo. Tassa tanhupayo pahino, 


ditfhupayo yatinissattho, tanhupayassa pahinattà, ditthu- 
payassa patinissatthattà, so nivesanesu anupanito anu- 
palitto anupagato anajjhosito anadhimutto  nikkhanto 
nissattho 19  vippamutto  visamyutto — vimariyadikatenua 
cetasā viharati ti, anupanito sa nivesanesu. 


1 B" S neti. ?8iS ош. 
3 S tunp?, here and below. + B" с’ assa? 
5 $ sampahinà. Š 8 hoti. 


B” anabháaviunkatà ; 9 anabhavakagata. 
8 Sud. hoti. 
"В" 8 ad. sa manam ей. 


19 S ad, pi. п 8 муай, 

* p? sumliariyyati. 

7 S niyati. м1 pU біо. 

7^ p" anuppanito, Лете and below. 16 5 so. 


U p? upaya. 
S nissato «s always. 


S.N. 847] Mágaudiyasuttanidieso. 207 
Теп’ аһа Bhagava : 

Na vedagü ditthiyà па mutiyà 

ва manam eti, na hl tammayo so, 

na kammuna no pl sutena neyyo 

anüpanito sa nivesanesu ti. 
Sann&virattassa na santi gunihi!, 
paünavimuttassa ра santi mohi: 
sanhah? ca ditthih са ye sggahesum?, 
te ghattayanta? vicaranti? loke. 13. 


n 
n 


Suannavirattussa па santi чана tà. уо samathapubban- 
gamam ariyamaggam bháveti, tassa adito upadaya ganthà 
vikkhambhità honti; arahattappatte?, arahato сапа са 
тора ea nivaranà са kamasanna byapádasannà vibimsa- 
sanna ditthisannà ea? pahina honti, ucchinnamüla tala- 
vatthukatà anabhavam gata? ayutin? anuppadadhamma 
ti, saniniavirattassa na santi сапра. 

Paññarinutlassa 10 па santi тока ti yo vipassanà- 
pubbahgamam ariyamaggam bhàveti, tassa àdito upadaya 
moha vilkkhambhità honti; arahattappatte?, агапаіо шоһа 
са gantha ca nivaranà ea kamasañña byapadasannà vibim- 
ваѕаппа ditthisanhà ca! pahina honti, uechinnumüla- 
talàvatthulatà anabhavam gatà àyatim anuppadadhamma 
ti, pannavimuttassa 10 na santi mohā. 

айа? са (Ший ca ye aqqahesuim te qhattayanta Y? 
гїсатан 19 loke ti ye sahnam ganhanti, kamasanüam 
byapidasannam vihimsásalüam, te sanüàvasena ghattenti 
samghattenti?. Кајапо рі rajühi vivadanti, khattiya pi 


D" S gandhà as always. 2 Bi раћбай. 
S aggaheyyum, later aggahesum. 

S ghattamánà «s D" below. 

5 Si vivadanti, later viearanti. 

B" arahattapatte; S arahatte matte. 7 Si ош. 


8 B» 5 anabhàvamkatà «s often, э 5 üyau. 
10 9 saññav°, n Si S om. 
12 В’ S ghattamanz. 

13 


Si vivadanti; S earanti. 


208 Athakavaqqo. [S.N. 847 


khattiyehi vivadanti; !brahmanà pi bràhmanehi viva- 
danti!; gahapati pi gahapatihi vivadanti; mātā pi puttena 
vivadati: putto pi matara vivadati; pita pl puttena viva- 
dati; putto pi pitarā vivadati; bháta pi bhátara vivadati; 
?bhagini pi bhaginiya vivadati?; bhāta pi bhaginiyà viva- 
dati: bhagini pi bhàtarà vivadati; sahāyo pi ѕаһауепа 
vivadaii. Те tattha  kalahaviggahavivadapannà  anna- 
maññam pánihi pl upakkamanti, leddühi? pi upakka- 
тап", satthebi pi upakkamanti?. Теб iattha maranam 
pi nigaechanti, maranamattam рі dukkham. Ye ditthim 
ganhanti: sassato loko ti và . . . pe... Rw eva hoti na 
па hoti tathāgato parammaranaà ti ха, te? ditthivasena 
ghattenti samghattenti*. Sattharato? satthàram ghat- 
tenti; dhammakkhánato dbammakkhanam  ghattenti; 
папаќо 1° sanam gbhattenti, ditthiya ditthim ghattenti, 
patipadaya — patipadam ghattenti, maggato  maggam 
ghattenti. Аата [еб vivadanti!!, kalaham  karonti, 
bhandanam karonti, viggaham karonti, vivàdam karonti, 
medhagam Катор: na tvam imam dhammavinayam 
ајапаві . . . pel? . . . nibbedhehi và sace pahosi ti. 
Tesam abhisamkharà арраһпа; abhisamkhàrànam appa- 
hinaita, catiyi ? phattenti, niraye ghattenti, tiracchà- 
nayonlyà ghattenti, pittivisaye!* ghattenti, manussaloke 
chattenti, devaloke ghattenti, gatiyā gatim upapattiyà 
upapattim patisandhiya patisandbim bhavena bhavam P, 
samsirena samsaram ?vattena vattam? ghattenti P, ghat- 
tentà caranti viharanti!? iriyanti 18 vattenti palenti 
!yapent yàpenti!. Loke ti арауаоке 7? manussaloke 
devaloke khandhaloke dhütuloke!9 ayatanaloke t1, ваййай 20 


1-1 S on. 2-2 Si om. 3 S dandehi. 
4 S ukkamanti ; B" «d. dandehi pi. 5 S ukkanmanti. 
9 Son. 7 B" S «d. te. 8 51 бот. 
9 D'aattharatho. 10 Sad. ti. P В" S vippavadanti. 
12 S уат. 13 5 пайа. 13 Š petti’. 
15 5$ bhavanam. 16 D" samehattentt ; S ghattenti. 
7 Dr qd. vacaranti (= vicar’). 5 S inyenti. 


19 19 Be pe, 20 У suyan, 


S.N. 847] Mügandiyasuttunild: so. 209 


са ditthih ea ye aggahesum te ghattayantà! vicaranti 
loke. Теп` aba Bhagavà: 


ә 


Saññavirattassa? ? па santi? рапа, 
pannáàvimuttassa * па santi mohà: 
saññañ ca ditthin са ye aggahesun, 
te ghattayanta viearanti loke ti. 


Navauo? MAGANDIYASUTTANIDDERO NITTIIITO Š, 


12 


1 B” $ ghattamani. S sannavimuttassaltta. 


3—3 S om. 4 S sannà?. 
° Б» бот. 9 В” S samatto navamo. 


11 


DASAMO! PURABHEDASUTTANIDDESO ?. 


Kathamdassi kathamsilo upasanto ti 
vuecati, 

tam me Gotama pabrühi pucehito 
uttamam лаға. І. 


Kathawdassi kathamsīlo upasanto ti vuccatt и. ? Natha- 
dassi ti? lidisena? dassanena samannàgato, kimsanthitena? 
kinpakàrena kimpatibhágena? ti, kathamdassi. Katkar- 
silo ti kidisena? stena samannagato, kimsanthitena 5 
kimpakàrena kimpatibhagena ti, kathamdassi kathamsilo. 
Upasanto ti сиссат ti santo* vüpasanto? nibbuto pati- 
passaddho ii vuecati? pavueeati kathiyaüi  bhaniyati? 
dipayati vohanyatiU. — Kathandassi ti? ?)?adhipannam 
pueehati!?. Kutamstlo ti adhisilam pueehati. Upasanto 
ti adhicittam  puechati!? ti, kathamdassī  kathamsilo 
upasanto ti vuccati. 

Tam me Gotuma pabruhī ti. Tan ti yam pucchāmi, 
yam yācāmi, yam ajjhesàmi?", yam pasādemi. Gotamā ti 
so nimmito Buddham Bhagavantam  gottena älapati. 

і p? S om. 
2 D" atha purübhedasutti-anukkati; 5 subhedasutta- 
niddeso vuecati. 


73 бі от. + В” kimdisena ; 5 karisena. 
5 8 ?samkhitena. 5 S patibhavena. 
7 D" kimdisena. $ B" Б «d. upasanto. 
° Soon. 10 p» kathiyy°. 
1 р» vobhariyy?; S vohareyya ti. 
77? S adhipariham vuceati. 5 S vuccati. 


11 8 ad. yam равваті. 
210 


S.N. 649] Purábhedasuttaniddeso, 211 


Pabrūhī ti brühi aeikkha desehi paünapehi patthapchi 
vivara 1 vibhaja 2 uttànikarohi pakāsehī ti, tam ше 
Gotama pabrühi. 

Pucchito uttamam naran tì. Pucchito ti puttho pucchito 
yácito ajjlhesito pasádito. (Лата. паган ti aggam 
settham уіѕе ат pámolkham? пашаш pavarani* naran 
ti, puechito uttamam паташ. Ten’ аһа so nimmito : 


Kathamdassi kathamsilo upasanto ti vuccati, 
tam me Gotama pabrühi pucehito uttamam naran ti. 


Vitatanho рога bhedà ti? Dhagava 
pubbam antam anissito 

vemajjhe n' upasamkheyyo, tassa n' 
atthi purekkhataun*. RA 


Vitatanho риа bheda? ti 8 Dhagarā tiè раа kayassa 
bhedà?, pură attabhávassa bhedà?, риа kalevarassa 
nikkhepa °, pura jivitindriyassa upaecheda, vitatanho viga- 
tatanho cattatanho vantatanho muttatanho pahinatanho 
patinissatthatanho vitarágo vigatarügo cattarago!" vanta- 
ràágo!! pahinarágo patinissattharàgo пісеһафо 1? nibbuto 
sitibhüto sukhapatisamvedi brahmabhütena аара ??viha- 
rati ti, Bhagară t gàravidhivaeanam. Арі ea bhagga- 
rāgo ti Bhagavàa, bhaggadoso ü Bhagavā, bhaggamoho ti 
Bhagavā, bhaggaditthi ti Вһасата, bhaggukantako ti 
Bhagavà, bhaggakileso ti Dhagava, bhaji vibhaji pati- 
vibhaji'? dhammaratanan ti Bhagavā, bhavanam апбакаго 
ti Dhagavá, bhàvitakàyo ?ti Вһасата $, bhavitasilo bhàvi- 
tacito bhàvitapanno ti Bhagavá 9, Bhaji và Bhagava 


S vibhajehi. 


15 


1 S vivarühi. 


? 5 vimokkham. 3 5 paraman. 
° Si iti. $ D" pura’. ? S bhedo. 

3-8 B" S om, 9 S bhedanik?. 
10 бай. ti. u Б” 8 ad. muttarago. 
12 $ nijjháto. 13 13 BP б viharati. 


M p» S bhaggatanho. 
15 B? pavibhaji; S pattbhaji. 16-16 S ош, 


219 Atthakaraygo. [8.N. 849 


дтаййауапара аш 1 pantani senāsanāni appasaddāni 
appanigghosāni vijanavātāni mannssarāhaseyyakāni pati- 
sallanasarupani?' ti Bhagavā. Bhāgīi và Bhagavà cīvara- 
pindapátasenásanagilinapaecayabhesajjaparikkharanan ti 
Bhagavā. Bhāgi và Bhagavá attharasassa dhammarasassa 
vimuttirasassa adhisīlassa adhieittassa adhipannaya ti 
Bhugavü.  Bhági vā Bhagavā catunnam — jhánánam 
eatunnam appamannanam eatunnam arüpasamapattinan 
ti Bhagavà. Вһаот và Bhagava atthannam vimokkhanam 
atthannam abhibhàyatanànam navannam anupubbavihàra- 
samapattinan ti Dhagavà. Dhàgi và Вһасауа dasannam 
sabhàbhavanànam? dasannam kasigasamápattinum апара- 
nasatisamadhissa * asubhasamápattiya 4 — Bhagava. 
Вһаот và Bhagavà eatunnam вайра{{ћапапат eatunnam 
sammappadhanànam eatunnam iddhippádànam райсаппат 
indriyànam райеаппат balànam sattannam bojjhaüganam 
ariyassa atthaügikassa maggassa ti Bhagava. Bhagi và 
Bhagavà dasannam tathagatabalanam eatunnam vesáraj- 
jànam eatunnam patisambhidanam ehannam abhinninam 
channam buddhadhammaànan ti Bhagavà. Bhagarā ti n' 
etam пашат шаќата katam, па pitarà katam, na bhàtarà 
katam, па bhaginiyà katam, па mittàmaccehi katam, па 
hàtisalohitehi katam, na samanabrahmanehi katam, na 
devatühi katam, vimokkhantikam etam Buddhànam Bhaga- 
vantànam bodhiyá müle saha sabbannutanánassa patilabha 
saechika pannatti, yadidam Вһасата ti, vitatanho pura 
bhedā ti Bhagavà. 

Pubbam antam anissito ti pubbanto? vuccati atito addhä ; 
айаш addhānam ārabbha tanhā pahīnā hoti, ditthi pati- 
nissatthā, taņhāya pahīnattā ditthiya patinissatthatta, 
evam pi °pubbam antam” anissito. Аата evamrüpo 
ahosim айаш addhànan ti, {айша nandim па saman- 
vagameti^. Evamvedano аһовіт, evamsaüno ahosim, 


! S агадде vanapattani. 2 p" 5 ^ruppàni. 
3 D" райћа°. 
5 3 Dr ?pattinatthi (—?pattinà ti). 5 S ad, ti. 


9-9 Si pubbantam. ? D" 5 samannaneti, 


S.N. 849] Purabledasuttauili so, 15 


evamsamkháro ahosim, evamvinñano  ahosin ааш 
addhànan ti, tattha! nandim па samanvàgumeti?, evam 
pi ?pubbam antam?anissito. Athavá iti me caklthu * aliosi 
atitam addhànam, iti тара ti, tattha па? chandaràágapati- 
baddham ê hoti viünánam; na chandarágapatibaddhattà 
vinüaànassa па tad abhinandati, na tad abhinandanto 6, 
evam рі pubbam antam anissito. Iti me sotam ahosi 
а Шаш  addhànam, iti saddā ti, iti me ghànam alhosi 
atitam addhànam, ій? gandhà ti, iti me jivhà ahosi 
atitam addhànain, iti” rasa ti, iti me kayo ahosi atitiun 
addhanam, iti photthabbà ti, iti me mano ahosi atitam 
addhànam, iti dhammà ti, {аһа na? ehandarágapati- 
baddham hoti vinühanam, па chandaràgapatibaddhatta 
viühànassa, na tad abhinandati, na tadabhinandanto, 
evam рі pubbam antam amnissito. Аф ауа yan ° assu 
tani pubbe mātugāmena saddhim hasitalapitakathitakili- 
iàni? na tad assādeti, na tam nikameti, na ca tena 
pavittim 1 àpajjati, evam pi pubbam antam anissito. 
Vemajjhe w? upasamkheyyo ti vemajjhe!! vuecati paceup- 
panno addhà; paeecuppannam addhànam агаррћа tauha 
pahina hoti, ditthi patinissattha, tanhàya pahmattà 
ditthiyà  patinissatthattà ratto ti n’ upasamkheyyo, 
I?duttho ti п’ upasamlheyyo??, mülho ti n' upasamkheyyo, 
vinibandho ti n’ upasamkheyyo, paràmattho ti n’ upasam- 
kbeyyo, P vikkhepagato ti n' upaüsamkheyyo, anitthañ- 
gato! ti n’ upasamkheyyo, thàmagato ti п’ upasamkheyyo; 
te abhisamkhárà раһпа, abhisamkharanam  pahinattà 
gatiyà n’ upasamkhneyyo??, nerayiko ti và, tiraechünayoniko 
ti và, pittivisayiko ti vi, manusso!? tj và, devo ti vi, 


1 S ad. tattha. 2 B" S samannanetl. 


3-5 Si pabbantam t/eroughout. 3 P? eakkhum. 
5 S on. 6 S abhinando. 
7 S ad. me. 5 B'S vani. 
9 В” S hasitalapitakilitini. " p" S vittim. 
п pe S vemajiham. 12-12 Si oim. 
18 18 бо, N p? anitthàgato. 
15 


5 manussayoniko. 


214 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 849 


rüpi ti và, arüpi ti và, sani ti và, asaññi ti và, nevasaüni ! 
паѕайћї ti và. бо hetu n’ atthi, paceayo n’ atthi, kàranam 
n' айі, yena samkham? gaecheyyà ti, vemajjhe n’ 
upasamkheyyo. 

Tassa w atthi purekkhatan ti. Tassā ti arahato khinà- 
savassa.  Purekkharo? ti dve purekkhárà, tanhápurek- 
kharo са ditthipurekkháro ea . . . pe... ayam tanhà- 
purekkháro . .. pe . . . ayam ditthipurekkhàro. Tassa‘ 
tanhápurekkháro pahino, ditthipurekkhàro patinissattho, 
tanhápurekkhàrassa pahimattà ditthipurekkhárassa pati- 
nissatthattà, na tanham và ditthim và purato? katvà 
carati, па tanhádhajo, na tanhàketu, na ianhadhipateyyo, 
па ditthidhajo. na ditthiketu, na ditthadhipateyyo, na 
tanháya và ditthiyà và parivarito сагай ti, evam pi tassa 
п’ atthi purekkhatam.  Athavà evamrüpo siyam anágatam 
адаһапап ti, tattha nandim na sumanvàgameti$, evam- 
vedano siyam, evamsanno siyam, evamsamkharo siyam, 
evamviññano siyam anagatam addhānan ti, tattha nandim 
na samanvāgameti б, evam pi tassa п’ atthi purekkhatam. 
Aihava iti me eakkhu siyà anagatam addhànam, iti rupa 
tà appatiladdhassa patilabhaya cittam па panidahati, 
cetaso appanidhànapaeceaxa* na tad abhinandnati, na tad 
abhinandanto?, evam pi tassa n’ atthi purekkhatam. Iti 
me sotam siya an&ügatam addhanan, iti sadda ti: iti me 
ghànam siya anaeatam addhànam, iti gandhà ti; iti me 
jivhà siya anāgatam addhànam, iti rasa ti; iti me Кауо 
зіуа anágatam a&ddhanam, 1110 photthabbà ti; iti me 
mano віуа anaágatam addhanam, iti!'? dhamma ti appati- 
laddhassa patilàbhaya cittam na pauidahati, cetaso appa- 
nidhianapaecayi!! na tad abhinandati, na tad abhinan- 
danto, evam pi tassa n’ atthi purekkhatam. Аата 


t 


! S ad. di và. S sankhyam. 


3 Be S purekkhara. T Siom. 

^ S pureto. 9 D'S samaunnaneti. 
7 S appadhàana?. 8 S abhinando. 

э Уі saddha. 10 S ad. mo. 


"OS apanidhananp?. 


S.N. 850] Purabhedasuttaniddeso. 215 


iminàham' silena ?và vattena? và tapena và brahma- 
сагіуепа và devo và bhavissámi devannataro và ti appati- 
laddhassa patilàbhaya cittam па  panidahati, cetaso 
appanidhànapaecay& na tad abhinandati, na tadabhinan- 
danto, evam pi tassa n’ абі purekkhatam. Ten’ aha 
Bhagavā : 
Vitatanho pura bheda ti Bhagavā 
pubbam antam anissito 
vemajjhe п’ upasamkheyyo, tassa n’ atthi purek- 
khatan ti. 


Akkodhano asantàsi, avikatthi? akuk- 


kueo, 
mantabháni a&nuddhato, sa ve хаса- 
yato? muni. 3. 


Додано asantāsī ti. Akkodhano ti hi? kho vuttam, 
api ca kodho tàva vattabbo'. Dasah' àkàrehi kodho 
jayati: anattham me cari? ti kodho jàyati, anattham 
me сагай ti kodho jàyati, anattham me carissaíi? ti 
kodho jàyati, piyassa me manapassa anattham acari ti, 
апа Шаш carati ti, anattliam carissati ti !? kodho jàyati °, 
applyassa me amanapassa attham асат ti, абат carati 
ti, appiyassa me ашапараѕѕа attham carissati ti kodho 
jāyati, atthāne và pana  kodho jàyati. Yo evarüpo 
eittassa àghàto, Mpatighato patigham — patinirodho " ! 
Коро pakopo sampakopo doso padoso sampadoso cittassa, 
byápatti manopadoso kodho kuijjhana kujjhitattam doso 
dussanü dussitattam byàápatti byapajjanà byapajjitattam 
virodho  pativirodho eandikkam аѕѕцгоро 18, anatta- 
manata сіМаѕѕа : ayam vuceati kodho. 


l бош. 2-2 D" và vatena ; S ош. 

3 В” avikatti ; S акаш. 

4 pr S akukkucco throughout. 

5 S уасауа so, 6 D^ уаш. 7 5 datthahho. 

$ S acari. 9 S acariyati. 10—109: 
n-un S vividham virodho. ? Dr pativirodho. 


18-13 Š eapdikassaropo. 


216 Athakavaggo. (S.N. 850 


Арі ca kodhassa adhimattaparittata veditablà. АШЫ 
kanci! kalam kodho cittàvilakaranamatto hoti, па ca 
tava mukhakulànavikulàno? hoti. Atthi kañari? kalam: 
kodho mukhakulānavikulāänamatto hoti, na ea tava hanu- 
sañeopano hoti. Atthi Кайс: kalam kodho hanusanco- 
panamatto hoti, na ca tava pharusavàcaniecharano? hoti. 
Atthi kañci kalam kodho pharusavàeaniccháranamatto 5 
hoti, na са tāva disávidisam anuvilokano hoti. АЫ 
kanei kalam kodho? disavidisam anuvilokanamaítto 9 hoti, 
па ea баха dandasatthaparamasano hoti. Attbi Каде 
kalam kodho dandasatthaparáamasanamatto hoti, na са 
{ауа dandasattha-abbhukkirano? hoti. Atthi Капе kalam 
kodho dandasattha-abbhukkiranamatto? hoti, na ca tava 
dandasattha-abhinipàtano" hoti. Atthi kancei? kalam kodho 
daudasattha-abhinipitanamatto!? hoti, na са tava ehinda- 
viechindakarano?' hoti. А и kañei kalam kodho chinda- 
vichindakaranamatto ! hoti, па са tava sambhaüjana- 
parbhanjano?? hoti. Аш Кайе. kàlam kodho sam- 
bhanjanaparibhanjanamawo !?hoti, ?na ca tava angam- 
angàpakaddhano! hoti. А Кайе kalam kodho angam- 
angapakaddhanamatto hoti, na ea tàva jivitapanásano ? 
hoti. Atthi kaüei kàlun kodho ]jivitapanàsanamatto 16 
hoti, na ea tava sabbaeügaparieagasanthito " hoti. Yato 
kodho parapuggalunm ghàtetva айапат ghateti; ettàvatà 
kodho?  paramussadagato  paramavepullapatto !5 hoti. 
19 Yass’ eso? kodho pahino samuechinno vüpasanto 


| B? S kiùci and below. 


2 Š mukhakumkulanavikulanama(tto. 
3 pr S kinei. а Š kale and below. 
5 p" pharasavaceun nic’. 6-6 B>” 8 disavidisànu*. 
7 p" 5 daudasattham a°. 8 B? dandasattham a°. 
9? pr Š Ка. 10 D" ?pàtamatto. 
п p" $ ehinnaviehinna?. 12 p» S ?palibhanj?. 
P Son. u В" angamangamp?. 
э pr nvitàvoropano. " Be pivittvoropanamatto. 


17 Be ^pariechagüya santhito. 18 S ?vephullampatto. 
D" 8 yassa во. 


S.N. 850] Purabledasuttauiddeso. 217 


patipassaddho abhabbuppattiko mnànaggina daddlo, so 
vueeati  akkodhano.  Kodhassa pahinattà | akkodhano, 
kodhivatthussa  pariünátattà akkodhano, kodhiahetussa 
ucehinnattaà! akkodhano ti, akkodhano. 

Asantüs: ii. ldh' екассо tāsī hoti uttāsī paritiāsi. So 
{азам uttasati paritasati? Dhayati santāsam apajjati: 
kulam và na labhámi ganam và па labhámi, avāsam 
và na labhami, làbham ха na labhami, yasam và па 
labhàmi, pasamsam và na labhāmi, sukham và na labhami, 
eivaram và па labhimi, pindapātam và na labhami, senā- 
sanam và na labhimi?, gilanapaecayabhesajjapariklharam 
và na labhàmi, gilànupatthàkam 1 vā na labhāmi, 
appaññato "иш ti’. 

Idha bhikkhu asantāsī hoti anuttāsīi aparittüzl. Xo па 
tasati, na uttasati, na paritasati, na bháyati, na santāsam ” 
āpajjati: kulam và na labhàmi, ganam vā na labhami, 
ахаѕат và na labhimi labham và па labhāmi, yasam 
và na labhámi, pasunsam va па labbàmi, sukham và na 
labhàmi, eivaram ха na labhámi, pimdapátam ха na 
labhànmi, senásanam và na labliami, gilànapaceayabhesajja- 
parikkhàram và na labhami, gilānupatthākam vā na 
Jabhàmi, appaññaáato "mhi ti, na tasati, na? uttasati, па? 
parittasati, па? bhàyati, па? santásam apajjati ti, akko- 
dhano asantási. 

Агана akulluco ti. Idb’ ekaeco katthi hoti vikatthi?. 
So katthati vikatthati: aham asmi silasampanno ti và ?, 
silabbatasampanno ti và, јайуа vā gottena va kolaputti- 
keua/? và vannapokkharataya và dhanena và ajjhenena 
và kammàyatanena và sippüyatanena và vijjatthànena va 
sutena và patibhánena và abnataraBDüatarena và vaithuni, 


! В" upaechinnatta. “В” S parittasati. 
? 5 ad. gilànapaecayam па labhimi. 
S ра апат. 
° B" S ad. tasati uttasati parittasatt bhüyai santasam 
арајјай. 
6 S ad. asantàsam. t S от. ` S «d. hoti. 
9 Š ad. catasampanno ti và. Ye Dp sena. 


218 Atfhakavaggo. (S.N. 850 


uceikulà pabbajito ti và, mahakula pabbajito ti và, mahà- 
bhogakulà pabbajito ti vā, ulàrabhogakula pabbajito ti và, 
ñato yasass: gahatthapabbajitànan ti và, làbhi 'mhi 
eivarapindapàátasenásanagilànapaecayabhesajjaparikkhàra - 
nan ti và, suttantiko ti và, vinayadharo ti và, dhamma- 
kathiko ti và, araññiko ti và, pindapátiko ti và, pamsukūŭ- 
liko ti và, tecivariko ti va, ѕарадапасагіко ti và, khalu- 
paechahhattiko ti và, nesajjiko ti và, yathàsanthatiko ti và, 
lpathamassa jhánassa! làbhi ti và, dutiyassa jhàánassa 
labhi Ы và, tatiyassa jhanassa lābhī ti và, eatutthassa 
jhànassa làbhi ti và, àkásinaficáyatanasamápattiyà vinia- 
nalceiüvatanasamápattiya àlincannayatanasamüapattiyà ne- 
vasanhanásanüüyatanasamápattiyà làbhi ti và katthati 
vikatthati: evam па katthati na vikatthati, katthana 2 
arato virato pativirato nikkhanto nissattho? vippamutto 
visamyutto vimariyádikatena * eetasà viharati ti, avikatthi. 

Abukkueo ti. Nukkucean ti hatthakukkuccam pi kuk- 
kuecam, pádakukkuecam pi kukkuceam, hatthapadakuk- 
kuecam pi kukkuecam, akappiye Карріуаѕайћна, kappiye 
akappiyasannita, vikale kàlasaühnità avajje vajjasannità, 
vajje avajjasaBüiti; yam evarüpam kukkuecam, kukkucea- 
yana. kukkueeiyitattam, eetaso vippatisüro. manovilekho ; 
idam vueeati kakkuccam. 

Api са dvihi kāranchi uppajjati kukkuecam, cetaso 
vippatisàro manovilekho, katattà са akatatta са. 

Кашат katattà са akatattà ea uppajjati kukkuecam 
ceiaso vippatisàro manovilekho? Katam me káyadue- 
caritam, akatam me kavasuearitan ti uppajjati kukkueeam 
ceiaso vippatisaro manovilekho. Katam me vaciduc- 
caritam, akatum me vacisuearitan "ti uppajjati kukkueeam 
сеќаѕо  vipoatisáro manovilekho^. Katam me mano- 
dueearitiun, akatam me  manosucaritan ti uppajjati 
kukkuccam  cetaso vippatisaro manovilekho. Kato me 
pànàtipüto, akata me pànátipata voeramani ti uppajjati 
kukkuceam eetaso vippatisiro manovilekho. Katam me 


13 S pathamajjhanassa. ? В” ad. vikatthanà. 
5 S hissato. ! p» S ураг”. S 9 В’ 8 oy. 


S.N. 850] Purabhedasuttaniddeso, 219 


adinnádánam, akata me adinnadáná veramani ti uppajjati 
kukkueeam cetaso vippatisaro manovilekho. Kato me 
kàmesu miechàeàro, akatà me kāmesu miceehbacara vera- 
mani ti uppajjati kukkuecam cetaso vippatisaro mano- 
vilekho. Kato me musávádo, akata me musavada veramani 
ti. Kata me pisunà vácà, аКаїй me !pisunàya vácaya! 
veramani ti. Kata me pharusī vàcà, akata me ?pharusaya 
vàciya? veramani ti. Kato me samphappalàpo, акма me 
ѕатрһарраіара veramani ti. Katà шө abhijjhà, akata me 
anabhijjhaà ti. Kato me byāpādo, akato me abyápido ti. 
Katà me miecháditthi, akata me sammaáditthi ti uppajjati 
kukkuccam cetaso vippatisàro manovilekho: evam katattà? 
ca akatatti? ea uppajjati kukkuceam cetaso vippatisáro 
manovilekho. Аата silesu "mhi na paripūrakārī ti 
uppajjati kukkuceam cetaso хірраііѕаго manovilekho. 
Indriyesu 'mhi agnttadváro ti. Bhojane amattannü "аһ 
ti. Jàágariyam ananuyutto "mhi ti. Na satisampajalnena 
samannágato 'mhi ti. Abhàvità me eattàro satipatthana 
ti. Abhàvita me сайаго sammappadhana ti. Abhàvità 
ше cattàro iddhippáda ti. Abh&vitàni me paüc' indrivàni 
ti. Abhávitini me palea balàni ti. Abhavità me satta 
bojhungà ti. Abbavito me агуо atthangiko maggo ti 
Dukkham me apariàhatan ti. Samudayo me appauhino 
ti?. Maggo me abhávito ti. Nirodho me asaechikato ti 
uppajjati kukhucecam сеіаѕо vippatisáro* manovileliho. 
Yass’ etam  kukkueeau pahinam samucchinnam vüpa- 
santam  patipassaddham — abhabbuppattikam ñānaggina 
daddham, so vuccati akukkucco ti, avikatthi akulkuco. 
Manutübhüni: anuddhato ti manta упссай panna: và 
panBà pajananà . . . pe . . . amoho dhammavicayo 
sammaditthi. Мапіауа — pariggahetvà vācam bhāsati, 
bahum pi? kathento, bahum pi? bhananto, bahum рі? 
dipayanto, bahum pi? voharanto, dukkatam ^ dukkathitam 


1-1 B? ріѕцпатасауа; S pisuna хаса. 

?-? B? pharusavaeaya: S pharusá хаса. S kato. 
+ 5 akato. 5 S ad. maggo me appahino ti. 
65 ad. ti. TSh 5 prsun. 


220 Afthakavaggo. [S.N. 850 


dubbhásitam ! dubbhanitam dullapitam duruttam ? vacam 
па bhüsati ti, mantàbhàni „Inuauddhato ti. Tattha 
katamam uddhaecani? Yam eittassa uddhaccam avüpa- 
samo, eetaso vikkhepo, bhantattam cittassa, idam vuccati 
uddhaecam. Yass’ etam uddhaccam pahmam samue- 
chinnam vüpasantam patipassaddham abhabbuppattikam 
папавріпа daddham, so vuceati anuddhato ti, mantabhani 
anuddhato. 

Sa ce cádcügato талт ti. Idha bhikkhu musavadain pahaya 
musavada pativirato hoti saecavüdi saccasandho theto 
paecayiko avisamvádako lokassa.  Pisunam уасат pahàya 
pisunáya vaeaya pativirato hoti; ito sutvà na amutra 
akkhatà imesam bhedàaya, amutra và sutvā na imesam 
akkhátà amüsam bhedáya; iti bhinnánam và ѕапаһаіа, 
sahitànam уй anuppadátà, вашассагашо  samaggarato 
samagganandi  samaggakaranim  vücam — bhásità. hoti. 
Pharusaii vàeam paháya pharusüya vācāya  pativirato 
hoti; уа ва vàcà nelà kannasukha pemaniya? hadayan- 
сата pori bahujanakantà bahujanamanàpà, tathārūpim 
vàcam  bhásiti hoti. Samphappalipam pahāya sam- 
рһаррајара pativirato hoti, kalavàdi bhutavádi atthavad! 
dhammavádi vinayavadi nidànavatim * vàeam bhàsità hoti, 
kàlena sápadesam pariyentavatim atthasamhitam. Catuhi 
vacisucaritehi вашаппасабо ^ — catudosügatam vācam 
bhásati, dvattimsáya9 tiraechanakatháya rato? virato 
pativirato nikkhanto patinissattho? vippamutio? visam- 
учио vimariyadikatena 1° сеќава viharati. Dasavatthüni ™ 
katheti, seyyathidam appiechakatham katheti, santutthi- 
katham 12  pavivekakathanm !? asamsaggakatham — viriyà- 
rambhakatham i silakatham samādhikatham panñakatham 


1 BeK om. 2 p" 8 ad, dubbhasitam. 
3 Br Siya. 1 De 8 падпа. 5 бі “gatuan. 

° p" S battim?. 7 D" «d. assa. 
5 Br nissattiho ; B nissato. — " S vimutto. 

1" pr $ vipari". п В” S dasakathávatthuni. 

1? pr S «d. kathoti. 13 S ad. katheti. 


B OS viryàrubbha?. 


S.N. 851] Purābhedasuttuniddeso, 22] 


vimuttikatham | vimuttinànadassanakathan: | satipatthana- 
katham sammappadbànakathaii iddhippadakathumn indri- 
yakatham — balakatham — bojjhangakatham | maggakathin 
phalakatham nibbànakatham katheti. 

Vacadyato ti yatio pativatto gutto gopito! rakkhito 
samvuto? vüpasanto. 

Минт ti торат vuceati üànam? . . . ре... saüga- 
jàlam айсса so muni* ti, sa ve vücüyato muni. Ten 
аһа Bhagavà: 


Akkodhano asantási, avikatthi akukkuco, 
mantabhàni anuddhato, sa ve vàcáyato muni ti. 


Nirásatti anagate atitam nanusocati, 
vivekadassi phassesu ditthisu ca na 
niyyati. 4. 


Nirdsatti anagate ti авала vuceati tanhà ; yo гасо sürágo 
pe... abhijhà lobho akusalamulam. Yass’ ева 
ава ‘апра pahina samucchinnàá vüpasantà patipassaddha 
abhabbuppattikà nanagginà daddhà ti, evam pi niràsatti 
апасаќе * Аата evamrüpo siyam anàgatam addhànan 
ti, tattha nandin na samanváagameti?. | Evamvedano 
siyam, evamsaüho siyam, evamsamkhàro siyam, evam- 
vihnàno siyam anāgatam addhānan ti, tattha nandim па 
samanvigameti?, evam pl nirasatti anāgate. Athavā iti 
me cakkhu siya anāgatam addhānam, iti гіра ti, appati- 
laddhassa patilàbhaya eittam na panidahati, cetaso appa- 
nidhanapaecayá na tad abhinandati, па tad abhinandanto, 
evam pl nirásatti anagate. Iti me sotam siya anágatam 
addhànam, iti saddà ti... pe... iti me mano siya 
anàgatam addhaünam, iti dhamma ti, appatiladdhassa 
рава еШ аш па роли cetaso appanidhàna- 


* See p. 58. 


1 S gupito. 2 В” on. 

3 B» Š ad. уа раййа рајапапа amoho dhammavicayo 
sammaditthi. 

1 BP Sad. t. 5 B? 5 samannaneti. 


229 Atthakavaggo. [S.N. 851 


paecayá па tad abhinandati, па tad abhinandanto, evam 
pi nirásatti anàgate. Athavà imináham silena và vattena! 
và tapena va brahmacariyena và devo và bhavissuml 
devanüataro ?và ti?, appatiladdhassa patilibhüya cittam 
na panidahati?, cetaso appanidhanapaecayà па tad 
aAbhinandati, na tad abhinandanto, evam pi nirasatti 
anágate. 

tam nünusocati ti viparinatzm và vatthu na socati. 
Viparinatamhi* và vatthusmim na socati: cakkhum me 
viparinatan ti na socati, sotam me, ghānam me, jivhà me, 
kāyo me, rüpà me, saddà me, gandhà me, таза me, 
photthabba me, kulam me, сапат ° me, àvàso me, làbho 
me, yaso me, раѕашва me, suhham me, civaram me, 
pindapáto me, senàsanam me, gilünapaccayabhesajja- 
parikkhàro me, mātā me, pita me, bhàta me, bhagini me, 
putto me, dhità me, mitiamaeca? me, nàataka me, salohità 
me viparinatà ti па socati, па kilamati,na paridevati, na 
urattalim Кардаї, na sammoham apajjati ti, atitam 
nànusocati. 

Vivekudassi phassesi ti. Phasso ti cakkhusamphasso 
sotasamohasso ghánasamphasso jivhásamphasso kàya- 
samphasso manosamphasso adhivacanasamphasso pati- 
ghasampbasso sukhavedaniyo samphasso? dukkhavedaniyo 
samphasso?  adukkha-m-asukhavedaniyo  samphasso$ 
kusalo phasso akusalo phasso abyakato phasso kàmávacaro 
phasso rūpāvacaro phasso агӣрауасаго phasso suünato 
phasso animitto phasso appanihito phasso lokiyo phasso 
lokuttaro phasso atito phasso anágato phasso paecuppanno 
phasso; yo evarüpo phasso ррцвапа samphusanà samphu- 
sitatiam; ayam vuceati phasso. 

Vivekadussi phasses ti eakkhusamphassam — vivittam 
passati айєпа và attuniyena và niecena và dhuvena уй 
sassatena va aviparinamadhammena và. Sotasamphassam 


1 p" S vatena. ?-? DE ита; S Ya. 
3 5 маай. 1 p" S ?natagmim. 
^ p» $ gano. 9 p" 5 mitià me amacci. 


T D" phasso; S on. 8 Be S phasso. 


S.N. 851] Puraübhedasuttaniddeso. 228 


vivittam passati, ghànasamphassam  vivitiam раѕѕай, 
jivhásamphassam — vivittam passati,  kàyusamphassamn 
vivittam passati, manosamphassam  vivittam passati, 
adhivaeanasamphassam  vivittam passati, patighasam- 
рһавѕаш vivittam passati, sukhavedantyam samphassan t, 
dukkhavedaniyam samphassan !, adukkha-m-asukhaveda- 
niyam samphassam 1, kusalam phassam ? vivittam passati”, 
akusalam phassam ? vivittam passati ?, abyükatam phassam 
?vivittam passati? kàmávacaram phassam, rūpāvacaram 
phassam, arüpávaearam  phassam, lokiyam  phassam, 
*lokuttaram phassan? vivittam passati attena và attani- 
yena và niecena vå dhuvena và sassatena và aviparinàma- 
dhammena và. 

Athava айап phassam anagatebi ca * phassehi ° pac- 
cuppannehi ea phassehi? vivittam passati; anāgatam 
phassam atitehi са phassehi? paecuppannehi са phassehi 
vivittam passati; расепрраппаш  phassam  atitehi са 
phassehi? anagatehi ea phassehl vivittam passati. 

Аата ye te phassa агіуа anàsavà lokuttara sunnata- 
patisamyuttà9, te phasse vivitte passati rügena dosena 
mohena kodhena црапаһепа makkhena palàsena issáya 
maechariyena mayaya sátheyyena thambhena sirambhena 
mánena  atimanena  madena ратаіепа  sabbakilesehi 
sabbadueearitehi sabbadarathehi sabbaparilàhehi sabba- 
santápehi sabbàákusalàbhisamkhürehi vivitte passati ti, 
vivekadassi phassesu. 

Ditthisu са na пуа ti tassa dvasatthi ditthigatàni 
pahinàni samucchinnàni упраѕапійпі patipassaddhàni 
abhabbuppattikaàni nànagginà daddhàni, so уа na 
yayati, na niyyati, na vuyhati, na samhariyati. na pi 
tam ditthigatam sárato paceeti paecágaechati ti, ditthisu 
са па niyyati. Теп’ аһа Bhagavà: 


1 В” $ phassain. 2-2 Dr S om. 
3-3 В» от. 

1 B" 8 ad. paceuppannehi ea. 

5 В? S от. ° S ad. ti. 


Atthakavaggo. (S.N. 859 


t5 
(RG) 
H> 


Nirāsatti anagate айаш nanusocali, 
vivekadassi phassesu ditthisu ca na niyyati ti. 


Patilino akuhako, apihálu amuaceharir, 
&appagabbho ajeguceho, pesuneyye ca 


no yuto. 5. 


Patiltiuo akuhako ti. — Patilino ti тасаѕва pahinattà 

patilino, dosassa !pabhinattà patilino!, mohassa pahinattà 
patilino, kodhassa upanáhassa makkhassa palásassa issàya 
maecharziyassa . . . pe . . . sabbakusalabhisamkhárànam 
pahinattà, patilino 2. 
. Vuttam h' etam Bhagavatà: * Kathan са bhikkhave 
bhikkhu patilino hoti? Idha? bhikkhave bhikkhuno 
asmimàno райпо hoti uecchinnamülo tàlàvatthukato 
*ganabhàávam gato? àyatim anuppüádadhammo ; evam kho 
bhikkhave? bhikkhu райпо hoti ti, patilino*. 

Akuhako9 ti. Tini kuhanavatthuni, paecayapatisevana- 
samkhàátam kuhanavatthu, iriyapathasamkhatam kuhana- 
vatthu, samantajappanasamkhàtaun kuhanavatthu. 

Katamam paeeayapatisevanasaimikhatam kuhanavatthu ? 
Idha gahapatikà bhikkhum nimantenti civarapindapata- 
senásanagilanapaeeayabhesajjaparikkbarehi. So pápiecho 
iechápakato atthiko — eivarapindapátasenàásanagilanapae- 
eayabhesajjaparikkharünam, bhiyyo kamyatam upadàya 
eivaram paccakkháti, pindapátam  paeeakkhàti, senāsa- 
nam paceakkhàti, milànapacenyabhesajjaparikkharam pac- 
eakkhati. бо evam aha: kim samanassa mahagghena 
eivarena ? Etam вагарраш yam  samano susánà và 
sankürakütà và papanikà và nantakaàni? uceinitvà? sam- 
ghàtim katva" dháreyya. Kim samanassa mahagghena 


* A. n, 41. 
1-1 pr om. ? S ad. ti. 
3 Br idh' assa; 8 imassa. 
4—4 D" anabbavankato. 5 Š on. 9 S ad. hoti. 


7 B? pantarikàni ; Š nandakani. 
в S ucchitva. 9 S karitvà. 


S. N: 852] Puraübhedasuttanidd.so. 235 


pindapitena ? Etam  sirüppani yam samano uñcha- 
carivàya piudiyálopena ]jivikam kappeyya. Kin sama- 
nassa mahagghena senüsanena? Etam sárüppam yam 
samano rukkhamüliko và assa, sosaniko và abbhokasiko 
và. Kim samanassa mahagghena gilünapaceayabhesajja- 
parikkhàrena? ат sārūppam yam samano pütimuttenu 
và haritakikhandena và osadham ! Кагеууа ti, tadupadaya 
lükham eivaram dháreti, làkham piudapátam bhunjati ?, 
lükham senàsanam  patisevati, lükham —gilinapaceaya- 
bhesajjaparikkhàram patisevati. Tam enam gabapatikā 
evam jànanti: ayam samano appiecho santuttho pavivitto 
asamsattho àraddhaviriyo dhutavádo ti; bhiyyo bhiyyo 
nimantenti eivarapindapátasenasanagilànapaeeayabhesajja- 
parikkhàrehi. So evam аһа: tinnam sammukhibhüva 
saddho kulaputto bahum punnam pasavati. Saddhàya 
sammukhibhàvà saddho kulaputto bahum punnam pasa- 
vati; deyyadhammassa sammukhibhàvá saddho kulaputto 
bahum райдат pasavati; dakkhineyvánam  sammukhi- 
bhāvā saddho kulaputto bahum puññam pasavati,. Tum- 
hàkan e` evàyam ѕадаһа atthi. Deyyadhammo саха % 
samvijati. Аһай са patggahako. Бас’ àham na patigga- 
hessáàmi, evam tumhe рийпепа parihina? bhavissatha. 
Na mayham imina attho, арі са tamhákan ñeva anukam- 
paya patigganhami ії, tad upādāya bahum pi cīvaram 
patigganhà ti, bahum pi pindapátam patigganháti, bahuin 
pi senasanam patigganháti, bahum рі gilānapaccaya- 
bhesajjaparikkharam patigganhati: уа evarüpa bhakutiká 
bhákutiyam Каһапа kuhavana kuhitattam?; idam vuecati? 
patisevanasamlhàtam* kuhanavatthu. 

KRatamam irlyàpsthasamkhátam  kuhanavatthu? Idi” 
ekacco pàpiecho iechápakato sambhavanadhippáyo: evam 
mam jano sambbávissati ? ti gamanam santhapeti, (Шапа 


1 Si osathain. 2 8 paribh°. 

3 B? sayam ; Š ca. + В" S paribáhirà. 
5 5 kuhayitattam. 8 prison. 

7 В" 8 paeeayapat. . 8 В” ?vessati. 


15 


226 ditlakavaqgo. [S.N. 852 


santhapeti, nisajjam santhapeti!, sayanam ? santhapeti °: 
panidháya gaechati, panidhàya titthati, panidhàya nisidati, 
panidhäya seyyam kappeti, sam&hito viya gacehati, sama- 
hito viya titthati, samàhito viya nisidati, samáhito viya 
seyyam Каррей, àpadakajjhayi еа* hoti; уа evarūpā 
irnyàpathassa àathapana? santhapanà bhakutika bhaku- 
tyam kubana kuhayanáà kuhitattam ; idam iriyapatha- 
samkhaátam kuhanavatthum. 

Katamam samantajappanasamkhátam kuhanavatthum ? 
Idh' ekaeco рарісеһо iechápakato sambhavanádhippàyo: 
evam mam Jano sambhàvissati? ti ariyadhammasannissitam 
vácam bhàásati. Yo evarupam civaram dhareti, so samano 
mahesakkho ti bhanati yo evarupam pattam dhareti, 
lohathàlakam dháreti, dhammakarakam? dhàreti, pari- 
sivanam dhareti, kuneikam dhàreti, араһапат dhareti, 
kayabandhanam dhàáreti, àyogam dhāreti, so ѕашапо 
mahesakkho ti bhanati. Yassa evarüpo upajjhayo, so 
samano mahesakkho ti bhanati; yassa evarüpo ácarlyo, 
evarüpà ѕватапирајјһауака samàánácariyakà mittā san- 
ditthà sambhattà ѕаһауа, so samano mahesakkho ti 
bhanati. Yo evarüpe vihüre vasati, so samano mahe- 
sakkho ti bhanati. Yo evarüpe addhayoge vasati, pasade 8 
vasati, hammiye vasati, guhàyam  vasati lene тавай, 
kutiyà vasati, kutagare vasati, atte vasati, male vasati, 
uddande vasati, upatthanasalayam? vasati, mandape vasati, 
rukkhamule vasati, so samano mahesakkho ti апай. 

Athavà korajikakorajiko bhákutikabhakutiko !? kuhaka- 
kuhako lapakalapako mukhasambhavito ayam samano 
imáüsai evarüpánam santànam vihàrasamápattimam lābbī™ 
tadisam gambhiram guyham!? nipunnam patieehannam 


1 5 kappeti. 2 Б sayanàsanam. 
3 Ñ thapeti. * Воҳа. 

? p" аА ћарапа арала; S апа арапа. 

9 p" ?vessati. ? D" karanami. 

8 S ad. vā. 9 8 upatthàyam. 
"5 bhàkutiyabhákutiyo. N § ad. ti. 


7? Be S gulha(m). 


S.N. 852] DPurübhedasuttaniddeso. 227 


lokuttarasubhatapatisamyuttam katham katheti; уа eva- 
тара bhakutika bhàkutiyam kuhanà kuhàyana kubā- 
yitattam 1, idam — sámantajappanasamkhaátam kuhana- 
уа ат. 

Yass’ imàni tmi kuhanavatthüni pahináni samuc- 
chinnāni vüpasantàni patipussaddhàáni abhabbuppattikàni 
nànagginà daddhàni, so vuccati akuhako ti, patilino 
aluhako. 

Apihalu  amacchari tìi. Pihà vuceati барһа; yo rago 
sarago . .. pe . . . abhijjha lobho akusalamūlam. Yass’ 
ева pihà? pahina samucchinnà vüpasantà patippassaddhà 
abhabbuppattikà ñanageima daddhà, so vuceati apihàlu. 
So rüpe па piheti, sadde gandhe rase photthabbe kulam 
Sanam àvàsam labham yasam pasamsam sukham сітагаш 
piudapàtam senásanam gilànapaecayabhesajjaparikkhàrum 
kàmadhátum —rüpadbátum  arüpadhatum — kàmabbav:un 
rüpabhavam arüpabhavam saünàbhavam asannabhavum 
nevasaññanasannabhavam  ekavokarabhavam catuvokara- 
bhavam pancavokarabhavam  atitam anagatam paccup- 
раппа ditthasutamutaviünhàtabbe dhamme па pileti, 
na icchati, na sadiyati?, na pattheti, nàbhijappati ti. 
apihàlu. 

Amaechari ti panea macchariyüni, ávasamaechariyam 
kulamaeehariyam làbhamaecehariyam vaunpamaechariyun 
dhammamacchariyam ; yam  evarüpum  maccehariyam ? 
maeeharáyanü  maceharayitattam | vevieeham — kadariyiun 
katukafücakatà? aggahitattam cittassa, idam vuecati mac- 
chariyam. Арі ea khandhamaechariyam pi maechariyam, 
dhàtumaechariyam pi macchariyam, àyatanamaechariyam 
pi maechariyam, gāho vuceati maccharlyaim. Yass’ etam 
pahinam? vüpasantam patippassaddham abhabbuppattikam 
ñanaggina daddham, so vueeati :maechari ti, apihālu 
пшассћагт. 


1 B» S kuhitattam. ? p" S ad. tanhá. 
з pP %ууаы. а Be S maccheram. 
5 В” katukaneukata; 5 katikancakata. 

6 B? S «d. samuechinnam. 


228 Aff hakavaggqo. [S.N. 852 


Appagabblo: ajeqguccho ti. Págabbhiyan! ti tini pāgab- 
bhiyàni kàyikum pagabbhiyam, vácasikam pagabbhiyanm, 
cetasikam pagabbhiyam. 

Katamam kàyikam pagabbhiyam? Idh’ екассо saügha- 
gato pi kayikam págabbhiyam dasseti, ganagato рі kayikam 
расар шуат dasseti, bhojanasálayam pi kayikam pāgab- 
bhiyam dasseti, jantaghare? pi kāyikam  pàgabbhivam 
dasseti, udakatitthe pi kàyikam pàgabbhiyam  dasseti, 
antaragharam pavisanto pi Кауікат pagabbhiyam dasseti, 
antaragharam pavittho pi kayikam pàgabbhiyam dasseti. 

Katham saüghagato kàyikam  págabblhniyam  dasseti? 
Idh' ekaeeo saüghagato acittikārakato there bhikkhu 
ghattayanto pi titthati, ghattayanto pi nisidatj, purato 
pi titthati, purato pi nisidati, ucce pi авале nisidati, 
sasisam — pàrupitvà ? pi nisidati, thitako pi bhanati, 
báhavikkhepako pi bhanati; evam saünghagato kāyikam 
pàgabbhiyam dasseti. I 

Katham ganagato kayikam págabbhiyam dasseti? Idh’ 
ekacco ganagato acittikarakato therànam  bhikkhünam 
anupühanánam eankamantànam sa-upáhano! cankamati, 
nice саћкате cankamantànim uece cahkame cankauati, 
chamáyam  eankamantànam салкате eankamati, ghatta- 
yanto pi titthati, ghattayanto pi nisidati: purato pi 
titthati, purato pi nisidati, песе pi аѕапе nisidati, sasisam 
parupitvà pi nisidati, thitako pi bhanati, bàhavikkhepako 
рі апай; evam ganagato kayikam pagabbhiyam dasseti. 

Каат bhojanasalàya kàyikam pàgabbhhiyam dasseti? 
Idh' ekaeco bhojanasalàya acittiárakato there bhikkhü 
auupakhajja nisidati, nave pi bhikkhü àsavena patibāhati, 
ghattayanto рі titthati, ghattayanto pi nisidati, parato рі 
titthati, parato pi nisidati, песе pi àsane nisidati, sasisam 
pàrupitvà pi nisidati, thitako pi bhanati, báhàvikkhepako 
рі bhanati; evam bhojanuasalàya kayikam  pàgabbhiyam 
dasseti. 


! D? рада" throughout. ? S ?gharato. 
з p" рагареіха; S parumpetva. 
^ 5 vupáhano. ° B" 5 ehamàáya. 


S.N. 852] Purābhedasuttaniddesa. 229 


Katham jantāghare kāyikam pāgabbhiyam das>eti? 
Idh' ekaeco jantāghare aeittikarakato there  bhhikkhu 
zshattayanto pi titthati, ghattayanto pi nisidati, purato 
pi titthati, purato pi nisidati, uece pi āsane nisidati, 
anipuecham рі апајј һо pi kattham —pakkhipati, 
dváram ! pidahati, báhavikkhepako pi bhanati; evam 
jantaghare kayikam pàgabbhiyam dasseti. 

Katham udakatitthe kayikam pagabbhiyan dasseti? 
Idh? ekacco wudakatitthe acittikàrakato there bhikkhu 
ghattayanto pi ofarati, purato pi otarati, ghattayanto pi 
nhiyati?, purato pi nhàyati?, uparito? pi nhàyati?, chatta- 
yanto pi uttarati, purato pi uttarati, uparito? рі uttarati; 
evam udakatitthe kàylkam pàgabbhiyam dasseti. 

Katham antaragharain pavisanto kayikam pàgabbhiyam 
dasseti? Idh’ ekaeco antaragharam  pavisanto acitti- 
Кагакаќо there bhikkhu ghattayanto pi gacchati, purato pi 
gaechati, vokkamma pi therinam bhikkhunam purato* 
gaechati; evam antaragharam pavisanto kayikam pāgab- 
bhiyam dasseti. 

Каат antaragharam pavittho kayikam paágabbhiyam 
dasseti? Idh’ ekacco antaragharam pavittho na pavisa 
bbante ti vuceamàno pavisati, na И һа bhante ti vucca- 
mano titthati, na nisida? bhante ti vuecamàno nisidati, 
апокаѕат pi? pavisati, anokàse pi titthati, anolküse pi 
nisidati; vāni? (апі honti kulànam ovarakàüni? gułhāni ° 
са patieehannani са, yattha kulitthiyo  kuladhitaro 19 
kulasunhayo kulakumüriyo nisidanti, taitha pi ваһава 
pavisati, kumarakassa pi sisam!! paràmnasati; evam antara- 
gharam рау Шо kayikam pagabbhiyam dasseti: idam 
layikam pagabbhiyam. 


1 D? ad. рі. ? S паһа?. 

3 Bi upari. + Br S ad, purato. 
5 Š nisidatha. 

° Son. 7. Sad. pl. 


5 Š evodakani. 9 Sie Codd. 
0 B" kaladhitayo. п Ви S siram. 


230 Afthakavegqo. [S.N. 852 


Katamam vàeasikam pàgabbhiyam ?  Idh' еКассо san- 
ghagato pi vàeasikam pàágabbhiyam dasseti, ganagato pi ! 
vācasikam pàgabbhiyam dasseti, antaragharam  pavittho 
pi vācasikam pagabbhiyam dasseti. 

Каат sanghagato vācasikam pàgabbhiyam dasseti? 
Idh’ екассо sanghagato? acittikarakato there bhikkhü 
апарасећат và anajjhittho và dhammam bhauati, pañham 
visajjeti, pitimokkham  uddisat, thitako? pi bhanati, 
bàhavikkhepako pi bhanati: evam saüghagato vacasikam 
pàgabbhiyanm dasseti. 

Ratham ganagato vácasiham  pàgabbhiyam  dasseti? 
Idh’ екассо ganagato aecittikirakato there bhikkhü апа- 
puecham và anajjhittho và àramagatánam bhikkhünam 
dhammam bhanati, panham visajjeti, thitako pi bhanati, 
bàhavikkhepako pi bhanati, àràmagatànam bhikkhuninam 
upásakànam  upásikanam dhammam  bhanati, paüham 
visajjeti, thitako pi bhanati, bahavikkhepako pi bhanati; 
evam ganagato váeasikam pāgabbhiyam dasseti. 

Katham antaragharam pavittho vàcasikam págabbhiyam 
dasseti? Idh’ екассо antaragharam pavittho т * và 
kumárim? và аһа: itthannàme itthamgotte kim atthi? 
Yagu atthi, bhattam айі, khádaniyam ай? Kim 
pivissama, kim bhunjissima, kim khàdissāma, kim và 
а, kim và me dassathà? ti vippalapati. Yo evarüpo 
vácapalapo  vippalàpo làlappo lalappayana © lalappayi- 
tattam ?; evam antaragharam pavittho vácasikam pagab- 
bhiyam dasseti; idam vacasikam págabbhiyam. 

Katamam cetasikam pàgabbhiyam?  Idh' ekaeco na 
песка pabbajito samàno ueeikula? pabbajitena saddhim 
sadisam attanam dahati cittena; na mahàákulà pabbajito 
samáno такша pabbajitena saddhim sadisam attànam 
dahati eittena; na mahabhogakula pabbajito samàno 
mahabhogakulài pabbajitena saddhim sadisun attànam 


! S onm. 2 Sad. pi. 


? 8 vivādako. 4 8 Ш. 
б kumari. 6 p" lalappana. 


T D" lilappatattun. ? 5 *kulena. 


S.N. 859] Puraübhedasuttauidd: so. 231 


dahati cittena ; na ularabhogakula pabbajito samàno, па 
suttantiko samano suttantikena saddhim sadisam attünam 
dahati cittena, na vinayadharo! ѕашапо, na dhamma- 
kathiko samáno, áraññiko samáno, na pindapátiko sumiüno, 
па pamsuküliko samàáno, na teeivariko samaüno, na sapa- 
danaeáriko samáno, na khalupaeehàübhattiko sumáno, na 
пеѕајјіко samáno, na yathásanthatiko samano, na patha- 
massa jhànassa labhi samàno pathamassa jhánassa labhina 
saddhim sadisam attānam dahati cittena . . . pe . . . na 
nevasannanasannayatanasamápatijyà іар вашапо neva- 
sanñanasaññayatanasamapattiya labhina saddhim sadisam 
àttinam dahaü сепа; idam cetasikam  pagabbhiyam. 
Yass’ imáni tini págabbhiyáni pahináni samucchinnàni 
vüpasantàni patipassaddhani abhabbuppattikàni ñanaceina 
daddhàni, so vuecati appagabbho ti, appagabbho. 

Ajegwecho ti. Atthi puggalo jeguecho, atthi ajegue- 
cho. 

Katamo са puggalo jeguecho? Idh’ ekaeco puggalo 
dussilo hoti papadhammo аѕпсіѕаћкаѕвагаѕашасаго patic- 
channakammanto * assamano samanapatiino abrahmacari 
brahmaeáripatihiio antopüti avassuto kasambujàto: ayam? 
vuceati puggalo jeguecho. 

Athavà kodhano hoti upàyásabahulo, appam pi vutto 
ватапо abhisajjati kuppati* byápajjat patitthivati kopan 
cà dosaü са appaccayan ca pātukaroti; ayam vueeati 
puggalo jeguecho. Аф ауа kodhano hoti, upanáhi hoti, 
makkhi hoti, palisi hoti9, issuki hoti, maeehari hoti?, 
satho hoti, māyāvī hoti?, thaddho hoti, айтап hoti, 
рарісеһо hoti, nieeháditthi hoti?, sanditthiparámási hoti, 
ádhanagáhi? duppatinissaggi hoti; ayam vuceati puggilo 
jeguecho. 

Katamo ea pugealo ajeguecho? Idha bhikkhu silavà 
hoti, pàtimokkhasamvarasamvuto viharati áearagocara- 


1 5 viniyathero. 2 5 рагі. 
3 Sad. pi. 4 S kujjati. 
$ B" ou. 


5p'Son. 
7 B" adana: S atthanagà. 


232 Afthakavaggo. [ S.N. 852 


sampanno, anumaítesu vajiesu bhayadassávi samüdaya 
sikkhati sikkhapadesu; ayam vuecati puggalo ajeguccho. 

А Шауа akkodhano hoti anupàyüsabahulo!, bahum pi 
vutio ѕашапо па abhisajjati, na kuppati na byàpajjati 
na patitthiyati na Кораћ ea dosaü са appaecayan са 
patukaroti. Ayam vuecati puggalo ajegueeho. 

Аіһата akkodhano hoti, anupanahi hoti?, amakkhri 
hoti, apalàsi hoti?, anissukī hoti, amacchari һо, 
asatho hoti, amāyāvī hoti*, athaddho hoti, anatimani 
hoti?, па рарісећо hoti, na miechaditthi hoti ?, asanditthi- 
рагашав hoti, anadhanagáhi?  hoti?, suppatinissaggi 
hoti?; ayam vuccati puggalo ajeguecho. | Sabbo? kalyana- 
pathujjanam? upadàya ariyapuggalo ajeguccho ti, appa- 
gabbho ajeguccho. 

Pesuneyye са no yuto ti pesuññan H idh’ ekaeco pisuna- 
vāco hoti, ito sutvā amutra akkhātā imesam bhedāya, 
amutra và sntvaá imesam akkhata amuüsam Dhedāya; iti 
samaggànam? vā bheità?, bhinnānam và anuppadātā, 
vagearamo vaggarato vagganandri vaggakaranim vicam 
bhasità hoti; idam vuccati pesunnam. 

Арі са dvihi káranehi pesunnam upasamharati, piya- 
kainyatàya và bhedádhippàyo va. 

latham —piyakamyataya pesuňňam —upasamharati? 
Imassa piyo bhavissàmi, manapo bhavissimi, vissásiko 
bhavissami, abbhantariko bhavissimi, suhadayo bhavissàmi 
ti; evam рїуаКашуа!ауа pesuhnam upasamharati. 

Каат — bhedadhippáyo pesuññam — upasaniharati ? 
Каћаш ime nānā!’ assu, "vinà assu!', vagga assu, 
dvedhà !? assu, dvejjha assu, dvepakkhà assu, bhijjeyyum 
na samàgaeeheyyum, dukkham na phàsu vihareyyun ti; 


! S ad. hoti. 2 p» S on. 3 S anussuki. 
а D" om. ^ pr ànádana? ; S anadhamae. 
9 D" S «d. bàlaputhujjana jegueeho puthujjanà. 

? Br kalyänakam puthujjuna ; Skalyanakmm. 
8 
9 


D" S «d. attha. 
3" У bhedo. 19 S ad. уйда. 
u= § om. 12 5 dvedhamhā. 


S.N. 853] Durábhcedasuttauiddeso. э 


evam bhedādhippāyo pesuññam  upasamharati. Yass’ 
etam pesuññam pahinam samuechinnam vüpasantani pati- 
passaddham abhabbuppattikam mnànagginà daddhani so 
pesuhüe! na yutto na-ppayutto nāyutto? na samayullo ti, 
pesuneyye са no yuto. Теп’ аһа Dhagavaà : 


Patilino akuhako, apiháülu amacchari, 
appagabbho ajeguecho, pesuneyye ca no yuto ti. 


Sátiyesu anassávi atimane са no 


yuto, 
sunho ca patibhànavá, na saddho па 
virajjati. 6. 


Satiyesu «nassáct ti sátiyà vuecanti panca kimaguna. 
Kimkarana sátiyà vuccanti panca kümagunà? Yebhuy- 
yena devamanussi palea kàmagune iechanti südivanti 
patthayanti pihayanti abhijappantü, tamkarana saātiyā 
vuecanti pala kámagund. Yesam  esà satiya tanhà 
appahinà, tesam eakkhuto rüpatanhà ватай? pasavati 
sandati pavattati, sotato saddatanhà, ghànato gandhatanhá, 
jivháto  rasatanha, kàyato  photthabbatanhà, manato 
dhammatanhà savati pasavati* sandati pavattati. Yesam 
esi вайуй tanhà pahinà ватиссһіппа vüpasania pati- 
passaddhà abhabbuppattikà mnànagginà daddha. tesam 
cakkhuto rüpatanhà na savati, ?na pasavati?, na sandati, 
na pavatiati, sotato saddatanhà . . . pe.. . manato 
dhammatanha na savati, na pasavati?. na sandati, na 
pavattati ti, sàtiyesu апаѕѕахтї. 

.Hünine ca no yuto” ti. Katamo atimáno? Idh’ ekaeco 
param atimannati jatiyà và gottena và . . . pe . . . anna- 
taranhatarena vi vatthuna; yo evarüpo màáno, mannaná 
manhitattam unnati unnamo dhajo ѕатрассаһо ` ketu- 


l p? ad. no упо (and probably 9). 

2 BU бои. ` 3 pr S ud. àsavati. 

4 B" S аѕахай. 5—5 Be na savati: S nāssavati. 
6-6 Br" S nāssavati. T Si yutto. 

8 


Š sanisageo. 


234 Atlhakavaggo. (S.N. 853 


kamy:stà eittassa, ayam vuecati atimáno. ' Yass' eso! 


айшапо pahmo? samucchinno vüpasanto patipassaddho 
abhabbuppattiko fiánagginà daddho, so atimáne? no упо“, 
nà-ppayutto, nàyuito?, na samāyutto ti, atimāne ea no 
yuto. 

ано ca palibhanavá ti. Sanko ti sanhena kàya- 
kammena samannágato ti sanho, sanhena vacikammena 7, 
sanhena manokammena ѕатаппасаіо ti sanho, sanhehi 
satipatthanehi samannágato ti sanho, sanhehi sammappa- 
dhànehi, sanhehi iddhippádehi, sanhehi? indriyehi, san- 
hehi balehi, sanhehi bojjhaügehi samannigato ti sanho, 
sanhena ariyena atthaügikena maggena samannàágato ti 
sanho. 

Pathbhüsavà ti. “Tayo  patibhanavanto", parlyatti- 
patibhànavà paripueehápatibhanavà adhigamapațibhāņavā. 

Katamo pariyattipatibhanava ? Idh' ekaceassa? pari- 
yàputam hoti suttam geyyam  veyyákaranam (баа 
udànam itivuttakam јаҳакаш abbhutadhammam vedallam. 
Tassa pariyattim піѕѕауа patibhayati; ayam  pariyatti- 
patibhànava. 

Katamo paripuechapatibhánava? Idb’ ekaeco pari- 
pueehako ° hoti attatthe ea ñayatthe ca lakkhane са 
kàrane са thànathüne са. Tassa tam paripuechanm піввауа 
patibhayati; ayam paripueeliápatibhànavà. 

Katamo adhigamapatibhànava?  ldh' ekaecassa adhi- 
gatà honti eattàro satipatthīnā, eattàro sammappadhana, 
eattàro iddhippádà, райе? idriyàni, panea balàni, satta 
bojjhañea, ariyo atthaügiko maggo?9, eattàri!! ѕашайћа- 
phalāni, eatasso!! patisambhidà !?, cha abhitnà 12; tassa 
attho nato, dhammo nato, nirutti ñata, atthe nate attho 


1-1 Š yassn su. 2 S 0n. 3 B ad. са. 


3 p' S yuto па yutto. ° D" Som. 
$-6 Si om. T Sad. samannagato. 


9 B" S ad. pakatiyà. 

9 p"?pucehità ; S ^puechakatà. 
10 Jr S ud. eattàro ca ariyamaggà. 
n S cattaro ca. 


E 
t 


* D» S уо. 


853] DPurábhedasuttauiddeso. 235 


patibhayati, dhamme ñate dhammo patibhayati, niruttiya 
hàtàya nirutti patibhayati; idmesu tisu nànam pati- 
bhànapatisambhidà. пауы — patibhànapatisambhidaya 
upeto samupeto upagato samupagato upapanno samupa- 
panno! samannāgato hoti?; so vuccati patibhanavà. 

Yassa pariyatti n’ atthi, paripuechá n’ atthi, adhigamo 
n' atthi, kim tassa patibháyissati ti. sanho ca pati- 
bhànavá. 

Ха saddho na cirajjatt ti. Ха хад По ti simam sayam 
abhiññátam attapaechakkham dhammam па Каѕѕасі sad- 
dhahati? anñassa samanassa và brahmanassa và devassa 
vā márassa уа *narassa và * brahmuno và. Sabbe sanı- 
khārā aniceà ti simam sayam abhiünnátam ?attapacchak- 
kham dhammam ла kassaci saddhahati annassa samanassa 
và brahmauassa và devassa vā mārassa vā narassu và 
brahmuno và Sabbe samkharáà dukkhá ti, sabbe 
dhamma anattà ti. ауіујарассауа samkhārā ti . . . pe 
jàtipaeceayà jaràmaranan ti avijjánirodhà s: айша тойо 
ti... pe... jatinirodhà jarámaraunanirodho ti. Idam 
dukkhan ti... pe... ayam dukkhanirodhagamini 
райрада ti. Ime àsavà ti.. . pe... ayam ñsava- 
nirodhagamini patipada ti. Ime dhammàá abhiünevya 
ti... реб... ime dhammáà saeehikatabba ti. Channam 
phassáyatanànam samudayan ea atthaigamaù са assadan 
са ddinavan ea nissaranah са, pancannam upidanak- 
lk handhànam samudayan са 5atthanzaman ca assádan са 
àdinavaà са nissaraual ca?, catunnam mahabhütanam 
samudayan ea atthangaman ea assádaü са àdinavan ca 
nissaranan? cà ti”. Yam kiBei samudayadhammain, sab- 
bantam nirodhadhamman ti simam sayam ablinnàátaimn 
attapaecakkham dhamm:un па kassaei saddhahati annassa 


1 В” S sampanno. 2 t S on. 
3 S saddahati. 3-5 B' S on. 
5-5 Be S pe. 6 Som. 


7 D" S ad. sànam sayam abhiññatan . + . pe. 
t-8 D" pe. 
9? 8 са; aud В" S «d. sàmam sayam айдаба. 


25t 


Š 


Affhakacaggo. [S.N. 853 


samanassa và таршараѕѕа và devassa và marassa và 
narassa và brahmuno va!. 

Vuttam h' etam Dhagavatà : *Saddahasi хаш Sariputta 
saddhindrivam bháüvitam bahulikatam amatogadham hoti 
amatapariyanam amatapariyosanam, viriyindriyam satin- 
driyan sunádhindriyam paññindriyam bhàvitam bahuli- 
katam amatogadham hoti amataparàyanam  amatapari- 
yosinan? ii Na khváham ettha bhante Dhagavato 
saddhàya gaechimi, saddhindriyam viriyindriyam satindri- 
yam samádhidriyam panhindriyam  bhávitam  bahuli- 
katam amatogadham hoti amataparüyanam  amatapari- 
yosanam. Үеѕат nuün' etam bhante añaátamƏ assa adittham 
aviditam asaechikatam  uphusitam? pannàya, te tattha 
paresam saddhàya gacchey yum, saddhindriyam .. . pet. . 
pahhindriyam bhàvitam bahulikatam amatogadham hoti 
amataparàyanam amatapariyosinan ti?  Yesan са kho 
etam? bhante natam dițtham  viditam — sacehikatam 
phusitam ё раплауа, nikkamkhàá te tattha nibbieikiceha, 
saddhindriyam viriyindriyam satindriyam samáadhindriyam 
pahüindriyam bhávitam bahulīkatun amatogadham hoti 
amataparüyanam amatapariyosünan ti; mayhan са kho 
etun? bhante ñátam а Һат viditam saechikatum phu- 
sita  paññaya. nikkamkho? 'ham tattha nibbieikiecho, 
saddhindriyam viriyindriyam satindriyam samàdhindriyam 
pannimdriyam bbhávitam bahulikatam amatogadham hoti 
amataparàyanam  amatapariyosanan ti.  Sádhu sādhu 
Sāriputta. Yesam h’ etam Sariputta anátam assa adittham 
aviditam asacchikatam aphusitam" райһауа, te tattha 
paresam saddhàya gaceheyywm, saddhindriyam ... pe... 


S. v, 220. 


1 Br Sad. pe. ? Son. ? pr S aphassitam. 

а pr S in gall bhāvitam ... amatapariyosanam viri- 
yindriyam satiudriyam sumadhindriynnm, 

5 S evan. 9 Be S phassitam. 

T D" phassitam ; S onm. D? S nikkaükha. 

° D'aphassitam: S aphasitam. 


S.N. 854] DPurabhedasuttauilil so. 237 


paünindriyam bhàvitam bahulikatam.  amatogadhain hoti 
amatapariyanam amataparivosinan ti. 


*Assaddho akataniüü са sandhiechedo са yo naro, 
hativaküso vantaso, sa ve! uttamaporiso ti. 


Na? rirajj«ti ti sabbe bülaputhujjanà rajjanti.  Kalyána- 
puthujjanam? прайдуа satta sekhá virajjanti. Агаһа n’ 
eva rajjatl, no virajjati; virato* so khaya rágassa vitar& 
кайа, khaya dosassa vitadosattà, khayi mohassa vitamo- 
hattà ; so vatthaváso? einnaearano . . . pef... n' atthi 
tassa punabbhavo ti, na saddho na virajjati. Ten’ аһа 
Bhagavà : 


Sütiyesu anassávi atimáne са no yuto, 
sanho ea patibhànavà, па saddho na virajjati ti. 


Labhukamyàa na sikkhati. alàbhe ca 
па kuppati, 

aviruddho ea tanhàya rase са nànu- 
gijjhati. fa 


Lābhakamyā na sikkhati, alābhe са na Карра ti. 
Каат labhakamya na sikkhati? Idha bhikkhave 
bhikkhu bhikkhum passati libhim civarapindapatasena- 
sanagilànapaeeayabhesajjJaparikkharanam. Tassa evam 
hoti: kena nu kho ayam ayasma lābhī eivarapindapáta- 
senisanagilanapaecavabhesajjaparikkhüranan ti? 7 Tassa 
evam hoti: ayam kho ayasmia suttantiko, tena avam 
àyasma ЬЫ eivarapindapátasenásanagilànapaceayabhe- 
sajjaparikkharánan ti. So làbhahetu làbhapaceaya làbha- 
karana labhübhinibbattiya làbham рагірасепбо suttantam 
pariyapunáti; evam pi làbhakamyi sikkhati. I 


* Dhp. 97. 
1 B* S ce. 2 В” S ad. saddho na. 
3 B" S puthujjanakalyánakam. 
4 B" S viratto. 5 S sabbatthaváso. 
6 


B” S ad, jütimaranasamsáro (5 ?^sankharo). 
1-7 В” om. 


238 Atthakavagqo. [S.N. 854 


Athavà bhikkhu bhikkhum passati labhim civarapinda- 
pàtasenásanagilanapaecayabhesajjaparikkhüránam. Tassa 
evam hoti: kena nu kho ayam āyasmā làbhi civara- 
pindapatasenasanagilanapaceayabhesajjaparikkharánan ti? 
Tassa evam hoti: ayam kho syasma vinayadharo . .. 
pe... abhidhammiko 1, tena ayam ayasma lābhī civara- 
piudapatasenasanaeilanapaceayabhesajjaparikkharanan ti, 
so làbhahetu làbhapaeeayà labhakaraná labhabhinibbattiyà 
làbham paripacento abhidhammam pariyüpunàti; evam pi 
làbhakamya sikkhati. 

Athavà bhikkhu bhikkhum passati lábhim civarapiuda- 
pàtasenasanagilànapaccayabhesajjaparikkharànam. Tassa 
evan hoti: kena nu kho ayam àyasmà làbhi civara- 
pindapàtasenasanagilànapaecayabhesajjaparikkharànan ti? 
Tassa evam hoti: ayam kho àyasmà araññiko pindapatiko 
pamsuküliko  teeivarlko  sapadànacariko — khalupaecha- 
bhattiko nesajjüko yathàásanthatiko, tena ayam àyasmà 
labhi eivarapindapatasenasanagilànapaceayabhesa]japarik- 
khaárànan ii. бо làbhahetu làbhapaecayà labhalkàranà 
làbhàbhinibbattiyà làbham paripàcento àranniko hoti. .. 
pe . . . yathásanthatiko hoti; evam pi labhakamyà 
sikkhati. 

Каат na labhakamyà sikkhati? Idha bhikkhu na 
labhaheiu, na labhapaeeaya, na làbhakáranà, na làbhà- 
bhinibhattiyà, na làbham paripàcento уауаа eva attada- 
mathàya attasamathaya attaparinibbapanatthaya suttantam 
pariyápunati, vinayam рагіуарипай, abhidhammam pariyà- 
раі; evam pi na labhakamyà sikkhati. Athava bhikkhu 
па làbhahetu, па labhapaceaya, na làbhakàranà, na làbhà- 
bhinibbattiyà, na labhami рагірасепёо yivad eva appicchan 
heva nissàya, santutthin neva nissáya, sallekhan Teva 
nissiya, pavivekan пета nissaya, idam atthitaü ñeva nissáya 
araññiko hoti. pindapàtiko hoti, pamsuküliko hoti, teci- 
variko hoti, sapadānacāriko hoti, khalupaccehàbhattiko 
оё, nesajjiko hoti, yathāsanthatiko hoti; evam pi ua 
lāäbhakamyā sikkhati tj, lāūbhakamyā na sikkhati. 


1 p» S dhammakathiko. 


S.N. 854] Purálhedasuttaniddeso. 339 


Alübhe lea na? kuppatt ti. Каат alàbhe kuppati ? 
Idh’ ekaeco kulam và na labhàmi, ganam và na labhàmi, 
ауавашт và na labhàmi, làbham và na labhámi, уаѕаш 
và ла labhàmi, pasamsam và па labhàmi, suhham và 
na labhami, ecivaram và na labhami, pindapátam và na 
labhàmi, senàsanam và па labhàmi, gilànapaccayabhesa)]a- 
parikkháram và па labhámi, gilànupatthàkam vā na 
labhàmi, appanáto "mhi ti kuppati byápajjati patitthiyati?, 
kopañ ea dosañ са appaecayan са patukaroti?; evam alābhe 
kuppati. 

Katham alàbhe na huppati? Idha bhikkhu kalam ха 
na labhàmi, сапат và па labhámi, ?àvàásam và na 
labhámi, labham và na labhàmi, yasam và na labhami, 
pasamsam và па labhami, sukham và na labhàmi, civaram 
vā na labhàmi, pindapátam và na labhàámi, senásanam 
và na labhámi, gilànapaecayabhesajjaparikkharam và па 
labhàmi, gilàanupatthàkam và na labhàmi?*, appanáto 'mhi 
ti na kuppati, па byipajjati па patitthiyati?, na Кораћ 
ea na dosan са аррассауай ca patukaroti; evam alībhe 
па kuppati tj, labhakamya па sikkhati, alàbhe ca па 
kuppati. 

Aciruddho ca tanhàya rase са nánugijjhati ti. Virnddho 
ti yo cittassa арһаіоё patighato ? anuvirodho? Коро 
pakopo sampakopo doso padoso sampadoso cittassa byi- 
patti manopadoso? cittassa !? kodho kujjhana kujjhitattam 
doso dussana dussitattam byapatti byapajjana byàapajji- 
{айаш virodho pativirodho eandikkam assuropo anatta- 
manatā cittassa; ayam vuecati virodho. 1 Yass’ eso! 
virodho pahino samuechinno vüpasanto patipassaddho 
abhabbuppattiko nànaggini daddho, so vuccati avi- 
ruddho. 


173 б na ea. 2 Si patitth?. 
2 B" pàtum°. 4—4 Dr ре, 
5 Si patititth?. % S ad. sampatighàto. 
t B" S «d. patigham. 8 В” pativirodho. 
9 8 manodoso. 1? Dr S on. 
=l 


S yassa so. 


210 Atthakavuggo. [S.N. 854 


Теона tà rüàpatanhà saddatanhà ! gandhatanhà rasatanhá 
photthabbatauha dhammatanháà. 

Raso ti mülaraso khandharaso tacaraso pattaraso pup- 
pharaso phalaraso! ambilam? madhuram tittikam? katukam 
lonikam khàrikam lambilam kasávo sādum asádum sitam 
unham. Sant’ еке samanabráhmanà  rasagiddha, te 
jivhaggena rasaggàni pariyesantà ahindanti. Te ambilam 
labhitva anambilam  parivesanti, anambilam  labhitvà 
ambilam pariyesanti. Madhuram labhitva amadhuram 
pariyesanti, amadhuram labhitva imadhuram pariyesanti. 
Tittikam ? labhitvà  atittikam — pariyesanti, atittakam 
labhitva tittakam pariyesanti. Katukam * labhitva akatu- 
kam pariyesanti. Alkatukam labhitvà kaiukam  pariye- 
santi. Lonikam labhitva alonikam pariyesanti. Alonikam 
labhitvaà lonikam pariyesanti. Khàárikam labhitvà акпа- 
rikam pariyesanti. Akhàrikam labhitvà kharikam pari- 
yesanti. Lambilam? — labhitvà — kasàvam рагіуеѕапі. 
Kasávam labhitvà lambilam? pariyesanti. Sádum labhitvà 
asádum pariyesanti, Asüdum labhitva sadum pariyesanti. 
Sitam  labhitvà  unham pariyesanti. Unham  labhitvà 
sitam? pariyesanti. Te yam yam labhitvà tena na? 
santussanti, арагарагат pariyesanti, manapikesu rasesu 
rattā giddha gadhità mucehità ајјһораппа ?laggà laggita ? 
palibuddha?. Үаѕѕа 10 rasatanhà pahīnā samucchinnā 
vüpasantà —patipassaddhà —abhabbuppattikaà ñānagginā 
daddhà, so patisamkha yoniso ñhāram àhàreti n' eva 
davàya, na madaya, na mandanàya, na vibhüsanàya; 
yávad eva imassa káyassa thitiyā уарапауа vihimsu- 
paratiya brahmacariyanuggaháya iti рагапаћ ea vedanam 
patikamkhámi", пауай ea vedanam na uppádessami; yatra 
ew me bhavissati anavajjatà ea phasuviharo !?ea tit. 


EY 8 om. 2 p" ampllam. 
? B" S tittakam. 4 В” katukam. 
5 Br labilam; Š lapilam. 9 D" sitalam. 
T B" S on. 8-8 S ааа gallità. 
9 ph $ рам. 10 p" N yass' еза. 


U Codd. patiham? and below. Pu puse. 


S.N. 855] Purabhedeasuttaniddeso. 211 


Yathà vanam! ālimpeyya yávad eva ropanatthàáya, yathā 
và pana aklham abbanjeyya? yavad eva bhàárassa nittha- 
ranatthàva, yathā và pana puttamamsa-aharam àhá- 
reyya уйтай eva kantàrassa nitiharanatthaya; evam eva 
bhikkhu patisamkhaà yoniso àháram аһагей n' eva daváya, 
^na màdàya, па mandanüya. na vibhüsanáya; yàvad eva 
imassa kiyassa thitiya yapanaya, vihimsuparatiya brahma- 
cariyánuggaháya, iti ригапай ea vedanam pațikamkhāmi, 
пахай ca vedanam na uppádessàmi; yatra ca me Dhavissati 
anavajjatà ca* phàsuvihàro cà ti, rasatanham pajabati 
vinodeti byantikaroii? anabhàvam gameti; rasatanhàya 
àrato? virato pativirato nikkbanto nissattho vippamutto 
visaBüutto vimariyadikatena cetasa viharaii ti, aviruddho 
са tanháya rase са nànugijjhati. Теп’ аһа Вһасауа: 


Labhakamyà na sikkhati, alàbhe ? са па? kuppati, 
aviruddho са tanháya rase ca nànugijjhati ti. 


Upekkhako sadà sato na loke maníüati 


ваша 
па visesi na пїсеууо, tassa no santi 
ussada. 8. 


Upekkhako | sadà sato ti. Upekkhako ti chalañeu- 
pekkhiya? samannágato cakkhunà гарат disvà n’ eva 
sumano hot, па dummano upekkhako viharati sato 
ѕашрајлпо. Sotena saddam sutvā, ?ghànena candham 
ghàáyitvà, jivhàya rasam sāvitvā, hàyena photthablam 
phusitvà?, manasà dhammam vinnàya n’ eva sumano 
hoti, na dummano upekkhako viharati sato ѕатрајапо. 
Cakkhuna гарат disvà апарат nàábhigijhati' nàbhi- 
hasati! na гасат janeti. Tassa (бо va Кауо hoti, 
{Шат cittam ajjhattam — susanthitam U suvimuttam. 


1 Š na vantam na. ? pr abbh?. 
3 Br Š puttamamsum 4°. 1-4 p" pe. 
5 B" byantikaronti. 9 B» S ad. assa. 
7— Be Š na ea. 8 S laüngu*. 
9.9 Br 5 pe. 10 S nabhigiddhati. 
US nābhihamsati. *? S supakkhitam. 


15 


249 Atthakavaggo. [5.Х. 855 


Cakkhunáà kho pan’ eva rüpam disvà amanápam na 
mañku hoti appatitthinaeitto àdinamanaso abyàpanna- 
cetaso. Tassa thito va! kayo hoti, thitam cittam ajjhattam 
susanthitam suvimuttam.  Sotena saddam sutvà, ghánena 
gandham ghayitva, jivhàya rasam sāyitvā, kàyena phot- 
tabbam phusitvà, manasa dhammam vinnaàya manàpam 
nábhigijhati nábhihasati па ragam janeti. Tassa thito 
va kayo hoti, thitam cittam ajjhattam susauthitam suvi- 
muttam. Manasá kho pan’ eva? dhammam viniàya amana- 
pam na manku hoti appatitthinacitto? àdinamanaso* abyà- 
pannacetaso. Tassa thito va kàyo hoti, thitam cittam ajjhat- 
tam susanthitam? suvimuttam. Саккһопа гӯрат disvà 
тапарашапареѕи rüpesu. Tassa thito va kayo hoti, thitam 
cittam ajjhattam susanthitam suvimuttam. Sotena ѕаддат 
sutva, 9ghànena gandham ghàáyitvà, јіуһауа rasam sáyitvà, 
kàyena photthabbam phusitvà?, manasà dhammam viniàya 
manipimanápesu dhammesu tassa thito va kāyo hoti, 
thitam cittam ajjhattam susapthitam suvimuttam. Cak- 
khunà rüpam disvà rajaniye na rajjati, доѕапіуе na dussati, 
mohaniye na muyhati, kopaniye na kuppati, kilesaniye па 
kilissati, madaniye na majjati; sotena saddam suivà, 
$ghànena gandham gháàyitvà, jivhàya газат}  sáyitvà, 
küyena photthabbaim phusitva? manasa dhammam vilibàya 
rajaniye na rajjati", dosaniye na dussati, mohaniye па 
muyhati, kopaniye na kuppati, kilesantye na kilissati, 
madaniye na majjati. Ditthe ditthamatto, sute suta- 
matto, mute mutanmatto, viññate vinnatamatto, Пе na 
limpati, sute na limpati, mute na орай, vinhate na 
limpati. Ditthe anüpayo? anissito appatibaddho vippa- 
mutto visamyutto vimariyádikatena cetasá viharati. Sute 
mute viňňāte anüpayo anissito appatibaddho vippamutto 
visamyutto vimariyadikatena cetasà viharati. Samvijjati 
irahato cakkhu, passati агаһа eakkhuná гарат, chanda- 


! B" $ ea. ? S assa. 3 p? 5 appatitthana?. 
1 B" alinamanaso ; S alinamasà. 
5 Š suvisainthitam. e Br 8 ре. 


T S vanjati. 8 p" Si anupäyo; б anuppayo. 


S.N. 855] Purabhedasuttaniddeso. 243 


rigo arahato n’ atthi; suvimuttacitto arahà. Samvijjati 
arahato sotam, sunáti агаһа sotena sadda), ehandarágo 
arahato n’ atthi: suvimuttaeitto arahá.  Sumvijjati 
arahato ghánam, ghàyati arahā ghànena gandhiun, 
chandarágo arahato n’ atthi; suvimuttacitto агара. Sam- 
viijati arahato jivhà, вауай агара јіуһауа rasam, ! chanda- 
таво arahato п’ atthi; suvimuttaeitto arahà!. Samvijjati 
arahato kayo, phussati arahà kāyena photthabbam, 
'ehandarago arahato п’ atthi; suvimuttacitto arahà!. 
Samvijjati arshato mano, vijanáti агаћа manasa dhammam, 
chandarágo arahato n’ aithi; suvimuttaeitto arahi. 
Cakkhu rüpáràmam? rüparatam rüpasammuditam, tam 
arahato dantam guttam rakkhitam samvutam, tassa са 
samvaraya  dhammam deseti. Sotam saddīrāmam 5, 
ghànam gandhàrámam, jivhà rasārāmā rasaratà rasasain- 
одна, ва arahato danta guttà rakkhità samvutà, tassa 
ea samvaraya dhammam deseti. Kayo photthabbaramo *, 
mano dhammàràmo dhammarato dhammasammudito, so 
arahato danto gutto rakkhito samvuto, tassa са samvaráya 
dhammam deseti. 


*Dantam nayanti samitim, dantam rājābhirūhati, 
danto settho manussesu, yo 'tivàkyam * titikkhati. 
Varam assatarà dantà, ajàniya? va? sindhavá, 
kuijarà va mahànága, attadanto tato varam. 

Na hi etehi yànehi gaecheyya amatam? disam, 
yathà `ttana 5 sudantena danto dantena gaechati. 


TVidhásu na vikappanti? vippamutta punabbhava ", 
dantabhümim anuppatta te loke vijitivino. 


* Dhp. 321-323. T S. ii, 84. 
1—1 БВ» 8 pe. 2 8 rūparammanan. 
3 B> S ad. pe. *OS така, 
5 p» 8 ајапеууа. 9 D? eg. 
7 B"agatam. S 8 'ttanam. 


9 B" vikampanti; Š vitabbanti. 
0 Š vinibbhavi. 


244 Atfhakavaggo. (S.N. 855 


*Yass' indriyani bhavitani! 

ajjhattam ea? bahiddha са sabbaloke, 
nibbijh' imam parañ са lokam 
kalam kamkhati bhávito sudanto? ti. 

Upelhhako sadā ti. Sada sabbada sabbakalani nicca- 
kalam dhuvakálam . . . ре... paeehimavayo? khandhe. 
Sato ti eatühi karanehi sato, Кауе küyanupasesanisati- 
ралат bhāvento sato, vedanaüsu, eitte?, dhammesu 
dhamnmanupassanasatipatthànam bhávento sato ... pe.. 
so vuecati sato ti, upekkhako sad sato. 

Na loke mañħati saman ti sadiso 'ham asmi ti manam 
na janeti jatiyà và gottena và .. . pe . . . annataranna- 
tarena và vatthuna ti, na loke maünati samam. 

Na risesi na nieeygo ti seyyo Паш asmi ti аіппапат 
na janeti jatiyà và gottena và . . . pe . . . айпафагаййа- 
tarena va vatthunà. Hino 'ham asmī ti manam па 
janeti jatiyá và gottenà vā... pe... anüataranna- 
tarena và vatthunà t1, па visesi na niceyyo. 

Tassa no santi atssadéá ti. Таѕха ti arahato khinasavassa. 
Ussudá ti sattussada, rágussado dosussado mohussado 
nanussado ditthussado kilesussado kammussado. Tass’ 
ime ussadà п’ utihi, na santi, na samvijjanti, n’ upa- 
labbhanti, pahináà samuechinnà vüpasantà patipassaddhà 
abhabbuppattika nanagginà daddha ti, tassa no santi 
ussuda. Теп’ аһа Dhacava : 

Upekkhako вада sato na loke mannati samam 

na visesi na пісеууо, tassa uo santi ussada ti. 

Yassa nissayata/ n' uatthi, naiva 
dhammam anissito 

bhavaya vibhavàya са” tanhā vassa 
na vijjati. 9. 


* Sn. 516. 


! Do subhavitant. 2 S on. 3 B" S sadanto. 
3 Біо. ° В" paechime vayo; S paechime dvave. 


5 S cittesu. 
T BP 8 nissayaná. 8 b? và ; S on. 


S.N. 856] DPurübhedasuttauiddeso. 245 


Vassa nissayatü w ат ti. Yassü ti arahato khina- 
savassn. Nissayā ti dve nissayà, іапһаліѕвауо ca ditthi- 
nissayo са... pe . . . ayam tanhanissayo . . . pe . 
пуат ditthinissayo. Tassa tanhanissayo pahino, dbi 
nissayo patinissattho ; tanhánissayassa pahinattà, ditthi- 
nissayassa patinissatthattà, nissayatà yassa п’ atthi!, па 
samvijjati?, n’ upalabbhati?; pahina samucchinnà vupa- 
santa patipassaddhà? abhabhuppattika nàanagginà daddhà 
ti, yaesa nissayatà n’ atthi. 

Хава dhaninau anissito ti. Хаба t ñatva jànitvà 
iulayitva tirayitvà vibhávayitva vibhütam katva. Sabbe 
samkhárá aniecà ti hatvà jānitvā tulayitva tirayitvà vibhà- 
vayitvà vibhütam katvà. Sabbe samkhará dukkha ti, sabbe 
dhammàá anattà ti... pe... yam Кїйсї samudaya- 
dhammam sabban tam nirodhadhamman ti Batvà janitva 
tulayitva tirayitvà vibhavayitva vibhütam katvà. —.[uissito 
ti dve nissayáà, tanhantssayo са ditthinissayo са... pe... 
ayam tanhānissayo . . . pe . . . ayam ditthinissayo. 
Tanhánissayam раһауа, ditthinissayam patținissajjitvā, 
eakkhum anissito, sotam anissito, ghànam anissito, jivham 
anissito, kayam  anissito, manam anissito, rüpe sadde 
gandhe rase photthabbe? kulam ganam āvāsam ... ре... 
ditthisutamutavinnatabbe dhamme anissito anallino anu- 
pagato anajjhosito anadhimutto mnikkhanto nissattho 5 
vippamutto visamyutto vimariyádikatena сеїава viharati ti, 
hatvà dhammam anissito. 

Bhaváya vibharàya са tanhG yassa ка cijjati u. Tasha 
ti rüpatanhà saddatanha gandhatanhà rasatanhá phot- 
thabbatanhà dhammatanhà. Yassa ti агаһабо khīnāsa- 
vassa. асана ti bhavaditthiyà ; vibhardyà ti vibhava- 
ditthiyá?; Lbhavàyá ti sassataditthiyà ё; vibhavàya ti 
ucchedaditthiyà; bhavaya ti punappunam? Mbhavàya, 
punappunam gatiyi, punappunam uppattiya, punappunani 


t» 


1 Ве Sad. na santi. 5 Santi. 

3 S patissaddha. Š «d. dhamme. 
5 Ө nissato. 9 D? «d. và. 

7 B? S punappuna throughout. 


> 


946 Althakavagqo. [S.N. 856 


patisandhiyà, punappunam attabhavabhinibhbattiya. Tanhà 
yassa n’ atihi!l, na samvijjati?, n’ upalabbhati?, pahina 
samuechinnà vüpasanta patipassaddhà abhabbuppattilà 
hànaggina daddba ti, bhavàya vibhaváya ca? tanhā yassa 
na vijati. Теп’ аһа Bhagasà: 


Yassa nissayatà* п’ atthi, natvà dhammam anissito 
bhavàya vibhavàya ea? tanhà yassa na vijjati ti. 


Tam brümi upasanto ti kamesu ana- 
pekkhinam$, 

gantbā tassa na vijjanti, atari' so 
visattikam. 10. 


Tam brāmi upasasto ii “santo upasanto упраѕапіо 8 
nibbuto patipassaddho ti. Tem? brāmī ti? tam kathemi, 
tam bhanàmi, tam дірауаші, tam voharàmi ti, tam brümi 
upasanto P. 

Катеви anapekkhiuan ti. Kama ti uddànato dve Каша, 
vatthukama ea kilesakama ca ... pe... пе vuceanti 
valthukàma . . . pe . . . ime vuecanti kilesakümá. 
Vatthukàme parijanitva, kilesakàme  pahàya pajahitvà 
vinoditvà byantikaritvà anabhavam сапа 11, /йшези 
anapelkhi*? vitakāmo! eattakamo!* vantakàmo muttakàmo 
pahmakámo  patinissatthaküámo 15  vitarágo!5 eattarago 
vantarigo muttarāgo pahinarago patinissattharago nic- 
eháto nibbuto? sitibhüto sukhapatisamvedi brahinabhütena 
attanà viharati ti, kàmesu anapekkhinam 18. 

Ganthü (assa па cijjanti ti. Сапа ti cattàro gantha, 
abhijhi  kàyagantho, byàpádo  káyagantho, silabbata- 
paràináso kyagantho: idam saecübhiniveso kàyagantho. 


1 B" S ad. na santi. ? $ "anti. 

5 Š và. 4 D" S nissayaná. 5 p" và; Som. 

° S anapekkhānam. T Datari throughout. 
8-5 PS om. 9 p" 5 brümi. 10 Dr S «d. ti. 

!" p" 8 gametva. 1? D" S anapekkhino. 

135 pv S om. 14 5 vatthukamo. 

7 p? S ad. kàmesu. 16 pr S dd. vigatarügo. 


17 Son. 5 pr S anapekkhino. 


S.N. 858] Purábhedasuttaniddeso, 247 


Attano ditthiya гапо, abhijlià kayacantho. Paravüdesu 
àgháto appaceayo, byāpādo küyagantho. Attano sila và 
vattam và sīilabbattam và paramasati, silabbataparaimiso 
káyagantho. Attano ditthi, idam  saccübhiniveso Кауа- 
gantho.  T'assa ti arahato khinasavassa. (ана tassa nu 
гапт ti gantha tassa n’ atthi, na santi, na samvijjanti, 
n' upalabbhanti, pahina samucchinnà vüpasanta pati 
passaddhà abhabbuppattika nànagginà daddhà ti, gauthà 
tassa na vijjanti. 

Atāri so visattikan. ti. Visattikā хассан tanhá; yo 
rigo sàrágo . . . pe... abhijha lobho akusalamülam. 
Visattikà ti. ! Ken' atthena 1 visattikà ? 1 Visati ti 
visattika!, visala ti visattika, visatthà? ti visattika, visamà 
ti visattikà, visakkati ti visattikà, visamharati ti visattika, 
visamvadikà ti visattika, visamulà ti visattika, visaphala ti 
visattikà, visaparibhoga ti visattika, visàlà và pana sē 
tanhà rüpe sadde gandhe rase photthabbe kule gane 
ауаѕе . . . ре... ditthasutamutavinnatabbesu dhammesu 
visatà vitthata? ti, visattika. Айч so visattikan ti so 
imam visattiham tanham atári uttari* pattari? sama- 
tikkami vitivattati ti, atàri so visattiham. Теп аһа 
Bhagavà : 


Tam brümi upasanto ti kàmesu anapekkhinan Š, 
ganthà tassa na vijjanti, atàri so visattikan ti. 


Na tassa putta pasavo* khettam 
vatthuh са vijjati. 

attam’ vā pi nirattam? và na tasmim 
upalabbhati. 11. 


Na tassa putt рахаго? khettam. vatthuñ са vijjati ti 
Ха ti patikkhepo. Tassā ti arahato khinasavassa. Putta 
ti eattiro puttà, attajo putto, khettajo putto, dinnako 


1—1 S om. 2 Si S visati. 3 б visattà. 
4 5 uttari ti. 5 В” 5 on. $ 8 ?kliino 
7 S ud. và онок. š B" S attà throughout. 
9 


B? S niratta throughout. 


248 Affhalkavaggo. [ S.N. 858 


putto, antevàslko райо. Раѕигоі ti ајејака kukkuta- 
ѕпкага hatthigavássavalavà?7. — Khettan ti? sülikhettam 
vihikhettam muggakhettam masakhettam  yavakhettam 
godhümakhettam tilakhettam.  Vatthun ti gharavatthu 
kotthakavatthu  purevatthu  paechàvatthu | àràmavatthu 
vihàravatthu. Nat tassa. puttā pasaro Рисна catthuñ ca 
vijjati ti tassa puttapariggaho và pasupariggaho và khetta- 
pariggaho và vatihupariggaho và п’ atthi, па santi, па 
samvijjanti, n’ upalabbhanti, pahina samucehinnà vüpa- 
santà patipassaddhà abhabbuppattika nànaggina daddhà 
ti. па tassa puttà pasavo khettam vaithun ca vijjati. 

Айнаш cà pi uirattam că na tasmiyy upelabblati t. 
tta ti sassataditthi? n’ atthi9?, nirattà ti uechedaditthi 
n'atthi?, аа ti gahitam n’ atthi, nirattà ti mulicitabbam 
п’ atthi. Yassa п’ atthi gahitam, tassa р’ atthi muncei- 
inbbam; yassa п’ atthi muicitabbam, tassa ш’ atthi 
gahitam ; gahanamuiieanam* samatikkanto? ағара vuddhim 
parihànim vitivatto. бо vutthaváso einnacarano 
ре"... п’ абі tassa punabbhavo ti, attam và pi nirattam 
vi па tasmim upalabbhati. Тер’ аһа Вһасаха: 


Na tassa риа 10 pasavo khettam vatthun са уай, 
attam và pi nirattam và na tasmim upalabbhati ti. 


Yena” vajjum?? puthujjana atho sa- 
manabràhmanà, 

tam tassa apurekkhataum, tasmàáà vā- 

desu n?’ ejati. 12. 

Гепа nam vajjon puthujjang айо ватанат олана ti. 

Puthujjanā ti. 19Ken' atthena puthujjanaP?? Puthukilese 


l Soad. và throughout. 2 D" hatthigavo assa’. 

3 S ad. pl. 4 Bv Si om. 

5 p» Sattaditthi. 9 B» S (он. n’ atthi. 

T В" gahainulieana ; 8 gáhan ca. 

8 5 ?kkamanto. э p» 6 jàtimaranasamsaro. 
10 D? Si putto. п B? S ad. nam. 


12 S vajjam tHronghont, P- BP S от. 


S.N. 859] Purabledasuttaniddeso. 249 


janenti ti puthujjani ; puthu! avihatasakkayaditthikà ti 
puthujjana; puthu sattháranam mulkhullokikà ti puthuj- 
janà; рафа sabbagaGhi àavunità? ti puthujjanà; puthu 
ninübhisamkhàrehi abhisamkharonti ti puthujjanà: puthn 
nànà-oghehi vayhanti ti puthujjana; puthu nanasantapehi 
santappenti tà puthujjani; puthu nanaparilahehi pari- 
dayhanti ti puthujjanà puthu paneasu kámagunesu габа 
giddha сааһа? ajjhopannà lagga laggità palibuddha 
ti puthujjanà puthu paheahi nivaranehi* душа nivutà 
ophutà? pihità patiechannà patikujjità ti puthujjani. 
Samana ti ye keci ito bahiddhà paribbàjupasatà ^ paribbà- 
јаѕашараппа *. Brāhmanā ti ye keci bhovadikà. Рола? 
vajjum putthujjanà atho samanabrihinanà ti puthujjana 
yena? тасепа vadeyyum, yena dosena vadevyum, yena 
mohena vadeyyum, уела mánena vadeyyum, yàya ditthiya 
vadeyyum, yena nddhaceena vadeyyum, yayra vicikicehàya 
vadeyyum, yehi anusayehi vadeyyum ratto ti và, duttho ti 
và, mülho ti và, vinibandho ti ха, parámattho ti và, 
vikkhepagato ti và, anitthaüngato? ti và, thimagato?? ti 
và; te abhisamkhiàrà pahina, abhisamkhiranam pahī- 
пайа, gatiya!! yena!? vadeyyum nerayiko ti và, tiraecha- 
nayoniko ti và, pittivisayiko ti và, manusso ti và, devo 
ti và, rupi ti và, arüpi ti và, sanhi ti và, asanbi ti và, 
nevasanninasanüni!? ti vā, so hetu n’ atthi, paecayo n’ 
atthi, kāranam n’ atthi, yena} vadeyyum katheyyum 
bhaneyyum dipayeyyum 15 vohareyyun ti, yena!? vajjum 
puthujjanà atho samanabrühmanà. 

Tam tassa apurekkhatan ti. assa. ti arahato khina- 
savassa. Purekkhàro ti dve purekkhàrà, tanhapurekkháro 


1 pP бі от. 2 Br S avutthità. 
3 Б> S ad. mucehità. 3 5 kamagunehi. 
° В» S отта. 6 Š parinibbaj?. 
t В” ad. паш; 5 «d. tavam. ° Dr S ad. Таш, 
° B? 5 anitthagato. 10 S ogato. 

ll Si сайуо. 1? S ad. tam. 

13 


S пехавайй ti và nà?. 
u B» S ad, nam. 15 Be dipeyvum. 


250 Atfhakavraggo. (S.N. 859 


са ditthipurekkhàro ea . . . pe!  . . ayun tanha- 
purekkhiro . . . pe . . . ayam ditthipurekkhàro. Tassa 
tanhápurekkháro pahino, ditthipurekkhàáro patinissattho, 
tanhápurekkhárassa pahinatta, ditthipurekkharassa pati- 
nissatthattà, па tanham уа ditthim và purato katvà carati; 
na tanhádhajo, na tanhàketu, na tanhádhipateyyo, па 
ditthidhajo, na ditthiketu, na ditthadhipateyyo, na tanháya 
và ditthiyà và parivárito earati ti, tam tassa apurek- 
khatam. 

Tasmā vüdesu w cjati ti. Tasmā ti tasmà tamkarana 
tamhetu tappaccayā tamnidānā ?rvādesu upavādesu ? 
nindāya garahaya? akittiyà avannahárikaya n’ ejati, na 
ejati*, na calati, na vedhati, na-ppavedhati na sampa- 
vedhati ti, tasma vādesu n' ejati. Теп аһа Bhagavā: 


Yena’ vajjam puthujjana ао samauabrahmaná, 
tamı tassa apurekkhatam, tasmà vàdesu n’ ejati ti. 


Vitagedho amaechari na ossesu? va- 
date muni 

na samesu na omesu, kappam n' eti 
akappiyo. 13. 


Vitagedho amacchari ti. Gedho vuceeati taühà, yo ràgo 
sirügo . .. pe... аһа lobho akusalunülam. Yass’ 
eso gedho pabino samuechinno vüpasanto patipassaddho 
abhabbuppattiko hànaggma daddho, so vuecati vitagedho. 
So rüpe agiddho . . . pe . . . ditthasutamutavilnà- 
tabbesu? dhummesu? agiddho agadhito amuechito апајјћо- 
panno? vitigedho 1° eattagedho vantegedho muttagedlio 11 
patinissatthagedho niecháto !?nibbuto sitibhüto sukliapati- 
samvedi'^ bralimabhütena attana viharati ti, vitagedho. 


1 Son. #—° B vadena và vádesu và. 
? S ad. дауа. 1 Be injati; S iechati. 

5 S ad. lam. 5 В” ussesu ; Š uyena. 

7 B'S ^tabbe. 8 pr S dhamme. 

9° Dr B anajjhosito. 1? pr $ ad. vigatagedho. 


M pr S ad. palinagedho. 17—12 Br S pe. 


S.N. 861] Purábhedasuttaniddeso. 251 


Amacchari ti. Macehariyan ti panca maechariyani, lavasa- 
macchariyam kulamaechariyain ! làbhamaeehariyam vauni- 
maechariyum | dhaàmmamaechariyum ; yam — evarüupam 
macchariyam? . . . ре... gāho vuecati macchariyain. 
Yass’ etam maeehariyam ратар samucchinnam vupa- 
santam  patipassaddham  abhabbuppattikun — nànaggina 
daddham, so vueeati amaechari ti, vitagedho amaeehari ? 
Na ossesu * radate muni, na samesu na omesi ti, Muni ti 
топат vueeaii Bànam . . . pe . . . ѕайдајаїат aticca so 
muni. Muni? seyyo 'ham asmi ti và, sadiso "ham asmi 
ti và, himo ат asmi ti và, па vadati, па katheti, na 
bhanati, па dipayati, na voharati ti, na ossesu vadate 
muni. na samesu па omesu. 
Kappam w eti akappigo ti. Kapp’ ti dye kappa, tanbà- 
Барро ea ditthikappo са... pe . . . ayam tauhakappo 
pe... ayam ditthikappo. Tassa tanbakappo 
БОШО: ditthikappo patinissattho, tauhákappassa pahi- 
пайа, ditthikappassa patinissatthattá, tanhakappam và 
ditthikappam và »' eti, na upeti, na upagaeebati, na 
ganhati,na parimasati, n` abhinivisati ti. Kappa u cti 
akappiyo ti. Карро ti dve kappa, tanhākappo са ditthi- 
kappo ea... pe... ayam tanhakappo. . . ре. 
ayam ditthikappo. Tassa tanhákappo pahino, debian 
patinissattho, tassa tanhákappassa pahinattà ditthikap- 
passa patinissatthatti tanhákappam và ditthikappam và па 
kappeti na janeti na saljaneti na nibbatteti п’ abhinib- 
batteti ti, kappam n’ eti akappivo. Теп’ аһа Dhacava : 
Vitagedho amaechari па ossesu vadate muni 


na samesu na omesu, Карраш n^ eti akappiyo ti. 


Yassa loke вакат m` utthi, asstà ca 
ni Socati, 
dhammesu са па gaeclhati, sa ve santo 


ti vuccati. 11. 
1-1 5 Каја ayasa”, 2 Туе S on. 
3 S ad. ti. * B" ussesu ; S uyesu wal hhur. 


5 Son. $ p" S Карра. 


252 Afthakacaggqo. [S.N. 861 


lassa loke sakan w atti ti. Үаѕѕа ti arahato 1klina- 
savassa?. ала w «1а ti yassa mayham và idam 
paresam và idan ti kiñci rüpagatam vedanágatim ваййа- 
gatam samkbáragatam vihnanagatam gahitam paràniat- 
tham abhinivittham — ajjhositam  adhimuttam w atthi 

pe . . . Bànagginà daddban ti, yassa loke sakam 
п а. 

18аа са па socati tà viparinatam vā vatthum na socati, 
viparinatasmim và vatthusmim na socati, eukkhu me 
vipariuatan ti na socati, sotam me, ghanam me, jivhà 
me, kayo me, mano me. гпра me, вайда me, gandhà me, 
rasà me, photthabbà me, kulam me, gano me, avāso 
me, libho me. yaso me, pasamsà me, sukham me, 
Gvaram me, pindapàto me, ѕепавапат me, gilànapaceaya- 
bhesajjaparikkhàáro me, mātā me, pità me, bhàtà me, 
bhagini me, putto me, dhità me, mittà me, ашасса me, 
hatakà me, salohità me viparinatà ti na socati, na kilamatl, 
па paridevati na urattilim kandati, na sammoham арај- 
Jati ti, evam pi asatü са na socati. 

А Шауа asatāya dukkhàya vedanáya phuttho pareto 
samohito samannágato na socati, na kilamati, па pari- 
devati, na urattilim kandati, па sammoham àpajjati; 
cakkhurogena phuttho pareto samohito samannáàgato па 
socati, na kilamati, na paridevati, na urattālim Кардай 
na sammobam äpajjati; sotarogena ghanarogena jlvhà- 
rogena kayurogena sisarogena hannarogena mukharogena 
dantarogena küsena sásena pinasena dahena jarena kuc- 
chirogena muechàya  pakkhandikàya sulàya  visücikaya 
kutthena gaudena kilàsena sosena apamarena danduyà? 
kanduyà kacchuya rakhasaya vitaechikáya lohitena pittena 
madhuniehena amsāya pilakāya bhagandalaya ° pitta- 
smnutthànehi 9 abādhehi 7 semhasamutthanehi àbadhehi? 


! S khinassa. ? p" 8 ad. loke. 
з pr S dadduyà. 

? Dr na khasáya. 

^ p" bhagandhalena ; 3 bhagandalena. 

* Беу ^tháànena. 7 p" S àábüdhena. 


S.N. 861] Purābhedasuttaniddiso. 253 


vütasamutthanehi* abadhehi? sannipatikehi? ábadhehi* 
utuparinàmajeni * abadhehi? ? opakkamikehi ? abàdhehi ? 
kammavipakajehi* abadhehi? sitena uuhena jighaechàva 
pipisáya ' uecàrena passávena* danisamakasavatütapasirim- 
sapasamphassehi phuttho pareto samolito? samannágato 
па socati, na kilamati, na paridevati, na urattālhn kandati, 
na sammoham áàpajjati ti, evam pi asatà са na socati. 
Аата asante asamvijjunane anupsülibbhivamáne: aho 
vata ?me tam, tam vata me? n' atthi; slya vata me 
tam, tam vataham na? labhami ti na socati, na kilamati, 
na paridevati, na urattilim kandati, па sammoham 
àpajjati ti, evam рі asata са na socati. 

Dhamunesu са па gacchati ti na ehandàgatin gacehati, 
па doságatim gacchati, na mohāgatim  gacechati, па 
bhayágatim gaechati, па ràgavasena gaechati, na dosa- 
vasena gacehati,na mohavasena gaechati, na mánavasena 
gaechati, na ditthivasena gaechati. па uddhaecavasena 
gacchati, na vielkiechavasena gacchati,na anusayavasena 
gacchati, na 12 vaggehi dhammehi yáyati niyyati vuyhati 
samhariyau !° ti, dhammesu са na gaechati P. 

Sa re santo ti cuccati ti во santo upasanto vüpasanto 
nibbuto patipassaddho P? vucceati!9 kathiyati bhaniyati 


| В’ S ?thànena. 

2 B» 5 abadhena. 

3 B" gannipátikena ; 5 sanuipatena. 

4 В 8 Jena. 

5 B" S ?jeua aud ad. visamapariharajena àbadhena. 
e D" У ?kena. 

ПУТА 

8 5 sammohato. T Sont. 
9 В ош. 

п pr у del. са. 

1? D» «d, са. 

B” samhariyvati; S samsádiyati. 

| oS ^?u ti 

15 pr S ad. ti. 

16 D» qd, pavuceati. 


254 Atfhakavagqo. [S.N. 861 


dipayati vohariyati ti, sa ve santo ti vaecati'. Ten 
аһа Dhagavà: 


Yassa loke sakam п” ап, asatà ca па socati, 
dhammesu ea na gaechati, sa ve santo ti vuc- 
cati ti. 


Dasaxo? PURABHEDASUTTANIDDESO NITTHITO?. 


1 pr SŠ ?ti ti. 2 B? Š om. 
3 r S dasamo. 


PRINTED ШУ 
BILLING AND БОХА, LIMITED, 
GUILDFORD, ENGLAND 


